Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
Number of Reviews
61

Author
James Brundage
Starship Troopers may win the war, but looses the battle.
Lets take movies from the side that they really are. The side that almost no
one ever sees that isn't in the business. The side that lacks the glamour of
the interest or the entertainment. The side of a bunch of lawyers, CPAs and
rich kids all gathered together to make more money. Its a side that doesn't
really have much to show, that isn't anything more than people in Armani in
a room deciding the entertainment of a nation.
Think of them as car dealers, brokering to you a beat up Pinto that's been
repainted and is going for pretty cheap, and you have a good idea of what
Starship Troopers is like.
Picture the conversation : "What does this movie have to offer you? Its fun,
its sci-fi. The human race fighting for survival, that sorta thing. It has
relationships. Its based on the 1959 classic. Its has something for
everyone."
Okay, you think, the movie sounds okay so far, but what about when he begins
the next bit, talking to you dressed in a cheap suit and a K-Mart tie, arms
spread out in a hug and pot belly accented.
"And, free of extra charge, we've got some goodies for you. It comes with
plenty of violence for all you gore-hounds out there, with a human and alien
body count close to 5,000 shown. And, of course, millions more die behind
the scenes. We torture one scared alien. Like unnecessary nudity? We've got
that too.
"And we've got this wonderful old-fashioned new negative utopia angle for
you to try. You have to serve in the military to be a citizen. We've got a
bug shooting things out of its but. We've got cockroaches being smashed to
little-itty bitty bits for all those city-dwellers. We've got psychics for
all those watches of the Sci-Fi channel. We've got cheap relationships for
you who don't want to get too deep into the movie. But, for those who try to
get deep into the movie, we try (no promises) to give you a nice bit of
humanity with our impossibly drawn-out death scenes (but they're terribly
faked for all you conservative parents). Not a lot of profanity, but, hey,
you can't win them all.

Author
Jeff Walters
There was alot of Aliens Resurrection vs Starhip Troopers talk last
year and both were tagged as movies to watch at the Box Office.
It came as a fairly big surprise when both movies fizzled and died
on release. Dissappointment aside, which movie emerged on top?
 Well, in my opinion - it's Starship Troopers.
               Alien's Resurrection was the movie I was waiting for in
1997 and I had very high hopes for it. Dissappointment was sadly the
end result. Besides one or two nice action scenes (the underwater
sequence was brilliant) the movie just really failed to make any
real impact. Quickly souring on bug-theme movies I wasn't really
looking forward to Starship Troopers and walked into it with my sights
set low. This movie is no masterpeice of cinema - that is for sure.
But damn it was entertaining, something A4 really failed to be.
             One thing you can't do with this movie, is take it
seriously - no sir. First time I saw it I was half-expecting a serious
film and didn't enjoy it as much - but the second time I
saw it I knew what to expect - and man was this film better the second
time around. The key is to accept that the movie in no way takes
itself seriously - so you must do the same. The cast appears to be
handpicked from Aaron Spelling's stables. The script
keeps the multiple syllable words to an absolute minimum ("You're some
big fat smart  bug aren't ya?") and the tactics used by the troopers
and ships in combat would have any retired army veteran
rolling around laughing hysterically. ('Duh yeah, let's park our ships
here where they can be shot out of the sky like last time or better
yet - let's walk down through this narrow canyon where falling rocks
betray the presence of bugs up high...no wait...I've got an idea -
then let's send a guy up out of the canyon to be hacked to death!').
Smart this movie ain't.
               With all this sarcasm and cheap jibes at the movie
you're likely wondering why I gave this movie 3 1/2 out of 5
stars? Well, to put it simply - this movie is fuuuun. The special FX
are simply awe inspiring. The bugs are the best CG creatures you'll
see in a movie. Forget the Jurassic Park dinos or Alien 4 cockroaches
- these bugs look incredibly real...and more then slightly
frightening. They are quick deadly and very difficult to kill. There
are also many different types of bugs. My favourite is the big
bettle-like bug that spits something resembling napalm at it's
 enemies - very nice. The scenes involving the massive starships are
also beautifully rendered, though it would have been nice if these
ships saw some kind of action besides getting shot down by
planet-launched balls of  'bug-plasma'.
               Ok...onto the characters. Casper Van Dien (Johnny Rico)
is likable enough in the lead role, but no-one would accuse him of
depth or his character of intellect. Dina Meyer (Dizzy Flores) is
actually pretty good as one of the two female leads, her character has
 much more life to her than most of her co-stars. The pick of the cast
are Michael Ironside as the no nonsense teacher turned combat leader,
Rasczak, and Clancy Brown as the incredibly tough and likely
certifably insane Sergeant Zim. He is the real scene-stealer of the
movie and his somewhat unorthodox methods for getting messages across
to his troops is hilarious if twisted (He turns the word 'MEDIC!' into
the ultimate one-liner). Ace Levy (played by Jake Busey, who is
a dead-ringer for relative Gary Busey) also provides some good comic
relief through the training section of the movie.
         The weak links of the cast? Two big ones. Denise Richard's
Carmen Ibanez has gotta be one of the dullest characters you'll see.
Talk about a barbie doll. She has zero one liners, no character and a
smile that seems to have been surgically fixed in place. Even
when her love interest (Patrick Muldoon) has his brains sucked out of
his skull by the 'big fat smart bug' she seems to be unable to stiffle
the gameshow host smile. Never  seen this actress before. No wonder
why. The other big mis-cast is Neil Patrick Harris as the geeky
psychic, Carl. Why did someone have to dig up Doogie Howser? I thought
we were finally rid of the runt. 
               The action scenes involving the troopers are very
thrilling indeed. Especially when Rico does his rodeo act on the
back of one of the bettle-bugs or when the small squad of troopers try
to hold the Fort against staggering odds. It takes quite a while to
reach the cool action seqeunces though, about 50 minutes of training
and scenes back on earth. Though you start itching for the action, the
lead up parts are still entertaining in their own way. The hilarious
'propaganda' commercials spaced through out the film keeps the
audience's attention. 
               The ending is a total anti-climax unfortunately. After
a short 'rescue the girl' sequence the movie ends abruptly
 leaving the audience fairly unsatisfied. Though the movie is long
enough as is I would have happily sat there for an extra 15 or so
minutes if it meant a more involved and thrilling ending.
               All up - I really enjoyed this movie. It is a very
violent movie, but it is delivered in such a way so that it is never
 disturbingly so. As long as you don't try to take this movie
seriously - you should enjoy it as well. There is talk of a
sequel already and I certainly hope it eventuates as there are many
loose ends left to be tied up. 

Author
E. Benjamin Kelsey
Luckily, some people got STARSHIP TROOPERS. Some people knew it was supposed
to be silly. For those of you who didn't, how could you miss it? From the very
beginning, when we see an interactive Internet-like promotional video for the
armed forces of the future, it should be obvious this film is to be taken
lightly. I guess without blatant one-liners and HOME ALONE style slapstick,
some people just don't recognize such goofy humor. Such a dry approach to such
intentionally campy humor must have left some disillusioned. First thing to do
before seeing this movie - lighten up.
Meet the equivalent of "Beverly Hills 90210" meets "Mighty Morphin Power
Rangers". Four close friends are now graduating high school and are ready to
join the armed forces, which, in the future, means fighting for the whole
galaxy and not just your country. Johnny Rico (Casper Van Dien) is ready to
join the infantry, mostly because his girlfriend Carmen Ibanez (Denise
Richards) has enlisted to be a pilot. Dizzy Flores (Dina Meyer) has enlisted
as a trooper, and it's possible she's joining merely to follow Rico, whom
she's always had eyes for. If you saw these three on the street, you'd
automatically start searching for the fashion designers and photographers, for
never has a movie's cast looked so much like the cut-out cover of "Seventeen"
magazine. The lone non-supermodel, Carl Jenkins (played by Doogie Howser
himself, Neil Patrick Harris) is the brainiac who gets into the military
intelligence division, the top secret department that pretty much leaves
Doogie - er, Carl out of the picture. (Good call - now we can put all our
drooling efforts into only the most deserving of characters).
Right off the bat, Rico becomes the star of the show, far surpassing all the
other soldiers and becoming squadron leader in a short period of time. But a
horrific accident during a standard training exercise (which follows all to
closely to his breakup with Carmen) leaves Rico ready to call it quits. With
his bags packed and his civilian clothes back on, Johnny is ready to walk off
base and catch the next flight home. Well sorry, Rico Suave, but there's no
place like home, especially after gigantic alien insects have destroyed it.
That's right, the planet is being attacked by a colony of arachnid-like alien
beings that a can of Raid just isn't going to destroy. With a sudden change of
heart (and clothes), Rico is back in the game, following his fellow starship
troopers off to fight a mean group of daddy long legs.
What STARSHIP TROOPERS really is, is a spoof of all that it even remotely
touches on - the soap opera like love affairs of high school, the love for
sci-fi and thirst for gore shared by this same age group, etc. Nothing is
taken seriously. It's almost as much a satire on young adults as CLUELESS, but
with its sly and futuristic approach, it's not as recognizably so. It's a
spoof so subtle that many won't recognize the spoofery. If you deem this as
sci-fi/action, you're wrong. It's sci-fi/action/comedy, with the comedy being
on the level of such cult favorites as EVIL DEAD 2. STARSHIP TROOPERS just may
be on the road to cult status as well.
Gore is a factor heavily brought up in reviews of this film, but the gore,
too, is meant to be cheesy. Yes, it's graphic, but it's also brutally phony,
and that's what makes it such great fun to watch. Not since the old "Mr. Bill"
skits on "Saturday Night Live" has torture and mutilation been such a joy to
watch. People were laughing out loud every time a body was severed in half or
a head was viciously decapitated. Perhaps it brings back fond memories of the
severities we inflicted upon our sisters' Barbie dolls as young children. With
the actors resembling Ken and Barbie so closely, it's a good chance this is
the case, whether we're fully aware of it or not.
STARSHIP TROOPERS has it's slow parts, but it's truly an alternative to your
typical sci-fi/action flick or lame juvenile comedy. Aside from the
intentionally cheesy gore, the special effects are quite astounding. When the
spaceship passes a meteor, it's quite an awesome spectacle, visually crisp and
captivating. If you're looking for brainless fun, this is the epitome of your
search. A beautiful cast, awesome special effects, fast-paced action, campy
acting, and a whole lot of gore. This is brainless heaven. Just remember not
to think.

Author
Jeremiah Rickert
     I saw the first trailer for this film about a year ago.  I looked
forward to the film back then, the movie kept getting pushed back and back
and back, and finally in June, they say "Coming in November."  Hmmm.  I
decided to read the book instead.  Despite the fact that, in the past,
the movie is *never* as good as the book, I figured, hey, this will be a
good movie.  I was half right.
     The film concerns the adventures of a trio of high school students
who enter public service in order to become full citizens in the the
Federation that governs Earth.  (In the book we learn that you cannot vote
unless you enter public service).  Public Service is synonymous with
Military service.  One of them (played by Doogie Howser's Neil Patrick
Harris) has phychic abilities and is sent to the Military Itelligence
division (where they become officers immediately).  Johnny Rico (played by
a unknown set of cheekbones) doesn't test very highly, but is rather
athletic, he ends up in the Mobile Infantry. his girlfriend Carmen
(played by an unknown, overly nubile set of cheekbones) and a math-whiz,
enters the flight academy.  They all three take separate paths, which
right away suggests that they will all come together in the climax.
     In between we have Rico's and Carmen's training, which contains the
first ever dear john minidisc in film history.  In the novel, we learn
that the mobile Infantry is the most prestigious form of Public Service,
it is highly regarded by the public, and those who have survived their
term in the MI are revered...this does not come out in the film, much to
my dismay.  It's an element that would have explained a lot that didn't
really make sense.  During his training, Rico quits, but is persuaded to
stay on when the bugs send an asteroid which impacts Buenos Aires, the
kids hometown, wiping it out completely. 
      Carman on the other hand, is wild and wacky and excells at her pilot
training, she ends up getting paired with Xander, another set of amazing
cheeckbones, who is slowly stealing her heart away from Johnny.  She
graduates early and is assigned to the Roger Young, a transport ship,
which delivers the MI to their destinations and retrieves them. 
     Joining Johnny in the MI, and slowly turning his eyes away from
Carmen, is the athletic Dizzy Flores (played by a well-muscled set of
cheekbones who is not afraid to do gratutious shower scenes), another alum
of the BA school, she has always had a thing for Rico, but he's always
shunned her for Carmen...this tit-for-tat love triangle...not, not
triangle, love Rhombus, continues through most of the film. 
     Finally, after 55 minutes...we get bugs...bugs and bugs.  The Earth
forces assume that the bugs are not intelligent, and this is their
undoing, they have some rather unsettling military defeats, and are forced
to do a bit of rethinking before taking the war to the bugs.
     The special effects are pretty darned good, there really wasn't a
time I stopped and went "that was cheesy." which usually happens during
sci-fi films when I spot a flaw.  The bugs were creepy and horrid and
brutal all at the same time, and more than fulfilled any visions I'd had
while reading the books.  The space scenes are well-done as well, somewhat
reminiscent of Babylon 5's style, but looked less computer generated.  The
bugs were overseen by Phil Tippet, who made his mark with the Star Wars
Trilogy.  
     The action in the last half of the movie is a bit fractured, there
isn't really smooth continuity, just a lot of shooting and slurping and
blood and guts, but for some reason I liked it.  A lot of the action
scenes were done rather well, and I wish I'd looked up to see who the
second unit director was, there was some creative stuff done with what
could have been a very redundant set of battle scenes.
     If I hadn't read the book, I would have really liked this film.  I
think that Paul Verhoven is one of the last directors I would have chosen
for Starship Troopers.  In an interview with him and the producer, they
said that the book was about a "facist utopia."  The same thing was said
by critics when the original novel came out in the 60's.  Because Verhoven
was attacking the flim from that slant, many of the details of the society
got smoothed over and ignored, in order to highlight the things he saw in
the story as "facist."  Furthermore, the first half of the film, which
represents about the first two-thirds of the book, is smothered in the
tedious love-triangle, that just about every reviwer calls "a bad episode
of 90210."  A better choice for a director of this film would have been
Terry Gilliam, or Ridley Scott (maybe too obvious).  Verhoven has too many
odd obsessions, one with horrid, horrid violence, and the other with naked
bodies (see Basic Instinct, Robocop, Showgirls, Total Recall), most of his
films are distinguished by their over the top sex or violence.  I believe
Total Recall has the dubious disinction of the most people killed in a
film, Robocop was originally an X-rated film for violence.  He's out to
shock or something, and seems unphazed at his movie ratings.  
     Starship Troopers, however, is probably going to be popular, for the
very reasons that I have disliked it, especially all the yong nubile
actors and their relationships, which play like a 90210 episode on at 2am
on Showtime.  The same factors that made a movie like Scream a hit...young 
beautiful actors and actresses, love-triangles, shower scenes...some
humour...  
     I probably should not see this film again, because I will find more
and more wrong with it, that's what happened with me and Independence Day,
the first time is was GREAT! The second time is was..oh...good, yeah...and
it was downhill from there...but I digress.
Out of the $3.50 I paid for my ticket, it was probably worth $1.75
--

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Starship Troopers (1997)
Casper Van Dien, Denise Richards, Dina Meyer, Patrick Muldoon, Neil 
Patrick Harris, Michael Ironside, Clancy Brown
Rated R,   * out of ***** stars
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott
For more reviews, go to www.nuvo-online.com and click on "film."
The rich legacy of cinema has left us with certain indelible images. The 
tinkling Christmas tree bell in "It's A Wonderful Life."  Bogie's speech 
at the airport in "Casablanca." Little Elliott's flying bicycle, 
silhouetted by the moon in "E.T." And now, "Starship Troopers" director 
Paul Verhoeven adds one more image that will live in our memories 
forever: Doogie Houser doing a Vulcan mind meld with a giant slug.
"Starship Troopers," loosely based on the Robert Heinlein novel, is the 
story of an interstellar war between humans and giant insects. In the 
hands of Verhoeven, the mammoth sci-fi battle flick is one of the most 
astonishingly bad films ever made, a monument to inept filmmaking on a 
colossal scale. To put it simply, it's a bug bomb.
In "Robocop" and "Total Recall," Verhoeven displayed a gift for creating 
an entertaining mix of violence, special effects and social satire, and 
"Starship Troopers" starts off in similar fashion, with a tongue-in-cheek 
futuristic military recruitment ad that shows promise. Things go downhill 
fast, though, as we meet our heroes, a group of Buenos Aires teens 
preparing to graduate from high school. Inexplicably, Johnny Rico, Carmen 
Ibenez, Dizzy Flores and Xander Barcalow  are played by square-jawed 
Anglo kids who look like they just stepped out of a Mountain Dew 
commercial. 
It's a veritable "Alpha Centuri 90210" as we watch the love-smitten teens 
squabble in the name of love. Michael Ironside plays their teacher, who 
waves around a cheesy fake severed arm while lecturing about civic 
responsibilities. Eventually, the kids join the military, with dreams of 
glory in their addled little minds. One of their classmates, Carl Jenkins 
("Doogie Houser's" Neil Patrick Harris,) snags a job in military 
intelligence because of his strong psychic abilities. He displays his 
gift by psychically ordering a pet ferret to crawl up his Mother's leg.
A long, dull boot camp sequence follows, enlivened only by an extended 
coed shower scene where the recruits swap snappy banter as the 
"Showgirls" director's camera roams over their buff bodies. Finally, a 
full hour into the film, the war finally starts and we meet the enemy. 
The bugs hail from Klendathu and colonize planets by hurling their spores 
into space. They attack starships by spinning around and firing deadly 
plasma blasts from their rears. Yes, incredible as it seems, the bugs 
actually kill with cosmic farts.
A phenomenally large amount of money was spent creating the computer 
animated insects and the results are mixed at best.  Sweeping distant 
shots depicting hordes of giant bugs racing to attack are both impressive 
and scary, but the close-ups are a different matter. The insects have an 
odd, artificial look, like origami creations with a mottled plastic 
coating. The attack scenes are intensely violent, as one would expect 
from Verhoeven, but the overall look is too phony to generate any real 
tension. While the action is frantic, the military strategy, wildly 
illogical even by Hollywood standards, grows tiresome quickly. Verhoeven 
tries to spice things up by throwing in more satiric news coverage, but 
the faux-jingoistic scenes of children "doing their part for the war 
effort" by squishing roaches on a sidewalk aren't enough to make up for 
the long stretches of sheer dreck. 
One can only guess what Paul Verhoeven was trying to do here. His 
customary one part satire, two parts ultra-violence formula is way out of 
whack, and most of the film just flounders. In "Showgirls" fashion, some 
scenes are almost bad enough to be good. An intergalactic kegger party, 
with Jake Busey playing "Dixie" on a green Plexiglas fiddle, has a 
certain bizarre appeal. A sex scene between two of the teens achieves a 
smarmy charm, enhanced a few minutes later when the female receives a 
fatal jab from a bug, but tells her hero that she doesn't mind dying. 
"It's okay," she gasps, "I got to have you!" And then, of course, there's 
Doogie's mind meld with a bug.
It's possible that Verhoeven was attempting to create an homage to the 
era of the original novel. Heinlein's pre-"Stranger In A Strange Land" 
books were aimed at adolescent males, and "Starship Troopers" has the 
antiseptic retro-future look of late 50s/early 60s sci-fi. The one 
cityscape shown is a Jetsons-like gleaming metropolis, with flying cars 
whizzing past an obvious matte painting. The hairstyles are retro too, 
straight from the Frankie Avalon, Annette Funicello school of fashion. 
Ultimately, Verhoeven's motives are irrelevant. He has produce a 
gargantuan film that fails as an action film or as a social satire. It 
even fails to be an entertaining bad movie. Avoid "Starship Troopers" at 
all costs. 

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
CAPSULE: Where are you tonight, Leni Rienfenstal?
STARSHIP TROOPERS is an expensive, hateful and unenjoyable piece of violent
pornography -- and bad pornography, at that. It is not good cinema, not good
storytelling, and not even stupid fun: it's so cynically, calculatedly
bone-headed that even the least demanding members of the audience I was with
were alternately bored and revulsed. It's one of the worst movies I've seen
in a long time.
Why am I calling this movie pornography? Pornography, in the abstract, is
anything which is calculated to appeal to the baser instincts. I remember
reading a review of FULL METAL JACKET which described the climact moment at
the end of the movie, where Private Joker has to shoot the downed VC sniper,
as "a near-pornographic eternity". I didn't agree with that assessment, but
I could see what was being implied: the reviewer felt as if the audience was
being incited to stand up and pump their fists and shout "DO 'er, man, DO
'er!"
That sentiment is echoed ad nauseam throughout STARSHIP TROOPERS. It's
*literally* like a giant recruitment film that has gone berserk. It tries
frantically to enlist our emotions but it winds up only being dull or
sickening.
The film takes place in our future, when Earth has come under attack by some
alien species that doesn't appear to have intelligence. To counterattack,
humankind does the single stupidest thing imaginable: instead of nuke the
planet from orbit, which they're clearly capable of, they send down grunts
with M-16 rifles. This isn't Heinlein, it's a bad WWII movie, one where all
the most obvious points of satire are ever poked and prodded in combat
scenes that are noisy, repetitive, and ultimately tiresome. (One scene has a
journalist on a battlefield, filimg soldiers being slaughtered, and ends
with groaning predictability: said cameraman gets skewered, too.)
The soldiers and their commanders are consistently idiotic. They do not
possess a germ of tactical intelligence or even common sense. They don't
even behave like soldiers in a bad *movie*, and therefore we don't care
about them. We hated the Tom Berenger character in PLATOON, but he
*mattered*, and therefore we were curious to learn about his fate. Here, we
don't even hate the bugs -- what's there to hate? Hating them would be like
cursing a hurricaine. If there's anything really hateful there, the movie
doesn't know how to give it to us.
The screenwriter (Ed Neumeier -- perhaps a better appelation would be
"screen typist") and director (the increasingly talent-impaired Paul
Verhoeven) have not found any way to make the characters or the story serve
each other. One of the subplots concerns a woman pilot who's great at
getting out of tight situations, and does it again and again and again. Once
or twice is fine. By the fifth or sixth time, it's worn out its welcome.
There's never any sense that these people are really thinking their way out
of anything, or really being tested to show their mettle.
Also, the movie is irritatingly selective with how effective the bugs are to
Earthling weaponry. If a bug has one of the humans screaming in its grasp,
then five guys can stand around it and blast away on full auto without doing
a damned thing. But if one human gets cornered, he lays waste to whole
platoons of bugs with one clip. Uh-huh.
The very worst feature of the movie is its repulsive quasi-fascist flavor. 
I say "quasi-" because while the movie uses many of the trappings of fascism
ot eroticize its action -- the gear, the uniforms, etc. -- the movie doesn't
have the nerve (or the brains) to be genuinely fascist, or intelligent about
the subject. The bumpers between scenes, which are apparently intended to
parody wartime recruitment propaganda ARE propaganda -- just so clumsy and
oafish that they wind up making the bugs look relatively innocuous in
comparison. Like the rest of the movie.
There's more, I suppose, but it's not worth it. The acting is bland, neither
arsenic nor gravy; the music disposable; the camerawork turgid. The
heartbreaking thing is that it makes INDEPENDENCE DAY look like a
masterpiece.

Author
Jamie Peck
TriStar / 2:09 / 1997 / R (violence, gore, language, gore, violence,
sex, gore, nudity, gore, violence)
Cast: Casper Van Dien; Dina Meyer; Denise Richards; Patrick Muldoon;
Jake Busey; Neil Patrick Harris; Clancy Brown; Michael Ironside; Seth
Gilliam
Driector: Paul Verhoeven 
Screenplay: Ed Neumeier 
Casting "Doogie Howser" star Neil Patrick Harris as mind-reading
military intelligence is only one of the guilty pleasures of "Starship
Troopers," a hugely entertaining, mega-budgeted sci-fi yarn directed
by Paul Verhoeven, who's making quite a recovery from his 1995
G-string epic "Showgirls." Sure, "Starship Troopers" qualifies as
cinematic junk food, but that's forgivable when the junk food is this
tasty. Everyone needs a high-calorie change-of-pace from fall's
onslaught of costume dramas and other assorted Oscar bait, and
"Troopers" does the job admirably despite its flaws.
For its first hour, "Starship Troopers" plays like a cheeky futuristic
hybrid of "Saved by the Bell" and "G.I. Jane." In the distant years
ahead, high school grad Johnny Rico (Casper Van Dien) signs up for
Federal Service along with his girlfriend Carmen (Denise Richards); he
gets accepted into the Mobile Infantry but she wants to travel to the
Fleet Academy to become a starship pilot, so the couple is broken up.
But there's temptation awaiting both of them -- Johnny's is in the
form of an old friend (Dina Meyer) also in the infantry and still
harboring a secret crush, while Carmen attracts the eye of her
flirtatious instructor (Patrick Muldoon).
Personal rivalry and sexual jealousy carry over into the final 65
minutes, when an impending alien menace begins making good on its
threatening presence and obliterates part of South America, killing
Johnny's parents and destroying his home. Our weakening, lovesick
protagonist is given new reasons to stick around the Mobile Infantry,
and is dispatched with a group of fellow fighters to the aliens' home
planet, where he will head up a ground assault to end the threat for
good. But the enemy is far smarter, more diabolical and numerous than
the good guys give them credit for, and after an initial walloping,
they must re-examine their strategy.
The exposition -- played like a futuristic soap opera -- is silly, but
aware of its own ridiculousness enough to merit more smiles than
groans. Once we get past the campy character introductions and the
numerous (but never boring) training sessions, "Starship Troopers"
really kicks into high gear. Its last half is all gruesomely violent
action -- a fury of severed limbs, decapitations, disembowelments,
brain removal, explosions and other jolt-inducers that are really
going to please the 13- and 14-year-old boys lucky enough to dodge
getting carded or caught on their way into this deservedly R-rated
show. The creature design and special effects are amazing as expected,
and their interaction with the human actors are a realistic,
imaginative high point.
It's nice to see intergalactic beasties that aren't too derivative of
the titular menace from "Alien." These monsters are appropriately
terrifying sights, especially the Arachnids, a spider-scorpion-crab
combo that's all sharp talons and even sharper legs. They attack in
packs of hundreds, and it's a funny, scary sight to see these bugs
take repeated hits and still crawl, jerk and struggle towards their
intended victims in a determined, gooey mess. It matters not that they
actually have a laughable master plan in mind (ask yourself if a
species like this seems capable of carrying out such a plot); these
sequences of insect warfare are numerous, bloody and immensely
satisfying.
The occasional dramatic moments -- one cast member's death, the final
resolution to Johnny's love triangle -- are botched, a testament to
how "Starship Troopers" fails to create any strong, outstanding
characters. These bland Ken-and-Barbie archetypes serve the story
adequately enough to keep any distractions at arm's length, but
restrain the film from achieving a higher ground a la "Star Wars,"
where even the slightest aliens had definite personality. The acting
is decent (but never spectacular); most of the performers hail from
Aaron Spelling territory -- smallish roles on "Beverly Hills 90210"
and/or "Melrose Place" -- and it occasionally shows. Van Dien, for
example, is limited but perfectly likeable. In smaller parts are the
afore-mentioned Neil Patrick Harris as Johnny's best friend and Jake
Busey (Gary's son) as Johnny's sidekick; the latter excels at playing
creeps (see "The Frighteners" or "Contact") but seems off-kilter as a
second banana.
"Starship Troopers" is based on the novel by Robert Heinlein, a sci-fi
writer who hasn't exactly seen any recent adaptation justice done to
any of his books what with 1994's howler "The Puppet Masters." But the
overall familiarity to the "Alien" trilogy -- and the promise of great
gobs of gore -- could act as a crowd-drawer. Its own possible
influence, however, might well work against it when the franchise
continuation "Alien: Resurrection" opens in a few weeks. We will know
then which film to crown as the best summer movie of the fall.
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Author
Reid Davis
        Before the screening I attended of "Starship Troopers,"
promotional people roamed the aisles, giving out comic books of the
movie.
With a few exceptions, comic books are two-dimensional, don't
develop characters, and feature action punctuated with day-glo "blams
" and "splats."
And "Starship Troopers" is one big comic book of a movie, a
b-movie deluxe, including everything but the "Coming Soon To TBS"
tagline.  And once the average moviegoer makes that connection, it
becomes a much more enjoyable ride.
What's not so good?  Acting, plot and dialogue...especially
the dialogue!
I recently read that big-budget Hollywood films are spending
much larger percentages of cash on special effects and considerably
less for big-name talent.  I suppose the thinking is that special
effects are more reliable than big-name actors as a box office draw.
Plus, special effects won't embarrass studios by political
grandstanding or having messy personal lives.
"Starship Troopers" is a case study for this kind of approach.
I mean, what else can you say for a movie that credits nine special
effects companies, but features Neil Patrick Harris (Doogie Howser,
M.D.) as its most recognizable star?
While Harris, along with veteran character actor Michael
Ironside ("Top Gun," "ER,") are the most recognizable names, the first
half of the movie is carried by a cast of unknowns.  While "unknown"
definitely does not mean "cannot act," there is reason to believe that
some of these no-names were chosen for reasons other than their acting
talents.
Take Exhibit A, Casper Van Dien.  As "Johnny Rico," the
young-man-coming-of-age whose story is central to the film, he looks
like a fresh pod grown from the Hollywood body-and-face hatchery.  His
jaw is so square, his teeth are so white and his body is so chiseled,
that the average Joe Six-pack probably will have a hard time relating
to his character, much less caring.
Exhibit B is no better.  Denise Richards ("Carmen Ibanez")
seems slightly unreal as well, having seemingly been grown in the
silicone, airbrush and plastic surgery section of the Hollywood
hatchery.  I've seen few Barbie dolls that looked better. 
While I have nothing against beauty, the performance of Van
Dien - whose range consists of an aw-shucks grin, steely determination
and a look of vague concern - leaves a lot to be desired.  Richardson,
while a better actor, still doesn't seem to connect with the material.
She seems to hover beautifully above it all, with only a wrinkled brow
of occasional worry.
Of course, one even giggles using "material" to describe a
movie like this one, which is why the second half of the movie, which
commences the war between human and bug-like alien is so enjoyable.
The first half of the film, which shows our heroes leaving the
comfortable confines of school and home and entering military service,
mostly drags.  There are occasional patches of (sometimes
unintentional) humor, but after the scene is set, the audience is
yearning to get to the action.  Unfortunately, by that point the
action is still about half an hour away. 
Once the action arrives, however, director Paul Verhoeven
("Total Recall," "Robocop") is at his best, interposing
edge-of-your-seat battle scenes with tongue-in-cheek snippets from
futuristic recruiting videos and news bulletins that owe much to 1940s
war propaganda.
The visuals, another of Verhoeven's special talents, are first
rate, summoning up a fully realized future world with seamingly
effortless ease.
And the special effects, of course, cannot be faulted.  I'll
bet most folks will see this movie only because of the jaw-dropping
preview featuring thousands of marauding alien "bugs" swarming over
the hillsides.  Heck, that's what got me in the door...
But don't expect another "Men In Black."
While "MiB" featured the same comic-book approach, it had
zippy dialogue and a plot that you had to keep from blinking in order
to get.
"Starship Troopers," on the other hand, is weighted down by
dumber than dumb dialogue:
And the plot offers nothing but cliches:  "young man finds
himself and gains the respect of others...friends bonded together by
war...man wants unattainable woman and then finds his true match right
in front of his nose..."  Unlike "MiB," nothing here takes the
moviegoer by surprise.
Is "Starship Troopers" a good movie?  If you are the kind of
person who often finds yourself watching "Movies For Guys Who Like
Movies," sure it is.
However, if you demand a bit more from your b-list "candy,"
prepare to find yourself groaning early and often.
Also, be wary of young ones begging to be taken to see this
film.  While the movie resembles a comic book, it also includes
copious amounts of blood and gore, as well as some completely
gratuitous nudity.
In fact, some of the movie's best acting takes place in a
co-ed shower scene, where men and women have to pretend that taking a
shower in the same room is no big deal.  (After all, it's the
military...and the harrassment at Aberdeen Training Grounds never
happened, right?)
So for those who must have their big-budget special effects on
a big screen, go ahead and see this.  Otherwise, wait for it at your
video store...or on TBS.

Author
Michael Turton
Starship Troopers
Reviewed by Michael A. Turton (turton@cc.fy.edu.tw)
_Starship Troopers_ proves once again that nothing debases good sci-fi faster
than contact with a Hollywood director. The merest glance at this
multimillion-dollar clunker shows that the reasons for Hollywood's inability
to do science fiction are not technical.  Rather, they lie in the
impoverished vision and formulaic storytelling that have come to dominate
filmmaking in Southern California.
Inspired by Robert Heinlein's classic adolescent sci-fi novel, _Starship
Troopers_ tells the story of a group of young men and women who volunteer to
fight the Bugs, aliens who have taken to launching meteors full of their
spores into human space to colonize human worlds.  On this absurd premise
(not Heinlein's; he had a much richer storytelling gift) is hung a
predictable storyline and buckets of expensive but unimaginative special
effects, as well as some gratuitous breasts.
There's no denying that the combat scenes are graphic, with people ripped in
half, limbs chopped off and blood everywhere, yet one cannot help but feel
that the gore is there to shock, and not out of some commitment to artistic
integrity, however hollow.  This is because the combat itself is so
unbelievable.  Although the humans have warp drive, they have no artillery. 
In fact, they appear to have forgotten a couple of thousand years of military
tactics and technology, for they have no area weapons, indirect fire weapons,
small arms larger than an automatic rifle, guided missiles, flamethrowers,
delayed action bombs or tactical air support, never mind biological and
chemical weapons.  Tactical communications are limited to a shouted voice. 
Yet during training they practice with energy weapons that are capable of
blowing off heads.  Why aren't they used in combat? Instead, the soldiers of
the future face their enemies with grenades, automatic rifles, and miniature
nuclear weapons (from which they are not shielded), as well as some
gratuitous breasts.
There are numerous other problems as well.  Ships in space in formation are
much too close and it is clear from the positions of ships in the fleet and
the controls of individual ships that the designers never learned to think in
three dimensions (contrast the level flight of the ships with the far more
realistic space combat scenes in _Babylon 5_).        All planets have blue skies
and ecologies which consist of only two species, humans and bugs, both
colonizers from elsewhere.  A meteor launched from the other side of the
galaxy zeroes in on a city on earth.  In reality, any such object would have
had to have been launched when our ancestors had not yet become Homo Sapiens.
The human political situation is vague at best.  How many colonies are there?
Where are they?  We are told only that democracy failed and the military took
over to stabilize society. There are some glimpses of the government,
particular of savage punishments, but Heinlein's vision of a society based on
individual responsibility is recast as a quasifacist police state. The
violence sadly remains true to its Hollywood roots, with guns that never jam
or need ammunition, main characters who have a superhuman ability to function
regardless of injury. and acting that would shame the homecoming play at high
school. Fortunately there is a varied collection of gratuitous breasts.
The Bugs themselves are visually interesting, but they suffer from the same
kinds of inconsistencies which plague the movie in general.  Although we are
told that they are not individuals as we are, they bicker and snarl amongst
themselves like mammalian predators jockeying for position in the pride.  The
"Brain" bug eats human brains by sucking them from the skull, presumably to
find out what we think.  How it gets any information from crushed and mangled
alien proteins is a mystery.  Perhaps it should have tried the gratuitous
breasts.
The storyline, which tracks the volunteers from high school to through
training into combat, eliminates the sentimental masculine melodrama that
makes the original novel such a favorite of young males.  It too lives in the
eternal Now.  One recruit says he joined to go career and become and officer;
later he turns down a leadership position on the grounds that he just wants
to fight; later still he shows up as an NCO.  The characters are almost
totally inhuman in their response to the death around them.  They seem to
feel neither sadness, relief nor anger.  Rico is never shown having any
serious emotional reaction to the death of his parents.  Heinlein's original
story is underpinned by a complex web of relationships among the military
officers who dominate Rico's career, but these are gone from the film, as is
his vision of an ethnically-mixed society, for everyone in _Starship
Troopers_ is either white or black (this being Hollywood, the hero is a
blue-eyed blond). The boy-has-girl, boy-loses-girl, boy-finds-girl plot that
stitches the story together is advanced by the too-convenient death of
romantic distractions, as well as some gratuitous breasts.
New faces give the movie whatever appeal it may have.   The actress playing
Carmen Ibanez has the loveliest smile to grace the big screen in ages.  And of
course  Disi twice bares a pair of fine gratuitous breasts.
Both as a movie and as an SF story, _Starship Troopers_ is an offensive
failure.  I give it 1 star out of 5.  Not worth renting, even for the
gratuitous breasts.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Paul Verhoeven
Writer: Edward Neumeier (based on the novel by Robert A. Heinlein)
Starring: Casper Van Dien, Dina Meyer, Denise Richards, Neil Patrick
Harris, Patrick Muldoon, Jake Busey, Michael Ironside, Clancy Brown,
Seth Gilliam, Marshall Bell, Rue McClanahan
Sure, "Starship Troopers" is no "Star Wars," but it has enough fun-ass
gore, cool futuristic satire, and hysterically bad 90210-esque melodrama
to keep me interested and satisfied for the full time.  I mean, sure
it's jam-packed with stupidity, gratuitous nudity, and zero
characterization, but it's a sci-fi gorefest, and a fun one at that.
As the trailers have been saying for almost a year, "Starship Troopers"
deals with a bunch of futuristic marines who go across the universe to
battle a bunch of evil, deadly, giant bugs on their rocky home planet,
armed with little but a couple detonators, and machine guns, as well as
a couple nukes, just in case.  And yes, there's some attempts at
creating memorable characters, most who are slaughtered mercilessly by
the razor-sharp legged bugs, and yeah, that fails pitifully, but the
whole bit with the bugs, which takes up most of the last half of the
film, is what we came to see, and the film knows it.
The film brings us a bunch of pretty Spelling-ites...and Neil Patrick
Harris (who's the biggest name in the no-name cast), who interact with
one another during the film.  The protagonist is Johnny Rico (Casper Van
Dien), who is dating the hot Carmen (Denise Richards), who is crazy over
him, but soon falls for the hunky Zander (Patrick Muldoon, from "Melrose
Place"), who are both going to be pilots in the army.  Of course, she
still loves Johnny, but she can never see him, even if he joins the army
to be sorta near her.  Soon Johnny finds that the chick from high school
who had a crush on him, Diz (Dina Meyer), looks more attractive than she
used to.
This all takes place in the far future, a fascist world of pure high
tech-ness, where we hear about televised executions, public beatings,
and about obtaining citizenship.  The film presents some of it in the
fashion of a Riefenstahl-esque bit of propoganda that goes on throughout
the film, showing people working hard, and glorifying the deadly
marines, even when they're being torn limb by limb by the bugs.  This
satire is one of the saving graces of the film.
For the first hour, we get the aforementioned melodrama, as well as the
whole spiel of boot camp, where the drill sergeant (Clancy Brown, who
obviosuly took notes from R. Lee Ermey about how to act like one) trains
them in horribly nasty training, sometimes even wounding them (he breaks
a guy's arm, and throws a dagger into another's hand).  These aren't
great, but they're cool to watch.
The big part which we were all waiting for comes at about the halfway
part, and is hardly disappointing.  The first time we see the bugs is
cool, and we are predictably slaughtered mercilessly by them, as it
takes about 5 guys shooting them for about a minute to take just one
down.  And yes, we use machine guns on them instead of just nuking the
shit out of them, although we do that once, only killing the ones on the
surface, since they live underground.
Oh, and I suppose you're all wondering where Mr. Doogie Howser M.D.
himself is included here?  Well, Neil plays none other than a psychic
scientist/classmate of Johnny, Carmen, and Diz, who basically becomes a
big power in the army.  Yeah, I know, it's stupid, but it's so weird
that it's campy.  Oh, and look for ex-"Golden Girl" Rue McClanahan as a
biology teacher.
There's not a lot of humanity in the characters, and even scenes where a
well-known character is killed isn't as moving as it should be.  Sure
when one of the four leads was killed, I was moved, but most people are
just sent to war just to get killed, which kind of works as satire in a
way, I suppose.
The real star of the film is the special effects, which are brilliant,
man.  Of course, this is from Paul Verhoeven, who is a genius with
special effects that look realistic ("Total Recall" won an Oscar for
them), and the ones in this look absolutely realistic.  The bugs
interact perfectly with the actors on the screen, creating a sense of
realism.  They become scarier just because they look so realistic, and
when they attack a human, it looks just as realistic.  My personal
favorite use of this is when the giant base is surrounded by a literal
sea of bugs.
The charm of "Starship Troopers" is that it's just plain fun and it
knows it.  Director Paul Verhoeven is just trying to bring an
entertaining piece of brain candy to the big screen, complete with
hundreds of little guilty pleasures.  I mean, the shower sequence where
we men and women bathing together is one of the funniest things I've
ever seen.  And the huge amount of gore (people being chomped in half,
appendages laying around everywhere, etc, etc, etc) is just awesome. 
And how he pays homages to everything from Riefenstahl's "Triumph of the
Will" to his earlier "Total Recall" is awesome (Verhoeven staple Michael
Ironside plays a one-armed general or sergeant or something, and he lost
both his arms in "Total Recall").
There's a kind of campy fun to watching all these Spelling-ites sent to
a far and away place to be slaughtered that satisfies something in
ourselves.  And even while "Starship Troopers" might be about as dumb as
Forrest Gump himself, or not even follow the novel very well (I never
read it anyway), it's still a bitching time at the movies.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Eugene Xia
One can enjoy this film if one is in the right mood.
The film gives exactly the kind of respect the original 
story deserves--a juvenile sci-fi action flick with some 
pseudo-philosophy thrown in.  Or as Scott Renshaw put it: 
"For one thing, you sense that the film-makers are aware 
of the pulp nonsense they have as source material".
Those who criticize the film for its technical and military
"plot holes" probably should observe how an 8 year old boy
play war games--they are more interested in imagining
shooting automatic rifles than pushing buttons to launch
missiles they cannot see.  Once one realizes this aspect,
one sees the frame of mind the director is in when he
made the film:
An eight year old boy keeps nagging his dad (the director)
to play space alien with him.  He was of course not very
interested, but the boy is after all his son.  So he comes
up with this brilliant idea.  At 8, the boy has a lot of
absurd but charming ideas, so he will play along but
exaggerate the absurdity.  The 8 year old will be seriously
disappointed if the dad says that all he has to do is push
a few buttons to launch a few nuke and the game is over,
so he gave him a machine gun (the reason it is a machine gun
rather than a 90's high tech ray-gun is probably a legacy
of the 50's and also due the sense of humor on the part of
the director).  In the end, the boy satisfies his innate
desire for simulated combat and the dad gets a big laugh
and the satisfaction for being so clever.  Both had a great
time.
There is a scene in the film where a soldier was decapitated
by a flying bug.  Ordinarily if this scene were set in a
serious film or anything with a darker under tone such as Alien,
I would be horrified and probably feel nauseated, but in
this comic circus like atmosphere, I bursted out into a
spontaneous laughter--the way I did when the huge guy
exploded in a French restaurant in Monty Python's Meaning
of Life (warning this scene is pretty gross too)--The
absurdity of it all.
Beyond its entertainment value, the film did manage to
convey a serious and subtle message to the adults.  This
kind of game is fun to play with the kids, but one has to
recognize it for what it is and make sure that boys grow up
to be adults.  And a warning that adults should never play
this game with other adults--look at the uniforms.
In the end, the Doogie Hauser character in his
black jacket and his boyish charm, said something like,
"This is not a game any more.  We are doing it for real now".
One can't fail to recognize the menacing and sinister
under tone of what he said.

Author
Alan L. Wendt
Just saw it yesterday.   It was obviously done by the same group that
did Robocop, and it seems to be set in about the same future, except
that they've invented web browsing since Robocop.  I got really tired of
seeing smarmy TV newscasters, TV ads, etc.   Apparently this director
thinks a story is more real viewed through a small screen.
Most points in the story were undermined by cheap jokes, such as the
"You are Here" caption pointing at Earth in the (TV) picture of the
galaxy.   How are the bugs shipping asteriods halfway across the galaxy
from their home planet to Earth?   And why, for Gods sake?
I expected some violence in Starship Troopers, but the director has 
gone out of his way to add slime and guts.  With so much of Heinlein's
original book cut out, the director added a gratuitous high-school
dissection scene so that he could show more slime, offal, and vomit.
He also added an extra scene in which Zim throws a knife through
a private's hand to make a point.
None of the training or tactics seem very realistic.  The drill
instructor Zim looks and acts like Goofy in a uniform, except of
course that he throws knives at his privates.  :) Carmen takes a
spaceship off without reading word one of a checklist, and takes
gratuitous risks with her billion-dollar ship that should have her
discharged or grounded.   Drop-ships congregate like confused cattle
above the planet, crowded together but out of formation, easy targets
with no room to manuever.  Rico is allowed an extra 10 minutes for a
roll in the hay while another outpost is being dismembered by a bug
attack.  Carmen's ship is tooling around the galaxy and has a midair
collision with an asteroid in interstellar space.  Fires burn in
vacuum.  Etc, etc.
I hope that Virginia Heinlein got a lot of money for the rights.
To summarize:  This is a combination of "An Officer and a Gentleman"
and "Zulu", except that those movies had plots, dialog, and characters
that  you cared about.  All this movie has is special effects and
chiseled cheekbones.

Author
Colin Ryono
One of my dominant thoughts upon entering the theater to see "Starship
Troopers" was what I had read from an anonymous Internet writer: "There is
enough action in this movie to make two movies, one named 'Starship,' the
other 'Troopers'."  And this is more-or-less the case--in part.  But
action does not a movie make.  Perhaps it does for the teenage generation,
but as in action movies (as in any genre), I do not need my intelligence
insulted.  One, of course, must not have high expectations upon going into
a action movie (especially one with this title), but when it breaches a
barrier of mindlessness, another part of me takes over. 
The cast consists of a generation of cocky teenagers (portrayed by
cardboard-cutout, dime-a-dozen, television-show drop-outs), each with the
depth of a single sheet of paper.  One does indeed get the feeling of a
"90210 Meets Aliens" several times throughout the picture; the cast is
saturated with 90210 and Melrose Place denizens.  
hese kids are sent off to fight a war in distant planets against "bugs,"
huge armored orgami-like creatures, seemingly unintelligent to the Earth.
These kids want to fight, they are enticed to fight by somewhat amusing
propoganda blurbs on television.  This latter part might be viewed as some
sort of satire --but satirizing what and to what purpose?  Mindless
emotionless war-machine ethic?  It doesn't deserve that much credit.  And
certainly not to advance the plot, which I might add, is mostly
non-existant.
One saving grace of this movie are the action scenes that are literally
mind-blowing.  The intense battles between the aliens and the troopers had
me pinned back in my seat.  Decapitations are rampant, gore litters the
screen, and if it's patented action-movie rhetoric like "C'mon maggots!
You wanna live forever?!" that you're needing, this movie has plenty of
it.  There are some degrees of originality as well.  The aliens are all
claws as far as I could see, and I liked what I saw.   Compliments to the
Special Effects crew and art direction of this movie as well; it is hard
to go wrong with futuristic sci-fi effects given today's tech
advancements, but there are some clever visuals.  In fact, the visual
effects supervisor was Phil Tippet, who started his career on a little
film called "Star Wars."  
A favorite of director Paul Verhoven ("Total Recall," "Robocop"), Michael
Ironside is decent enough in tough-as-nails Patton-esque leader role and
his sharp barks of dialogue invigorate the dull moments.  Same goes for
Clancy Brown (the Head Guard from "Shawshank Redemption") as the Drill
Sargeant from Hell.  
But at the same time, some of their "borrowing" is blatant and it seems
that they would know better and steer their action to new, more unique
levels.  At one point, Johnny Rico (Casper Van Dien) jumps on a back of a
particularly large bug, tears open its flesh with his gun, throws a
nuclear grenade in, and leaps off to safety.  And did anyone else in the
audience besides me (while half hooted and applauded) that what they just
saw was virtually Luke's triumph over the AT-AT on Hoth in "Empire Strikes
Back?" 
The "Starship" part of the movie is at times painful to watch, most
dominantly because it involves only three characters and each is more
inept than the other.  Ditzy pilot Carmen Ibanez (Denise Richards) seems
that she would be better suited back at Melrose Place; she is awkwardly
out-of-place and her acting ability is simply limited to: happy, sad,
surprised.  Neil Patrick Harris (Doggie Howser himself) is thankfully
limited to a few short scenes, but he wins the Golden Raspberry for Most
Unintentionally Hilarious Dialogue.  
The dialogue suffers from cliche way-too-often--as in constantly.  A
futuristic science fiction movie should have engaging dialogue--"Starship
Troopers" should have either hammed their character up a lot more or tried
harder to make the in-between drama geniunely emotional.  To compare, a
mindless, comic book movie like "Con Air" this summer had clever (often
witty) dialogue to take ones mind off its overall dumbness.  There is no
such relief in this movie.  
It is neither funny and the scenes where they do (somehow) seem to be
striving for pure emotional drama don't work at all.  It's not all
cornball either; I could have sworn that at times they actually wanted us
to care some for the characters.  This movie contains the most poorly
constructed love story sidebar I've ever seen on the big screen and I am
dying to tell you what one of the character says upon their death, but I
don't want to spoil the laugh for you.  It was written by Edward Neumeier,
who is (I stress) unbelievably the same person who wrote the very
well-done original "Robocop."  
It is true that the purpose of action movies is to entertain and little
else.  Yet, there are multitudes of sci-fi and action films that can
entertain with a spark of intelligence on the side.  I found myself
uncomfortably shifting in my seat whenever the action scenes ended and the
mind-numbing dialogue began again.  "Starship Troopers" has action in
plenty, and may I emphasize that it's good at it...what it doesn't have is
any intelligent dialogue or worthwhile lead characters in between these
rampaging action segments.  If you are looking for an science fiction epic
or even for that crucial intelligent side, my best advice is to look
elsewhere.  

Author
Martijn van Turnhout
Iedereen maakt wel eens een fout. Na goede films zoals "Robocop",
"Total Recall" en "Basic Instinct", ging Paul Verhoeven de mist in met
"Showgirls". Verhoeven liet het hier niet bij zitten en begon met
"Starship Troopers". Sommigen dachten dat deze film na het floppen van
"Showgirls" ook gedoemd was te mislukken. Niet dus, want Verhoeven is
met deze SF-film weer helemaal terug.
In de toekomst wordt het heelal bedreigd door gigantische bugs,
gevaarlijke insecten die hun vrije tijd doorbrengen met het doden van
andere wezens. Zij planten zich voort door middel van sporen en
gebruiken asteroďden om zich te verspreiden in het heelal.
Talloze soldaten worden gebruikt in de strijd tegen deze bugs, zelfs
scholieren die net hun studie voltooid hebben. Een van die scholieren
is Johnny Rico, gespeeld door Casper van Dien. De enige echte reden
waarom Rico het leger in wil, is om indruk te maken op z'n vriendin
Carmen, gespeeld door (de bloedmooie) Denise Richards. Carmen is
gevleid, maar wordt langzamerhand toch verliefd op iemand anders.
"Starship Troopers" doet ontzettend veel aan een soap denken, met name
de hoofdrolspelers lijken zo weggeplukt uit 'Melrose Place'. Paul
Verhoeven heeft de film met een grote knipoog gemaakt, wat vooral te
zien is aan de geestige nieuwsberichten die de film onderbreken. Ook
de gevechtscčnes moet je niet serieus nemen, want als je dacht dat
"Robocop" gewelddadig was, think again. In "Starship Troopers" worden
mensen in tweeën gehakt, doorboord, verbrand en bij een paar worden
zelfs de hersenen uitgezogen. Kortom, plezier voor het hele gezin.
Niks gecompliceerd dus, maar gewoon een vermakelijke film. Zo kun je
"Starship Troopers" het beste beschrijven.
E-mail us at: mailto:janvanturnhout@pi.net
'Filmpje!' is located at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/8429/
where you can also subscribe to my mailing-list!

Author
Bill Chambers
starring Casper Van Dien, Dina Meyer, Michael Ironside, Denise
Richards
screenplay by Edward Neumeier, based on Robert A. Heinlein's novel
directed by Paul Verhoeven
(If you like this review, and you must have more, visit
FILM FREAK CENTRAL
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Set/7504
It's getting better.)
Guilt. Guilt is something I felt while watching Basic Instinct for the
ninth time; the penultimate T & A thriller, Basic Instinct made my
last few teenage years worth living. But I know so well that it's a
terrible film, made by a terrible director incapable of feeling guilt.
Verhoeven went on to make the even more offensive Showgirls and, on
November seventh, 1997, unleashed Starship Troopers to innocent
moviegoers like me, who cannot control the urge to see giant bug
movies.
The pic begins with the most unintentional laugh of the year. A
simple, white on black title card reads "Starship Troopers"-my friends
and I speculated that the night before the prints were shipped,
Verhoeven realized he forgot the credits. Is this how a hundred
million dollar movie should open?
Were the rest of the film that subdued... Starship Troopers is about a
group of white, blond-haired himbos and bimbos who all have Spanish
last names. They graduate high school, join the military, and then,
rather curiously, decide to travel to an alien planet and destroy all
lifeforms on that planet. The story is so incomprehensible, and told
so bombastically, it's akin to 129 minutes of someone screaming
punishments at you in a foreign tongue. (Aside, club lovers will be
happy to know that dance music hasn't changed in the future.)
One plus: Starship Troopers contains some very funny sequences,
specifically the newsreels of the future. Hysterically funny,
actually. But the cynicism of these reports left me curious as to
whether Verhoeven felt pessimistic about the story in between. The
storytelling lacks focus, to say the least.
The politics of the film are scary. The actions of the major female
characters are dictated by their out-of-control libidos. There's even
a creepy sex scene: the lovely Dina Meyer makes out, nude, with the
sickening Van Dien while half her face is covered by her opaque
sweater, just the way he seems to like it. I use the term sickening
because Van Dien is the least appealing actor I've encountered in a
big budget picture; all chiseled features and machismo, he even barks
a eulogy at a funeral like military orders. Of course, Verhoeven's
probably the one to blame, and perhaps I'm jealous because I'm so
disgusting.
At any rate, a movie called Starship Troopers shouldn't be about sex.
Exactly ten years ago, Verhoeven made Robocop, which was about nothing
but skillfully made and oddly moving. And R-rated, despite its goofy
premise. Maybe it's asking too much for Verhoeven to make a PG-movie,
then-he's a master of insipid violence. However, ten year old boys
would adore Starship Troopers if they could see it.

Author
Choo Eng Aun, Jack
STARSHIP TROOPERS is a US$100++ million action film. I can't say if
Hollywood is wasting money on such films because at the end of the day, the
business part of film-making rules in Hollywood. The trailers have probably
given you the idea that this film is a special-effects laden piece of work
and in this department, it does not disappoint at all. Perhaps if we look
into the direction of Paul Verhoeven, we can understand why STARSHIP
TROOPERS is what it is. He gave us the violent ROBOCOP (his US film debut),
then onto the sexual-thriller BASIC INSTINCT, the clever TOTAL RECALL and
most recently, his infamous work on the violently illicit SHOWGIRLS.
Violence is a recurring thing in all his films, not action and in STARSHIP
TROOPERS, he has shown his love for mayhem yet again, this time with a lot
of money. 
I have not read the Robert Heinlein book in which it is supposed to be
based on but from what I hear over the internet, fans of the book are
running amok, burning down theatres showing the film. Of course I was
joking but you get the idea. Verhoeven has interlaced STARSHIP TROOPERS
with media inspired propaganda advertisements of the military in conveying
this film. This is perhaps the more interesting feature of the movie and
they are almost always very funny. Audiences who feel like they are
watching bits and pieces of SWEET VALLEY HIGH and BEVERLY HILLS 90210 are
advised not to worry, it has been obviously intended but intention does not
necessarily coincide with preferences, thus the feeling of being cheated
out of the $7 that you paid. The actors and actresses were actually from
the above mentioned shows. The story has a group of teenagers living in an
almost sterile, militarized society and inspired to join the military.
Johnny Rico enlists himself in the military in his quest to win Carmen's
love, who incidentally is fanatical whn it comes to flying starships. Rico
ends up with a ground-based grunt squad while Carmen gets to pursue her
dreams of commanding a starship. 
When the city of Buenos Aires was devastated by an asteroid sent from the
Klendathu system, a system infested with primal bugs the size of elephants,
Earth unites and sends their brave your men and women to rid our planet
from this threat. The bugs are not as primitive as we may expect, they have
special bugs for special purposes. We have the standard grunt-bug which
goes around stabbing people, the giant-cannon-bug which fires plasma blasts
from its abdomen at starships hovering above and of course the flying-bug,
their version of our fighter planes. The CGI effects are amazing, not so
because they are anything new but rather the sheer numbers and fluidity in
movements when they swarm across the landscape of Klendathu. Verhoeven's
conveyance of violence is at-your-face level. He does not use hints of
terror or gore, he shows them in full glory, in widescreen. Singapore
audiences may not be able to `enjoy' fully the action because of censors
here and there but to give you an idea of what to expect; heads fly off,
bodies dismember and brains are sucked. 
Many people I know hated the film. I can't say I loved it myself but I did
like it for its satirical view of the future and also of course, the CG
effects. Plot and scriptwise, STARSHIP TROOPERS is no better than any
normal B-grade film. Verhoeven's direction was such that the movie did not
try too hard at all; the parameters for the film have been more or less
laid out in the beginning and audiences should be able to tell whether they
are gonna hate it or love it right from then on. It is more of an
alternative-mainstream movie, very much like MARS ATTACKS!, released a year
ago.
Bottom line: watch at your own risk, do not bring children, not so much
because of its violence but more of how it is potrayed (I'd prefer the
world `glorified' actually). Go for the special effects and action. And if
you can actually tell yourself that you can enjoy a cheesily written and
scripted action film, by all means, it should do you some good.

Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: Casper Van Dien, Dina Meyer, Denise Richards, Jake Busey, 
      Neil Patrick Harris, Clancy Brown, Michael Ironside, Seth Gilliam, 
      Patrick Muldoon, Marshall Bell
Director: Paul Verhoeven
Producers: Alan Marshall and Jon Davison 
Screenplay: Ed Neumeir based on the novel by Robert A. Heinlein 
Cinematography: Jost Vacano
Music: Basil Poledouris
U.S. Distributor: TriStar Pictures
     Whenever a motion picture tackles a literary classic of any genre, 
fans of the written work hold their collective breaths, hoping for the 
best, but dreading the worst.  On rare occasions, something like THE 
GODFATHER emerges -- a movie that not only fulfills the promise of the 
book, but improves upon it.  Unfortunately, most of the time, we're 
saddled with atrocities like BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA or LEO TOLSTOY'S ANNA 
KARENINA.  And, while it's unfair to lump science fiction writer Robert 
Heinlein into the same category as Tolstoy, the author is a recognized 
great in his chosen genre, and 1959's STARSHIP TROOPERS represents one 
of his best-known novels.  So what about the film?  Those anticipating a 
rigorous adaptation will be dismayed.  On the other hand, anyone in the 
mood for a "popcorn movie" experience will find that STARSHIP TROOPERS 
fills the role handsomely.
     Probably the best way to approach STARSHIP TROOPERS is to divorce 
it from its intelligent and gripping pedigree.  Many of the most 
intellectually stimulating aspects of the book have been stripped away, 
and those that remain are only shadows of their former selves.  (It's 
still a lot smarter than INDEPENDENCE DAY, however.)  Viewers offended 
by the "watering down" of themes in this summer's superlative motion 
picture version of CONTACT will be horrified by what has happened here.  
Nevertheless, taken on its own terms, the movie entity STARSHIP TROOPERS 
offers an enjoyable two hours.  At its best, the film recaptures the 
kind of taut, visceral thrills offered by James Cameron's ALIENS.  At 
its worst, it replicates the feel of a futuristic episode of TV's 
BEVERLY HILLS 90210.  
     STARSHIP TROOPERS represents director Paul Verhoeven's comeback 
attempt after the disastrously-received NC-17 cult favorite, SHOWGIRLS.  
This time around, Verhoeven returns to the genre that has been most kind 
to him.  STARSHIP TROOPERS is his third science fiction endeavor, 
following in the footsteps of ROBOCOP and TOTAL RECALL.  And, as was 
true for both of those films, Verhoeven applies his own unique style to 
the material.  Much of STARSHIP TROOPERS is presented tongue-in-cheek, 
and the level of violence and gore (bodies being ripped limb-from-limb 
and so forth) is so extreme that viewers will quickly become 
desensitized to it.
     The story begins sometime in the future on Earth, where society has 
evolved into what producer Jon Davison calls a "fascist utopia."  It's 
there, in the city of Buenos Aires, that we meet STARSHIP TROOPERS' 
protagonist, Johnny Rico, played by relative newcomer Casper Van Dien.  
Rico, along with classmates Carmen Ibanez (Denise Richards), Carl 
Jenkins (Neil Patrick Harris, TV's Doogie Howser), and Dizzy Flores 
(Dina Meyer, from DRAGONHEART), is preparing for the future as high 
school graduation approaches.  All four friends are considering joining 
the Federal Service -- the futuristic equivalent of today's military.  
Carmen wants to be a pilot, Carl wants to enter the intelligence ranks, 
and Rico and Dizzy are headed for the infantry.  To add a little spice 
to their interaction, a romantic triangle has developed between Rico, 
Carmen, and Dizzy.
     While the early sequences of STARSHIP TROOPERS can seem like a 
prime time soap opera, complete with cheesy dialogue and unconvincing 
character development, it's clear that Verhoeven knows what he's doing.  
None of this is played completely straight; at times, STARSHIP TROOPERS' 
first half-hour treads a line between overblown melodrama and parody.  
Plus, there are the ROBOCOP-like propaganda "news breaks" that are used 
to provide expository material and advance the narrative.  Although none 
of the characters are fleshed out much beyond the comic book level, we 
nevertheless find our sympathies aligning with them.  The largely no-
name cast is not heavy on dramatic acting ability, but everyone is 
appealing and enthusiastic.  The stars of STARSHIP TROOPERS, especially 
Van Dien and Dina Meyer, manage to maintain a certain level of human 
interest in a film that eventually becomes special effects-driven.  
     Following the high school portion of the film, the setting shifts 
to the infantry military school where Rico and Dizzy suffer through 
basic training under the tutelage of a hard-nosed instructor (Clancy 
Brown).  We've seen this stuff many times before, most recently in G.I. 
JANE.  The most memorable sequence of this segment is a co-ed shower 
scene designed to remind us that Verhoeven has no compunction about 
displaying the naked human body, even in a science fiction epic.
     Eventually, we get to the action.  Humanity is at war with a race 
of lethal bugs who hail from the planet Klandathu, located halfway 
across the galaxy.  They nuke an Earth city and mankind retaliates by 
launching an invasion of their homeworld.  Rico and Dizzy are members of 
the invading army, and Carmen pilots the ship taking them there, but the 
campaign turns into a debacle.  The death toll is phenomenal and the 
enemy scores a clear victory.  The war, however, is just beginning.
     If viewers are going to gripe about any aspect of STARSHIP 
TROOPERS, their complaints will be registered against the first half of 
the film, not the second.  Once the war starts, there's hardly any time 
for relaxation.  Verhoeven orchestrates the battles between CGI aliens 
and human actors with consummate skill, creating extended sequences that 
crackle with tension and excitement.  STARSHIP TROOPERS is essentially 
an old-fashioned war movie in a science fiction setting, and the film 
makers adhere to many of the conceits of that genre.  The humans are 
good and the bugs are bad, and there's little room for sentimentality 
amidst all the machismo.  John Wayne would have felt very much at home.
     Technically, STARSHIP TROOPERS is a mixed bag.  Some of the scenes, 
such as an endless wave of spider-like aliens swarming across a rocky 
desertscape or a crippled spaceship breaking in half, involve impressive 
displays of motion picture magic.  On other occasions, however, the 
effects work looks fake.  Perhaps we've gotten to the point where we 
expect such precision and perfection from special effects that anything 
less is immediately noticeable.
     In the final analysis, STARSHIP TROOPERS is flawed but fun, and, if 
marketed correctly, will likely make a healthy profit (although it will 
be interesting to see how the "R" rating affects its ultimate box-office 
performance).  And, while the outline of Heinlein's story and many of 
the characters remain intact, only echoes of the rich and controversial 
political subtext have survived.  If you want content, read the book.  
If you want a skillfully-directed, fast-paced ride through space and 
into war, see the movie.  In a year when so many blockbusters have 
disappointed, STARSHIP TROOPERS ranks as one of the better examples of 
lightweight, big budget entertainment.
Now with more than 1300 reviews...
The ReelViews web site: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"For me, the cinema is not a slice of life, but a piece of cake."

Author
David Sunga
Starring: Casper Van Dien, Denise Richards, Dina Meyer, Patrick Muldoon,
and Michael Ironside
Ingredients: 
Hero named Johnny, gun battles against giant mantises in space
Synopsis: 
If you've ever seen old World War II propaganda films - - where
late-breaking war news is highlighted by photos of spinning news clips
while a narrator with a high pitched voice barks exciting battle news -
- then you'll recognize the same cinematic style in 全tarship Troopers.'
The only difference is that in 全tarship Troopers' a story emerges
between the war narration. In the story a high school jock named Johnny
(Casper Van Dien) and his cute girlfriend Carmen (Denise Richards)
graduate and join the military. Johnny only joins to be near Carmen, but
when she runs off to become a space pilot, and he remains a mere
infantryman, they separate. Eventually Johnny gets his chance to save
Carmen when her spaceship crashes on a planet that his platoon is doing
a mission on. Meanwhile Johnny's buddies in the platoon capture the
giant brain bug responsible for helping oversized mantis creatures wage
war against mankind. 
Opinion:
Lots of bullets. I found 全tarship Troopers' kind of boring because
there was no suspense or emotional investment. I suspect director Paul
Verhoeven (Best known for 然obocop') may have intended the movie to be a
half campy tribute to old serials or war propaganda. 

Author
Ulrich Schreglmann
I know that Greek guy who is able to make the most absurd humorous
remarks while keeping a completely straight face.  Occasionally that
leaves you wonder if he just meant that last statement or whether he's
just pulling your leg again.  I, too, appear to have that ability with
a few people.  Some time ago we had an environmentaly conscious guest
in our house, and I could drive her up the wall with the most
outrageous anti-environmentalist opinions.  It took her quite a while
until she finally realized provocation was exactly what I was aiming
at, and nothing else.
What does that have to do with Starship Troopers?
I've seen the movie (twice by now) and enjoyed it immensely.  I'm
going to watch it a couple of times more.  Afterwards I read the
critiques, accusing it of bad taste, of cliche characters, of naive
soap opera schtick, of totally implausible science and action, of
fascist, Nazi subtext, and I couldn't believe it!
THE MOVIE IS A JOKE!  A JOKE!  A SATIRE!  It is so from the title
credits through the end credits.  And it's not involuntary humor.
That movie was made with the sole intent of parodying the fascist,
militarist vision of the future in Heinlein's novel, Starship
Troopers.  And display an amazing barrage of mindless F/X in the
bargain.
The depiction of the civilian life is, as many have pointed out yet,
reminiscent of Melrose Place.  The propaganda movie sequences you see
from time to time remind one of WWII propaganda, part German, part
American.  The barren alien planetscapes look like they're straight
out of Calvin's "Spaceman Spiff, Interplanetary Explorer
Extraordinaire" fantasies, and just like them they're populated solely
by hostile, alien, bug-eyed monsters.  The news coverage at the
beginning of the invasion of Klendathu (even that silly name would
have made me rest my case--if it weren't an invention of Heinlein's)
is, of course, "Gulf War, sponsored by CNN" all over.  When people get
gored and dismembered you can't help but have the duel between Arthur
and the Black Knight in Monty Python's Quest for the Holy Grail spring
to mind.
A few critics asked how you were supposed to care about such cheesily
constructed characters.  Answer: You don't.  You're not supposed to,
for crying out loud.
Someone mentioned that with the action set in Buenos Aires and even
called B.A.  and all the characters rather WASPish despite their
Spanish last names it all was more than a little reminiscent of the
L.A. of Beverly Hills 90210.  Why, you don't say!  Didn't it occur to
you that that might have been the point?
When the hero's cute love interest flies a shuttle to the ship she's
supposed to pilot she does so in a way that I'm guessing little girls
playing dolls imagine Barbie to go on a joyride--probably breaking
every law in the book, stretching design specifications to the limit,
but it's all right, because she's a "natural pilot," good at
everything.  Nothing could possibly go wrong with her at the helm.
Just a wild guess, but I think it's really no coincidence the
character actually looks like a lifesize Barbie doll.
When the three main characters vow to stay friends, and the smart guy
mentions it's highly unlikely they'll see each other again, you just
know they'll be united by the end.  When the soldier carrying the
radio equipment is caught by a giant bug and the squad leader shoots
him saying "I expect anybody to do the same for me!" you know someone
is going to have to do it for him soon.  You also know that someone is
going to have a moment of hesitation, needing encouragement from the
one about to die.  It's all war movie cliche so old it has a beard to
trip over.  And it all belongs in there.
When Carl Jenkins finally struts in wearing an SS uniform and talks
about the survival of the species, "us vs. them," that should have
been the last straw of realization.  (Hint: replace "species" with
"race.")
Accusing that movie of cheesiness and implausibility is like accusing
The Naked Gun and Airplane of the same deficiencies.  I don't get it.
If someone's managed to switch off their disbelief in Mars Attacks and
Men in Black and to just laugh, what kept them from doing the same
here?  The fact it didn't say "surreal comedy" in the trailer?
Actually that is a problem.  The hype appears to be targeted at the
wrong audience.  When I told a saleswoman at the bookstore I
patronize, who hadn't seen the movie yet, about its deliberate
absurdity, she replied you couldn't possibly tell that from the
advertising.
It takes about 10 minutes into the flick to fully recognize it for
what it is, but unlike with e.g. Men in Black you don't know what to
expect BEFORE the lights go down, unless someone has told you.  Many
weren't told, methinks, and they appeared to be less capable adapting.
A lot of the audience who thought it sucked were probably among the
target group who love Star Wars but wouldn't understand Spaceballs.
Or my Greek friend.  Or me.
Go and watch this movie.  It's cool beyond measure.  However, enjoy it
the way you enjoyed Men in Black (Uniform), not Star Wars or Alien.

Author
Thor Thomas aka Kerr Avon
     *Starship Troopers* 1997 TriStar, Rated R.
     Directed by Paul Verhoeven,
     starring Casper Van Dien, Dina Meyer, Denise Richards,
     Neil Patrick Harris, Clancy Brown, Michael Ironside.
     Written by Edward Neumeier, based on the novel by
     Robert A. Heinlein.
          The movie _Starship Troopers_ is full of sound and fury and
     blood and testosterone.  A tongue-in-cheek deconstruction of
     Robert A. Heinlein's novel and war movies as fascist propaganda.
          So, what's in it?  Macho women with guns!  Macho men with
     guns!  Phallic spaceships! Guns that shoot 23-skidillion bullets
     before reloading!  Nuclear grenades!  Decapitations! 
     Mutilations!  Defenestrations!  Whipping!  And bugs!  Bugs!! 
     Bugs!!!
          It's been a while since I have read the book, but as I
     recall, it was not much more than a series of battle vignettes
     framed by flashbacks to the main character's high-school civics
     class.  Inspired in part by Heinlein's experiences during WWII,
     it is a platform for Heinlein to preach and philosophize about
     how the military is necessary for the survival of civilians,
     though as it is an allegory, it does perhaps get taken a bit far.
     The military rules society, and anyone who is not a member does
     not have citizen's rights.  True, we have to be "not as nice"
     during war, we had to become a more militaristic society in order
     to beat the Nazis (check out posters of that era), and that was
     one of the points of the novel.  The Bugs are an enemy with whom
     we cannot have peace (because we have nothing in common but a
     need for the same planets), only victory or defeat.  Hence, a war
     that goes on pretty much forever as the two sides are fairly
     evenly matched.  In this sort of scenario, the society Heinlein
     presents is perhaps justified, but it is a nasty world I could
     not like very much while reading the book, and the filmmakers
     evidently had similar feelings.  Personally, I never felt the
     book was one of Heinlein's stronger works; for a better coming-
     of-age story in a military setting, I would recommend his _Space
     Cadets_ much more highly.
          In the book version of _Starship Troopers_, the Mobile
     Infantry does its fighting in power battlesuits that inspired the
     whole "Japanime" mech genre.  One of the cooler parts of the
     book, and you might think something they would like to do
     onscreen, now that they have the computer graphics technology to
     do it; but no, these are just soldiers lugging around big guns
     and nuke-launchers.  Perhaps someone figured they wouldn't need
     actors anymore if they did the CGI powersuits.
          The crypto-fascist society of Starship Troopers takes a back
     seat to the action, but between acts we do get treated to spoofs
     of interactive government propaganda.  In the book, the Bug War
     had been going on for some time, which explained the militaristic
     society, but in the movie the war starts during the story, and
     the junta is already well-established, which is slightly more
     disturbing.  Many of the uniforms and insignia have a definite
     "Nazi" look about them.  I'm not sure Heinlein would have
     approved of the interpretation,  but it's definitely an element
     of his story, whether he meant it precisely that way or not. 
     Another difference: in the movie, the military is fully
     integrated, while in the book the infantry was all-male and only
     women flew the ships.
          The philosophy is still there, though in smaller proportions
     than the novel (which is a good thing, we wouldn't want to fall
     asleep in the theater, would we?), and the brutality is not as
     sugar-coated.  Director Paul Verhoeven seems to be exposing some
     of the Heinlein's nastier subtext.
          Verhoeven is also a director who loves to depict death and
     blood, and this is not a movie for the squeamish.  Nothing
     perhaps as blatant and gratuitous as the transit-station shoot-
     out in his movie _Total Recall_, but in addition to battlefield
     casualties shown in full view, we also have violence off the
     battlefield, including a broken arm, a knife through a hand,
     someone cut in half by a pressure door, and a death during a
     training exercise.  Ironically, the only violence censored is one
     scene of a cow being slaughtered and one of cruelty to an alien.
          Despite the satiric element, the movie comes across as
     fairly mindless once all is said and done, mainly due to the
     testosterone-poisoned cornball plot and stock characters lifted
     from old WWII movies.  But it is fun in the mode of _Independence
     Day_ - cheer the humans squashing those nasty alien bugs.  And
     such pretty bugs, too: the computer graphics really turned out
     well!  See it for the special effects and the bugs, or for the
     part of the novel that is still there, rather than the
     intellectual content or a retelling of the book, and be warned of
     the gore.
          DISCLAIMER:  It has been a while since I read _Starship
     Troopers_ (I considered re-reading it before seeing the movie,
     but decided not to), so any misrepresentations of Heinlein's text
     are my fault entirely.
     Review copyright 1997 by Thor Thomas,
     permission to distribute freely in complete form with copyright
     notice.

Author
Homer Yen
If you've ever seen any of Director Paul Verhoeven's other films such
as Total Recall, Basic Instinct or Showgirls, there is one common
thread that ties all of his work together.  That element can be
described as 'excess'.  True to his reputation, he is equally
relentless in his excessiveness here.  There is excessive violence,
there is excessive body counts, and there is excessive battling.  In
fact, it is my belief that Verhoeven has made it his personal crusade
to release movies that are just short of receiving an NC-17 rating.
Early on, you can sense that this will be a brutally disgusting movie.
For example, two of the main characters, Rico and Carmen, are in
biology class studying a 'bug' which is about the size of a small
refrigerator.  As they dissect, the students pull out the innards,
digging through the slime and ooze that protect the organs.  Carmen
barfs, and you might also too unless you've eaten way in advance.
Here at this educational institution, we also meet Diz, a feisty girl,
who has a crush on Rico and another friend Carl, who is extremely
intelligent.  One of the proudest things that these young adults can
do is to join the Federation, which is Earth's futuristic
intergalactic army.  Service guarantees citizenship, a highly sought
after social status.  After taking their tests, each goes their own
separate ways.  Diz and Rico wind up in the infantry.  Carmen becomes
a pilot, while Carl becomes a part of the military intelligence.
However, soon after, their separate lives begin to converge once again
as war breaks out with a bug-like species half way across the galaxy,
and it is up to these four and an array of other characters to take
part in the cosmic battle of their lives.  
Yet, while war and citizenship seemed incredibly important to the
characters on screen, the movie failed to involve me in their struggle
and their consternation towards their enemy.  And I believe that the
problem with this movie is two-fold.  First, our connection and
interest with the characters are mild at best.  As we watch the four
advance in skill and rank, I never, for one instant, really felt their
struggle or pain or jubilation.  Mainly, the writer decided that what
was more interesting was not how they coped with war, lost comrades,
or their overnight transformation from ordinary civilians to ruthless
fighters.  Here's an example.  The bugs are quickly advancing, and the
troop seems hopelessly outnumbered.  The Sergeant yells to Rico,
"You're my Corporal until you die or I find someone better!"  Instead,
our interest is tied to the love triangles and the subsequent
relationships that sprouted as a matter of consequence.  I felt that I
was watching a hybrid of Melrose Place and Deep Space 9.
The second factor was it's sheer excessiveness, which went beyond
satire and bordered on the absurd.  For example, to kill one bug, it
takes 4 soldiers and literally 2,000 rounds of ammo.  Human casualties
are in the hundreds of thousands.  But here's the really absurd thing.
You make your way to a fort that was decimated by the enemy.  Limbs
lie here and there, heads are decapitated, bodies are gored.  Everyone
has died a horrible death.  You know that the bugs are close by
waiting to kill you.  Do you leave immediately?  OR...do you set up
camp?  I'll let you decide.
Of course, this is a film about all-out war, so its boundaries are
somewhat confined.  The best thing about this film is the special
effects, which are spectacular, especially the scenes involving
Earth's space fleet being fired upon by plasma cannonballs (when you
learn the source of the cannonballs, you'll slap your palm to your
forehead and murmur how absurd that was too).  The 'bugs' are also
handsomely detailed.  If the story was only half as good as the
special effects, then they might have something more interesting than
a stalwart band of fighters that just shoot-shoot-shoot and
kill-kill-kill.  
Unfortunately, in his quest to take the 'R' rating to it's limits, he
forgets that it isn't just shock value or incredible effects that we
look for.  Bereft of pathos, the film ultimately becomes as
interesting as the enemy bugs that the Federation must battle.  It's
full speed ahead without thinking about what comes next, except
possibly knowing that it will be something excessively absurd.

Author
Tim Jandt
Starship Troopers is a bad movie.  I mean, a really, really, bad movie.  Not
only does it cross the line of bad taste when it comes to blood, gore and
body parts shown on the screen, it blissfully jumps over that line,
apparently unaware that the movie trailers appeal to an audience of five to
fifteen year olds (of which I saw many in the theatre).  Looking past the
appalling sight of overdone violence, we are left with a movie with a thin
plot at best, no strong lead characters, a blatant disregard for physics,
and a very obvious Naziesque theme.  That being said, onto the review:
The movie starts with a propaganda message from the Federation (who's logo
bears a *STRONG* resemblance to a Nazi German Eagle), urging the populace to
go off and fight the bugs, who are attempting to destroy earth.  The film
shows large rallies with young children in attendance, pledging allegiance
to the federation (again, sound familiar?).  As the movie progresses, we are
shown terror tactic training, as a drill sargeant very graphically compound
fractures one recruits arm, and throws a knife through another's hand.
Eventually, the recruits embark on a journey to a location two thirds of the
way across the Milky Way galaxy, to fight the bugs on their home planet.  As
our faster than light travelling "heroes" arrive on planet, they drop onto
the planet, and burst our of their craft brandishing... "What?" you say,
"Laser Beam weapons?  Sonic Weapons?  Phasers?  Photon Cannons?".  Nope,
they hop out brandishing good old 1997 machine guns, pump action rifles, and
tactical nuclear weapons!  I guess a lot of physics money R&D went into
travel and not weaponry.  As the assault begins, our group of troopers are
seen walking in a straight line through a box canyon.  Two members of the
group notice rocks slipping and falling above them, and one even sees a
streak fly by, but disregards it as nothing.  This of course, leads to more
massive carnage, blood shed, and graphic depictions of limbs and heads being
ripped and severed from their bodies.  Again, I see that military tactics in
the future must have evolved at about the same pace as their weapons!  In
the end, we see Neil Patrick "Doogie Howser" Harris burst onto the scene in
what could accurately be described as a Nazi SS trenchcoat, hat, and gloves.
He does a vulcan mind meld on the giant slug, and then proclaims that the
bugs are scared!  This sets the troopers into a frenzy, as they are now one
step closer to completing their goal, total genocide of a species (again,
sound familiar??).
I have tried very hard not to step on and spoil the plot with this review,
but given  it's non-existence, I may have anyway.  I could go on for pages
ripping this movie apart, but don't want to bore you too badly.
In short, I felt as if I were subjected to a mix between a pro-Nazi war film
with bugs substituted for allies, a drivers education accident scene film,
and a complete blank screen (the plot, of course).  I wouldn't recommend
this movie to anyone, anywhere, under any circumstance.
copyright (c) 1997  Tim Jandt  

Author
David N. Butterworth
As a faithful screen version of "Starship Troopers," Robert Heinlein's
classic 1959 science fiction novel, Paul Verhoeven's latest film might find
more than a few detractors.  But as a brainless bubblegum movie, it's an
exhilarating adrenaline rush.
Advances in digital technology have allowed "creature effects" supervisors
to bring monsters out of the darkness and expose them in plain
sight--gazillions of them, in fact.  Visual stylist Phil Tippett's dinosaur
stampede in "Jurassic Park" was jaw-dropping enough, but on the open,
desolate landscapes of "Starship Troopers"' Klendathu and planet P, his
team of brilliant technicians have raised the bar even further,
computer-generating an army of ferocious, insect-like aliens that are
nothing less than astonishing.
"Starship Troopers" is a film of two distinct halves.  Its first hour
concentrates on plot and character development, with the second hour almost
entirely dedicated to what amounts to one big Bug Hunt (the script's
working title).  This is just as well, because the war is so exhausting, so
relentless, that two plus hours of this would have left even the most
resilient viewer a little shell-shocked.
In a future world dominated by Federal Service campaigning, three high
school hopefuls are eager to enlist.
Johnny Rico (newcomer Casper Van Dien) wants to become a "citizen" in order
to impress his girlfriend, Carmen (played by Denise Richards).  Carmen
aspires to pilot her own spaceship some day.  And Dizzy Flores
("Dragonheart"'s Dina Meyer), who has the hots for Johnny, schemes to
follow him into military school and create a little triangular friction in
the process.  "Mobile infantry and Fleet don't mix!" we also learn.
"Starship Troopers" isn't afraid to poke fun at itself, and this is largely
what makes the first half watchable.  There's also some predictable boot
camp sadism that we've all seen before (only better), but once the kids
graduate and start kicking some bug heiney, there's no stopping these
troopers.
After the disastrous "Showgirls," director Verhoeven has returned to more
comfortable terrain and an opportunity to re-deploy his highly visceral
style, as one might expect from the man who made "Robocop" and "Total
Recall."  "Starship Troopers" is big on gore--very big--with pretty boys
and girls being torn limb from limb at the slightest provocation.  But it's
so over the top that most viewers will become desensitized to it early on.
Verhoeven's casting of bit players from television's "Melrose Place" and
"Beverly Hills 90210" works surprisingly well.  Even with its R-rating (for
extreme violence, and for some language and nudity), "Starship Troopers" is
clearly aimed at the teen market, who should have no trouble relating to
all those fresh young faces and jutting jaws.
Few in this generation are likely to have read Heinlein's book, or even
realize the film's screenplay is based on material from another medium, but
if taken at face value, "Starship Troopers" is an effects-laden thrill ride.

Author
Michael Chen
This is one of the worst big-screen film experiences I've had for a
while. With this film, plus `Showgirls' and `Basic Instinct', Paul
Verhoeven has stamped himself as currently one of the worst blockbuster
directors. His celebrated film `Total Recall' was  I admit 
successfully scripted, but it nonetheless contained directorial flaws.
Obviously nobody wanted to invest too much money in a production from
someone like Verhoeven, the result being that much of the special
effects in `Starship' seemed fake. But not EVERYTHING bad in the film
was the director's fault, even though he was one of the guys who
employed the actors. It is surprising that none of the actors received
nominations for the Razzie Awards (I expected five for the acting
categories). Casserole Vanity Devoid, Dense Ribald, Dingy Miasma, and
Jackass Bushy are in serious need of acting school. No, they have to
pass primary school drama classes first.
While `Total' was written well, `Starship' is purely pathetic. All
right, it is SUPPOSED TO be a fast-paced entertainment film, and you're
SUPPOSED TO turn off your intellect (completely) and enjoy the action
sequences and special effects (that is, guts and gore). As a matter of
fact, I found the activity incredibly boring, a complete waste of more
than two hours. Half of the film was a bad episode of `Beverly Hills
90210' (Dina Meyer was in "Beverly Hills"), while another quarter was
simply nothing (things like presenting irrelevant information in an
irritating way on the web), and the rest was a display of humans
fighting computer-generated images. The battles were all the same 
jumping around, shoot or get stabbed  and on barren planets that only
had giant insects. There weren't even any stunts, which I consider
slightly more exciting than pictures running around. I wonder what the
insects eat, if there's nothing but them on the planets? There is so
much laughable treatment in this film, and it is frankly not amusing
when jokes are intended. This type of story is obviously aimed at
10-year-olds, who can't see it anyway because of the violence and some
sexuality. But then, there are always 16-year-olds who have that frame
of mind.
The pointless plot begins when Johnny's (Vanity Devoid) girlfriend
Carmen (Richards) decides that she wants to join the troopers to fight
the insects who are throwing asteroids at Earth. Johnny then signs up as
a trooper also, after an overacted argument with his parents. But there
is another girl, Dizzy (Meyer), who likes Johnny and then there is
another boy who likes Carmen, which results in a love quadrangle, which
isn't better, because it means augmented worse-than-stereotyped soap
opera, increased bitchiness, and more bad Beverly Hills + Melrose. And
the result of this love quadrangle at the end is also rather stupid.
Anyway, getting back to the thing you might call plot, Johnny is too
stupid to be a pilot and has to join the infantry, while his girl and
the other dude are in the same league. Dizzy comes chasing Johnny and
joins the infantry also. They then start training, which contains what
Roger Ebert calls IPS (Idiot Plot Syndrome, moments when only an idiot
would have made such obvious mistakes), then real combat. And guess
what? That's about as complex as it gets. Oh, and one of their friends,
Carl (Neil Patrick Harris a.k.a. Doogie Howser M.D.), becomes involved
in war intelligence, and his abilities at the end are really corny and
make me want to spray insecticide on someone for it. He's my fifth nom
for a Razzie. The troopers fight, fall in love, die, kill, and try to
act. Naturally, they win, or sort of half-win. Of course, in between
(and at the end) there are soldiers chatting and smiling while carrying
grievous wounds caused by bug legs. The bugs also suffer from IPS: why
would you release hold of your captive before killing it? Isn't it also
amazing that Earthlings haven't invented better hand-held weapons by
then?
The only question that remains is why I gave it one star instead of
zero. Well, maybe a-quarter (of a star) for the originality of the
co-sex shower scene and the (very) brief moments of suspense, another
quarter for copying `Zulu' and letting the good guys (the bugs) win, and
half a star for the sucking-out of the brain of one of those people who
call themselves actors (but there should have been more, the troopers
deserved to die).
Heartily welcome any questions, comments, and criticisms to
microchip81@hotmail.com.

Author
Seth Bookey
Seen on 3 January 1998 for $3 at the Cineplex Odeon Worldwide
There are some movies you go to, no matter how dumb you know they are
going to be, because you want to see the gorgeous star, or you want to see
giant arachnids eat people and cut them in two, or just because you were
bored one Saturday afternoon and $3 is a good price to pay for crap. 
Guilty on all counts in my trip to Starship Troopers, and in the words of
Bart Simpson, it was "craptastic."  The special effects were spectacular,
but the story left a lot to be desired. 
Set in one of those not-so-distant futures, the Earth is ruled by
the one-world government of the Federation, where you only become a
citizen if you serve your planet with military service; everyone else is
merely a "civilian," none of whom are allowed to vote. Part of this
one-world lifestyle is that a city like Buenos Aires is populated by WASPy
looking teenages with perfect teeth. They even call it "BA." Why not just
set it in LA and get it over with already?
The Earth is being run by veterans and it's threatened by Klandathu, a
planet run by arachnids whose meteors threaten send their bug eggs to us,
and endangering our one-world way of life, and our perfect teeth. 
In what clearly is *Beverly Hills 90210* versus *Them*, the heros are the
high school graduates of Buenos Aires High School--the dumb stud Johnny
Rico (Casper van Dien, unknown except for One Life to Live viewers), his
brainy girlfriend Carmen Ibanez (Denise Richards), his genius friend Carl
Jenkins (Neil Patrick Harris, best known as Doogie Howser), and the girl
who loves him, Dizzy Flores (Dina Meyer).
Johnny's parents don't want him to join the military, but you know how
kids are in the not-so-distant future. They have minds of their own. 
Johnny, however, thinks with his penis (the only part of his body we do
not see in this movie), and joins the mobile infantry to impress Carmen. 
Of course, being 18 and smart, she is put in charge of a big spaceship
almost immediately, and flies with Zander Barcalow (Patrick Muldoon, of
*Melrose Place* and *Days of Our Lives*). All the while, Johnny is in boot
camp, where his new best friend is also his obnoxious rival, Ace Levey
(Jake Busey).
Soon, it turns out that the "bugs" are much smarter than anyone ever
thought, and 12 million people are killed, including most of the beloved
folks of "BA." This allows the movie to degenerate quickly into nonstop
action, as humans have to fight off endless hordes of giant human-slicing,
gore-producing arachnids, on their planet. 
The special effects really are fantastic, but the second half makes almost
no sense. At one point, space ships are able to incinerate most of the
bugs, but when the fortress is surrounded by bugs, that ability
disappears. The laser weapons used at boot camp also disappear, and the
gang is fighting off the bugs with machine guns. HUH? Oh, and if they can
fly across the galaxy, why can't the giant spaceships get out of harm's
way?
The movie does feature one very interesting and entertaining element: the
Federation's propaganda ads, exhorting people to join the army, do their
part, and crush bugs while mother's look on delightedly. The ads bring
out the movie's subversive side, poking at the fascist veteranocracy
running the world. But, once war breaks out, it's all-out "save the
Earth with your bare hands with your high school friends." The intelligent
injections of satire, which worked so well in directory Paul Verhoeven's
liberal sci-fi movie *Robocop*, just adds to the movie's mayhem. Obscure
jokes, the the Mormon's planet colony, will be lost on most people.
So, if you like this sort of nonsense, you will love Starship Troopers.
You'll go for the special effects, but you will stay for Casper van Dien's
buttocks in the co-ed showers.
Based on the then-controversial novel by Robert A. Heinlein.
Rated R for graphic sci-fi violence and gore, and for some language and
nudity. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Author
Matthew Brissette
Starship troopers is a weird movie. Not weird as in "giant bugs want to
take over the unniverse and we are first on the list" weird...that i can
buy. It is weird because it uneasily balances two very different genres.
First there's the "look at me , i'm so good looking" genre from 90210
and then there's the "let's kick some alien butt" genre from ID4. 
Any fool will tell you that these two items do not go together...but the
director , Paul Verhoeven , is not just any fool. He's a fool with a 100
million dollar budget. Unfortunately , he could not spare a few bucks to
buy a pencil and some paper to write a decent script. Money is power and
power corrupts. While wtaching this movie i swear i could sometimes hear
Paul screaming "More effects! More gorgeous people!" and laughing
sadistically in the background. 
Hell , i'd be laughing too if i could get away with making a 100 million
dollar movie for the 90210 crowd...while making sure it contains enough
violence to attract the adults. Teens will love this film because of the
familiar surgically enhanced faces of their favorite tv actors and
adults will adore it for the outrageous violence.  The cast is straight
out of the Aaron Spelling school of acting , 'nuff said.
On the bright side of things it 's also the most fun i've had while
watching a movie since Men In Black. But i would be remiss in my duties
as a critic if i did not say that Starship Troopers is the most godawful
piece of crap i've ever seen. 
My question to Paul Verhoeven is this:"What happened?"
He used to make great movies like Total Recall , Robocop , Basic
Instinct... So , at the risk of repeating myself , what happened? 
Melrose Place happened , Baywatch happened...and this disease is
spreading to hollywood directors. I realized i was watching an episode
of 90210 during the scene when the prettiest girl in class barfs during
biology. Or when we find out our hero is in a love triangle. Or when he
loses the first girl , gets close with the second , she dies and he
jumps right back into the arms of the first. 
I know this is what happens in the book but the directing is so bad it
feels like a bad soap opera. The actors are wooden planks that can run
and fire weapons. Except for Michael Ironside and , to a small degree ,
Dina Meyer. How bad are the rest? One girl gets stabbed through the
shoulder by a bug. She has a hole the size of a baseball in her shoulder
but , hey! , she's a tough cookie so the next second she's firing her
rifle and blasting bugs with said shoulder. 
It's not all bad. In fact , it's pretty damn fun even amazing at times.
The effects and incredible and there is nothing more satisfying then
killing bugs. So , in conclusion...

Author
David Hines

Reposter's note: this review was written by SF writer David Gerrold, 
and was originally posted on his web site at http://www.gerrold.com or 
http://www.gerrold.com/people/gerrold/ (the URL is a little glitchy).  
It is reposted to Usenet (rec.arts.sf.movies, rec.arts.sf.written, 
rec.arts.movies.current-films, follow-ups to rec.arts.sf.movies; and 
separately to rec.arts.movies.reviews and rec.arts.sf.reviews) with 
Gerrold's permission.  
For those who are unfamiliar with David Gerrold's work, he's a nine-
time Hugo and Nebula nominee whose novella "The Martian Child" won him 
one of each.  His works include the alien invasion series WAR AGAINST 
THE CHTORR, the time-travel novel THE MAN WHO FOLDED HIMSELF, the 
analysis/criticism THE WORLD OF STAR TREK, and a whole bunch more 
fiction and non-.  He'll always be stuck with the label of "the guy 
who wrote 'The Trouble With Tribbles.'"  (Yes, *that* episode of STAR 
TREK.)  He is one of only a handful of writers to have been nominated 
for the Hugo award for prose and screen work.
He was also a friend of the late Robert A. Heinlein.
*Please,* if anyone follows up to this article, make sure the 
attributions are correct: that is, "David Gerrold wrote:"
In 1962, Robert A.  Heinlein, the undeniable "dean of science 
fiction," published the best novel of his career: STARSHIP TROOPERS.  
Many critics regard this novel as the single most influential novel 
ever published in the science fiction field.  Other authors wrote some 
of their best works in response to it -- either in agreement, or as an 
argument against.  There's no question that STARSHIP TROOPERS is not 
only Heinlein's best novel, it's also his most controversial.  In many 
ways it is far superior to his philosophically flawed STRANGER IN A 
STRANGE LAND.  (But that's a different discussion.) 
The novel details the adventures of Juan (Johnnie) Rico, a wealthy 
Filipino youth who graduates from high school and joins the Mobile 
Infantry to earn his citizenship.  In this particular Heinlein future, 
citizenship is earned by a term of service to the nation.  Only 
citizens get to vote.  This carries with it the implied assumption 
that only graduates of federal service are qualified to know what's 
good for society, that those who have not served are parasites who 
have made no other valuable contribution to society, and who are 
therefore not entitled to a voice.  
On the surface, the novel is structured like BATTLE CRY, the post-WWII 
recruiting movie, following the adventures of several young men and 
women through their training and through their various battlefields -- 
but first it stops to takes a few pages from ALL QUIET ON THE WESTERN 
FRONT.  If you'll remember that novel, it starts with a teacher 
extolling the glories of war and defending the fatherland to a 
classroom of eager German youth.  In Heinlein's classroom however, 
Dubois, the instructor is far more realistic and charismatic.  Instead 
he talks about personal responsibility, morality, and ethics -- the 
obligation one owes one's society for accepting its protection.  The 
class is a required course, part of the necessary preparation for the 
choice presented to every high school graduate -- whether or not to 
earn citizenship through service.  
Juan Rico's parents are shown as shallow non-citizens, who oppose his 
military service; but Juan enters the service over their objections 
because his best friend, Carl, and his girlfriend, Carmen, are also 
signing up.  Carl is going into strategy and tactics, and Carmen wants 
to be a starship pilot.  Unfortunately, Juan's aptitudes show that the 
only thing he's good for is "cannon fodder," the Mobile Infantry.  Uh-
oh.  It is obvious from the text that the Mobile Infantry has already 
been involved in quite a few wars -- and at least two of the veterans 
we meet (Dubois and the enlistment officer) are missing limbs.  But 
Heinlein is making a point here -- ultimately all wars are won by the 
infantry, the guys who go in on the ground.
Heinlein's portrayal of boot camp shows that military training in the 
future will remain essentially the same -- drill the trainees to 
exhaustion, break down their identities, and rebuild them with 
unflinching commitment to the task at hand.  Rico makes a couple of 
mistakes along the way, earns some lashes (flogging is legal in this 
society), learns his lessons, and gets over the hump.  He becomes a 
soldier.  
One of the most interesting parts of the book is Heinlein's projection 
of future military ordnance and equipment.  The Mobile Infantry are 
equipped with "Power Armor" -- nuclear powered suits which greatly 
expands the ability and strength of the individual.  The armor makes 
each and every soldier a one-person tank, able to leap tall buildings 
in a single bound, faster than a speeding locomotive... etc. etc.  
Juan Rico in his power armor has enough ordnance to topple a small 
government.
It's just about this time (of course) that war breaks out with the 
bug-world Klendathu.  The bugs start it by dropping a large rock on 
Buenos Aires, wiping out the entire city and killing Rico's mother who 
is visiting at the time.  (This is the first of several interesting 
oversights in the book.  If the bugs can drop a small asteroid on a 
single city to wipe it out, why not drop a very large asteroid and 
destroy ALL life on the planet?) 
So Juan and his fellow soldiers are off to battle.  As with BATTLE 
CRY and ALL QUIET ON THE WESTERN FRONT, we see Rico changed by his 
experiences in actual combat.  The death rate is distressingly high.  
This one buys the farm, then that one buys the farm.  Sooner or later, 
everyone buys a farm.  You learn to stop caring so much about the 
characters....  
The bugs are a particularly interesting alien species.  They are 
evolved from hive-dwelling insects.  The soldiers are mindless 
warriors, bred for only one purpose -- kill and keep on killing.  The 
Klendathoids(?) breed different types of workers for different kinds 
of jobs; only the warriors are dangerous.  There are probably queen-
bugs and brain-bugs too, but we don't see them in the book.  
And it is here, in the design of the aliens that Heinlein reveals what 
his book is really about -- what kind of a species are we?  What does 
it mean to be a human being?  He has begun his book with several 
pertinent discussions of personal responsibility; then he demonstrates 
how it works.  Everything that Heinlein portrays here is about taking 
a large bite of responsibility and then growing the jaws to chew it.  
As Rico gnaws his way up the food chain, to squad leader, to corporal, 
to sergeant, and finally to lieutenant, we see that what is really 
happening is the expansion of his domain of responsibility.  
This is contrasted with the bugs, whose individuals are mindless.  
They are bred for a single task only.  They are not adaptable and they 
are not capable of operating outside of the specific domain for which 
they were bred.  A warrior will kill and do nothing else; it cannot 
negotiate,it cannot surrender, it cannot even honor a truce.  A worker 
can only work, it cannot fight.  Etc.  etc.  There is no 
responsibility among the bugs.
(While this makes for a particularly horrifying enemy, it actually 
presents a serious story problem that Heinlein has conveniently 
glossed over by simply not addressing it.  How does an essentially 
mindless species achieve faster-than-light travel?  Heinlein 
postulates brain-bugs, but we never really see any bug technology.  
There is a hint that there is some bug technology, but we don't see it 
in the warriors.  Heinlein also postulates that the bugs have an 
alliance with the "skinnies," a humanoid species who later switch 
their allegiance to our side, but ...again, the question of bug 
technology is still not addressed.
Never mind.  Heinlein isn't world-building here.  He's trying to make 
a different point.)
Heinlein is using the contrast between human and bug to force us to 
focus on the question at hand -- are we mindless bugs?  Or are we 
reasoning beings?  And if we are reasoning beings, then what is our 
responsibility in the matter?  If we are capable of individual 
rational thought, then how can we justify behaving like mindless bugs?  
Regardless of the military setting for the story, Heinlein is asking a 
very pertinent question.  It is the same question he asks in STRANGER 
IN A STRANGE LAND.  In both books, he stacks the deck for the answer 
he prefers.  But that is always the prerogative of the author, and the 
questions that Heinlein has asked have proven to be more important for 
the asking than for the particular answers that Heinlein has offered.  
Thirty-five years later the arguments are still raging.
Now, Paul Verhoeven, director of ROBOCOP and TOTAL RECALL, has adapted 
STARSHIP TROOPERS into a movie...and I feel confident in predicting 
that it will trigger a new round of even more intense arguments.  
There's no question that STARSHIP TROOPERS is one of the most 
intensely anticipated movies of the year, perhaps the decade.  
Millions of Heinlein's readers are waiting for this one.  In one 
respect, they will not be disappointed.  The picture has some of the 
finest action sequences ever seen in a science fiction movie.  The 
battles with the bugs are astonishing.  The movie is undoubtedly going 
to be a big hit -- especially among 13-year old boys.  My son thought 
it was the best movie he'd ever seen.  It's big, it's long, it's loud, 
it's gory.  What more could a boy ask for?  The special effects are 
truly this picture's strength.  
That's the bad news.  There is little good news.
To start with, the scriptwriter should probably be taken out and given 
ten lashes for presumption, and another ten for doing a lousy job.  
The dialogue is uniformly unimaginative, jingoistic, and in some 
places downright stupid.  The story structure is sloppy.  The 
character of Dubois is dropped/combined with Lieutenant Rasczak.  
Juan's family lives in Buenos Aires, so both of his parents are killed 
when the bugs attack; this eliminates the reconciliation scene between 
Rico and his father so important to the book.  A new female character, 
Dizzy, is added.  She joins the M.I. because she's in love with Rico.  
And for someone native to Argentina (in the movie), Johnny Rico has a 
decidedly anglo look.  Hmmm.
Heinlein's greatest strength -- his thought-provoking conversations -- 
have been reduced to jingoistic one-liners.  The picture is punctuated 
with satirical newscasts from the future.  This is a device that 
worked very well in both Robocop and Total Recall; it doesn'twork 
here.  Because so many of the news stories are laugh-out-loud 
caricatures, they send an implied message: Don't take this movie 
seriously.  But then we cut back to the classroom or the training 
ground or the Lieutenant and what we're hearing is something else 
entirely: take this very seriously, it's about your humanity.  
The really bad news is that much of the best of Heinlein's novel has 
been gutted in the script.  The power armor is gone.  Instead, our 
brave young men and women are outfitted as if (the late) Gianni 
Versacci were sending them off to take the beach at Normandy.  The 
technology portrayed is already obsolete in 1997.  This is a humanity 
that has faster-than-light starships, and is still sending the troops 
in armed only with gunpowder and grenades -- and the occasional hand-
held nuke.  Huh?
We saw napalm carpets laid down in Vietnam.  Why not on Klendathu?  
We've seen our soldiers using flame-throwers in the Mekong Delta, why 
not on Klendathu?  We've seen our planes dropping "daisy-cutter" bombs 
(fuel-air explosives, they work like baby nukes), in Vietnam (and in 
the opening sequence of OUTBREAK), why not on Klendathu?  We've seen 
how snipers can use laser-beams for precision targeting, why not our 
infantry on Klendathu?  Our local motorcycle police have their radios 
built in to their helmets, why do our troops on Klendathu have to use 
hand-held flip-open communicators?  Where is the weaponry?  In the 
next three hundred years, will we not see development of beam weapons, 
improved flame-throwers, rail-guns, and other technologies of mayhem?  
Even more disturbing is the portrayal of the military mind-set here, 
from the cowardly general, all the way down to the hard-assed Sergeant 
Zim, the D.I.  There isn't a single one of these folks who isn't a 
caricature of something we've seen in six other movies.  And 
everywhere else, we've seen it better.  This script needed a John 
Milius or even an Oliver Stone -- someone who's seen actual combat.  
There's nothing on the screen to suggest real knowledge of military 
situations or the people who have been trained to deal with them.  The 
troops are not spread out properly, they don't move through the 
terrain properly, and in fact they walk unconcernedly through canyons 
where they KNOW bugs are watching from above.  
The biggest failure is that the picture makes little attempt to 
address the central issue of Heinlein's book -- personal 
responsibility.  Instead, the last act turns into a melodramatic 
mishmash with Juan Rico violating orders to go running off down a bug-
tunnel to rescue his long-lost love Carmen Ibanez (Dizzy having been 
conveniently disposed of earlier).  It's here that we finally get to 
meet a brain bug, with a face that looks something like a hyperactive 
rectum with teeth.  Our retreat back up the tunnel is covered by the 
courageous wounded fellow with theportable nuke -- just like Ripley's 
escape in ALIENS was covered by Vasquez and the Lieutenant triggering 
a grenade as those bugs came down the tunnel too.  
The directing is spectacular during the battle scenes -- and barely 
adequate almost everywhere else.  The cast is also adequate with no 
one bumping into the furniture.  Casper Van Dien is a likable 
(although anglicized) Johnny Rico.  Fortunately, none of these 
attractive young people are too hard on the eyes.  And just to make 
sure we get an eyeful, there's a coed shower scene that is enjoyably 
gratuitous.  Rico's best buddy, Carl, is played by Doogie Howser all 
grown up now -- who shows up at the end of the movie in Gestapo 
trenchcoat and cap, just like Halloween.  Are we supposed to like him 
or not?  Even the director isn't sure.  He careens between cynicism 
and affection, leaving us emotionally adrift, so most of the deaths 
here are meaningless.  
While I'm at it, I don't want to overlook the other cheesy production 
values.  Too many of the sets and props look like painted cardboard, 
hastily-designed and unconvincing.  They flash by too fast for 
examination, nothing registers on the viewer's consciousness with the 
kind of A-ha! experience we had when we first saw the Pan-Am flight 
boots in 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY.  
Oh yes, and let's talk about the space technology.  We see Carmen 
Ibanez piloting a shuttle boat recklessly through a space station that 
is built as a ring around the moon.  We see her backing a starship out 
of its moorings like a teenage driver who has forgotten to release the 
emergency brake, and she damn near but not quite collides with 
everything she gets near.  And they say she's one of the BEST pilots?!  
I'll walk, thanks.
When the starships arrive on site...  ohboy, there's almost too many 
errors here to deal with.  First of all, they're all in formation so 
tightly packed that you couldn't set off a cherry bomb without 
destroying at least six of them.  Didn't anybody learn their lesson at 
Pearl Harbor?  You NEVER put your planes, ships, tanks, whatever so 
close together that they make a terrific target for the enemy.  Even 
during WWII (the big one), our convoys were never this closely 
grouped.  So of course, it's a disaster.  We get to see these 
monstrous starships, bursting into flame -- FLAMES in space?!!  -- 
bumping and colliding into each other like drunken elephants, and 
finally SINKING downward out of frame like the Titanic.  Excuse me?  
It doesn't work that way in space.
There's also an error of serious orbital mechanics.  The starships are 
shown in a stationary position over a single spot on the planet -- 
which makes them a terrific target, but is so wrong it's ridiculous.  
A geosynchronous position is approximately three planetary diameters 
out.  For an Earth-sized planet, that's 24,000 miles above sea level.  
That's impractical for a military mission.  What's wanted and needed 
here is a very low, very fast orbit which lets the mother ship drop 
its landing craft and be in position to pick them up again at two-hour 
intervals; it also makes the mother ship an extremely difficult target 
to hit from the ground.  But again, the filmmakers went for big, loud, 
and inaccurate because they assumed it would look better on the 
screen, and who would notice the difference anyway?
The bugs are interesting -- but other than the six legs, it's hard to 
figure out how the rest of the critter is put together.  And when we 
get to Klendathu, or any other bug planet,we're left with two 
questions: 1) Nothing's growing here.  What do these things eat?  And 
2) How are these critters throwing rocks at the Earth from half a 
galaxy away?  Faster-than-light rocks?  What are these bugs using for 
technology?  (And again, if the bugs can throw a small rock, then why 
can't they throw a large rock and wipe out the Earth altogether?)
The strength of STARSHIP TROOPERS is its digital effects, which are 
employed on an epic scale never seen before.  There is Oscar-winning 
work in this movie (which makes the failures of the script all the 
more depressing.)  As I said above, the battle sequences are 
unmatched.  It's the use of the technology that fails, not the 
technology.  For example, there is no dust on Klendathu.  No matter 
how much you blow up, every shot is clear all the way out to the 
horizon.  You would think with all those house-sized critters stamping 
their way across the landscape, you'd see some dust clouds rising on 
the other side of the hills...?  
Despite all this, I suspect audiences are going to enjoy themselves 
enormously.  There's room for a sequel, and as the second hundred 
million bucks rolls in at the box office, I'm sure the producers will 
begin planning STARSHIP TROOPERS II: THE REVENGE OF THE BUGS.
There's a lot to admire in STARSHIP TROOPERS, the movie.  
Unfortunately, there's not a lot to like.  STARSHIP TROOPERS, the 
book, was written with passion.  STARSHIP TROOPERS the movie has 
sacrificed passion and thoughtfulness for big digital bugs.  

Author
Timothy Scott
Dir: Paul Verhoeven
Starring: Casper Van Dien, Dina Meyer, Patrick Muldoon, Denise Richards
          Neil Patrick Harris, Clancy Brown & Michael Ironside
        Okay, so I admit maybe I'm getting old, but the best advice I can 
give for anyone thinking of seeing "Starship Troopers" can be summed in 
two words - Ear Plugs.
        Normally, IUm a tireless advocate of THX quality theaters with 
state-of -the-art digital sound.  But this film had me wishing I had my 
remote control. You don't so much watch "Starship Troopers" as survive 
it. By the end, youUll likely feel as battered and bombarded as the wounded 
troopers themselves.
        Somewhere amidst the carnage is a message from director Paul 
Verhoeven that we are a society addicted to violence, as capable of 
inhumanity as the creatures we so gleefully destroy.  But you'll probably 
miss that as you dodge the endless bullets, razor claws and
dismembered body parts hurling at you from every direction.
        Verhoeven has made another in the long line of technically 
brilliant "theme park" films we've come to expect BEFORE Labor Day.  I 
suppose by turning up the camp factor Verhoeven has convinced himself 
that this is social commentary. Sure, if you look hard enough you can find 
meaning watching the Coyote trying new ways to kill the Road Runner. 
Sorry Paul, I'm not impressed.  This film made me feel like I'd been 
dropped inside a video game during an earthquake. Of course, I mention 
video games on purpose because I know this film is coming to a Nintendo 
near you. Frankly, that might be more fun.
        Of course, such video game graphics won't compare to the computer 
generated images seen in this film. As supervised by Phil Tippet  of 
Jurassic Park fame, Industrial Light & Magic do their usual first rate 
job with the effects.  Visually, I haven't seen a film
with this many eye-popping wonders since "The Fifth Element." 
Interestingly, both these films only make me wonder how incredible it 
would be to see effects like these attached to a real story.  Let's just 
hope George "Skywalker" Lucas knows what I'm talking about.
        So, what about the story, you ask? Well, it centers around the 
hormonal tendencies and macho posturing of about a half dozen new 
recruits, some of whom will live and some of whom will die a grisly, 
horrible death.  Succeeding as a trooper is basically advancement by 
attrition. If you stick around long enough for the commanding officers to 
die, sooner or later they put you in charge. 
        The cast is made up of unkown actors because, let's face it, the 
bugs get top billing here (they must have a killer agent).  What's most 
remarkable about the actors is what perfect physical specimens they are. 
Their performances are so stiff you'd think the tongue that supposed to 
be in cheek got sucked out by aliens too.  Although, in fairness, 
straight is exactly how this material should be played. If anyone of 
these characers winked at the audience at all, the whole premise would 
collapse.
        The film is certainly not as derivative as say, "Independence 
Day."  Verhoeven seems to prefer borrowing from himself. The clever news 
sequences for example are very reminiscent of "RoboCop" (not to mention 
the incessant bloodshed).  The best moments occur when the film is 
clearly not taking itself seriously as it parodies the WWII newsreels and 
propaganda films trying to recruit young men and women to sign up for 
Federal (read: Military) Service.  
        By joining up, they can become "citizens" - valued members of 
society honored for their commitment to protecting the human race above 
all else. The youth are taught in school that being a citizen is a badge 
of honor making it easier for them to enjoy privleges like going to 
college, entering politics or obtaining a license to get pregnant.
These parodies of fascism arenUt new, but in this kind of film it comes 
across as rather witty.
        Unlike "RoboCop" "Total Recall" or even "Showgirls", "Starship 
Troopers" will not be remembered years from now.  Despite its 
bludgeon-like impact, none of the perfomances stand out. In fact, even 
the big, nasty bugs seem bland. In it's attempt to satirize overkill, 
thatUs exactly what it becomes.  The Audience is Listening...just not as 
well as we used to.

Author
James Sanford
STARSHIP TROOPERS
Directed by Paul Verhoeven
 You could call it "Teenage Nazi Power Rangers" and youngsters would still
probably be trying to sneak into this very R-rated gorefest that pits
beautiful, vacant-eyed young freedom-fighters against gigantic space bugs
who spit flaming meterorites out of their backsides and, when they're not
shredding their human victims, go to the trouble of sucking their brains
out.
 There's a surplus of brainlessness in director Paul Verhoeven's ("Basic
Instinct," "Showgirls") lavish sci-fi spectacular which often seems to be
just on the verge of self-satire. Too bad it didn't have the courage to make
that leap, since it's certainly it's hard not to laugh at the movie's
plodding first hour, a sort of semi-futuristic "90210" episode in which
recent high school graduates rebel against their parents and suffer the
pains of unrequieted love while planning to join the Federation Alliance, a
space corps whose uniforms and symbols carry eerie echoes of the Third
Reich. Finally, after several reels of yawn-inducing soap-opera, the kids
get to see some combat action as the irritable insects bomb Buenos Aires
(which looks a lot more like Pasadena), setting the stage for all-out war.
 The special-effects are a mixed bag, with some cheesy-looking blue-screen
and model work giving way to the genuinely impressive computer-generated
monsters. Unfortunately, despite a lot of talk about how smart the bugs are,
all they seem to do is kill: Soldiers are cut in half, impaled on spiky
legs, set aflame, beheaded, etc. Verhoeven relishes dishing out the gore (he
also directed "Robocop" and "Total Recall," remember), even though all but
the most bloodthirsty in the crowd will have had their fill long before the
movie's messy --and anti-climactic-- finale. The acting by all concerned
makes the cast of "Melrose Place" look like the Royal Shakespeare Company,
as statuesque model-types bark out lines like "Everyone fights, no one
quits!" and "Kill 'em! Kill 'em all!" with clueless conviction. Only in the
big co-ed shower scene do you finally realize why these no-name thespians
were hired. Hint: It had nothing whatsoever to do with their line-readings.
James Sanford

Author
Boyd Petrie
Starship Troopers (1997)
Rated R for graphic sci-fi violence and gore, and for some language and nudity.
----------  Out of 4 stars: ***1/2 (3 1/2 Stars)
Starring: Casper Van Dien, Denise Richards, Dina Meyer, Jake Busey, Neil Patrick Harris, Patrick Muldoon, and
Michael Ironside.
Ladies and gentlemen, 1997's INDEPENDENCE DAY is here!  It's title:
STARSHIP TROOPERS.  And surprisingly, it is more entertaining than
ID4.  I realize that I gave last year's sci-fi hit a 4 star rating,
but I was under the spell of the powerful first hour.  After
subsequent viewings, I feel that INDEPENDENCE DAY really wasn't as
great as it seemed--though I still give it a positive review.
STARSHIP TROOPERS, on the other hand, has a mocking sense of humor,
knowing perfectly well how ridiculous it may seem.  As a result,
STARSHIP TROOPERS is a more exciting, energetic, and lively science
fiction film.  In fact, I probably could never get tired of watching
this film.
STARSHIP TROOPERS is very reminiscient of STAR WARS, another kick-ass
space opera which reinvented the sci-fi drama altogether.  While
STARSHIP TROOPERS is no STAR WARS, it comes quite close, and the
easiest assessment would be to call this film: "The 'Star Wars' of the
90s."  Am I being to generous to this film?  Perhaps, but when a
science fiction film comes along that can mix humor and romance,
effectively, into the warring races.  In essence, this is the science
fiction equivolence of Pulp Fiction.  The easiest way to write a
review of this film would be to compare it to other science fiction
films, and I may have to.  STARSHIP TROOPERS is not quite an original
film persay, but director Paul Verhoeven gives the film a
"kick-the-aliens'-asses" style.  ID4 had this same style, except it
was forced, most likely the cause of Will Smith having a major role.
This new "Star Wars" has a very simple, basic plot: mankind vs. an
alien species.  The alien species in question here is the Bugs, a
seemingly advanced civilization of arachnid-type insects.  However,
the underlying morals of STARSHIP TROOPERS are fleshed out with deadly
accuracy.  Sometimes the morals are buried by the bloody violence and
intense action scenes, but during quiet moments, we realize that
STARSHIP TROOPERS has something to tell us about our civilization.
More than likely, these morals will be overpowered and quickly
forgotten by the time the movie ends.  And they should be.  I doubt
Verhoeven intended this film to be a thought-provoking film.  This is
an "event" film, but surprisingly above average.  It is extremely
refreshing to watch a sci-fi war film, and actually root for the human
side (something INDEPENDENCE DAY never achieved).
STARSHIP TROOPERS begins with a satirical portrayal of those strange
"Join the Army" ads.  Mixing a Web-based interface, these summations
of events are refreshingly original.  Stating, "Would you like to know
more?", these short news bulletins give the film an immediate sense of
humor, and we know we should not take it seriously.  However, we also
witness the murder of several troopers in battle, in a gory, yet
funny, way.  After witnessing the slaughter, the film jumps back one
year, to setup what we just saw.  We are introduced to Johnny Rico
(Casper Van Dien) and Carmen Ibanez (Denise Richards).  Rico flirts
with Carmen by sending her messages over computer terminals in school
classrooms.  However, Carmen isn't as interested in Rico as she is in
becoming a pilot.  However, another classmate, Dizzy Flores (Dina
Meyer), has her eye on Rico.  Unfortunately, Rico isn't interested in
Dizzy.  This setup is rather cliched, as is the result of the setup,
but it still is fun to watch.
Carmen signs up to become a starship trooper, and as a result, Rico
signs up.  And as a result, Dizzy signs up.  Everyone is assigned a
certain position in the academy: Carmen gets the pilot position she
wanted, Carl Jenkins (Neil Patrick Harris), a psychic, gets a position
in the training program, and Rico is left in the lowest class of the
Starship Troopers: the Mobile Infantry.  The main story follows Rico
through his trials and relationships.  In reality, I found myself
watching a space version of "Melrose Place," but with better special
effects.  An hour into the film, the war begins.  A sense of tension
grew in the audience I watched this film with.  The first hour may
have been a funny (sometimes unintentionally) setup, but we grew to
care for the flat characters, because no matter how hard I tried not
to like the characters, their gorgeous looks won me over (call me
superficial, if you must).  Following the training sessions, which had
many dramas in themselves (too many to mention here), the troopers are
sent to war.  The Bugs live on the planet Klendathu, a planet which
consists of dirt and rock, and pretty much nothing else.  Many dramas
occur during the war, until finally the troopers realize that their is
something behind the Bugs' attacks.  A sort of intelligence which
masterminds the defense.  The troopers are ordered to locate the
"brain" and capture it.
I hopefully left the plot as vague as possible, because STARSHIP
TROOPERS is not about plot.  It's about special effects and gory
violence.  Director Verhoeven, most known for his nudie film SHOWGIRLS
and BASIC INSTINCT, returns to his sci-fi days, which gave us good
films like Total Recall.  Verhoeven likes to push the envelope of the
MPAA, but despite all the violence, the comic book feel gives the film
a sense of falsehood.  STARSHIP TROOPERS is extremely violent, with
more gore than this year's EVENT HORIZON.  The R rating is well
deserved, and hopefully parents will not allow their 12 year old
children to see it.  My guess is that Verhoeven's target audience is
the 18 to 25 male group.  The film has a testosterone level off the
charts, with chiseled men and beautiful women.  Despite these
superficial elements, STARSHIP TROOPERS also creates a world which
made STAR WARS so successful.  While watching the film, we never
second guess the character's decisions because they seem perfectly
clear.  Thankfully, no hero is punching aliens in the face, which
gives the flat characters some depth for which we can identify with.
The cast of STARSHIP TROOPERS is quite annoying to begin with, but
they soon grow on you.  Casper Van Dien has the chiseled facial
features and tan skin which will make most girls swoon.  To most guys,
he will come across as artificial.  Fortunately, Van Dien is the worst
of the cast, despite how hard he tries to come off as a real
character.  Dina Meyer does a much better job of fleshing out her
character.  Her Dizzy is extremely likeable.  Denise Richards also
does a good job, and her scenes are very well done.  Jake Busey, Gary
Busey's son, gives a wonderfully funny performance, and provides one
of the biggest laughs of the film.  Neil Patrick Harris (remember, he
was Doogie Howser) is a little wooden, and slightly out of place with
the rest of the cast.  However, he does give a good performance.
Michael Ironside gives the best performance of the film as the teacher
with one arm.  His performance rises above the rest.  Perhaps it is
because his character is the most developed, but I think it is just
Ironside's presence on screen.  Unfortunately, no particular cast
member gives a star-making performance, which is too bad because the
material here could have made many of the cast members stars.
Director Verhoeven is the main star of the film.  His direction is
fast and unrelentless.  He never slows down his pace, which makes for
a wild ride.  Writer Edward Neumeier adapted the screenplay from the
book by Robert Heinlein.  The writing is usually very funny, and
sometimes very corny.  The dialogue is smart but not too smart.  We
aren't required to know everything, but some plot holes are left
unanswered.  Thankfully we are not intended to notice, and we really
don't (except for one which lingered in my mind for quite a while).
Amazingly, with all the wars and romance going on, the screenplay
manages to include some surprising governmental issues.  In fact,
these governmental changes seem fairly plausible, and this adds
another layer to the story.  The moral debate of the characters is
quite surprising to find in a film of this genre, but what is even
more surprising is the amount of humor included into all the carnage.
I haven't laughed this loud, even in some comedies.  Oh, and the
special effects are first rate.
STARSHIP TROOPERS is rated R for graphic sci-fi violence and gore, and
for some language and nudity.  Believe me when I say this: don't take
young kids to see this film.  It is extremely violent.  In fact, it is
probably the most violent film out this year.  However, if you are old
enough (over 17) to see it, STARSHIP TROOPERS is guaranteed to
entertain.  It's been a long time since I have cheered for the heros,
while also cheering for the bad guys.  And still, it is my dream to
see a sci-fi film in which the alien race destroys mankind, and take
over the world.  Now that would be entertaining!
Reviewed by Respect (respect@aros.net)
http://www.aros.net/~respect/movies.html

Author
Rudiger Landmann

/Starship Troopers/ hovers somewhere between a spoof of 1950s American
propaganda films and a tongue-in-cheek action movie, and probably would
have benefitted from being one or the other rather than not quite either.
The film falls short of being true satire, but although /Dr Strangelove/
it ain't, it nevertheless has an idiosyncratic appeal.
One of the most prized videos in my collection is a documentary called
/Atomic Cafe/, a collage of early nuclear-age American propaganda films:
clumsy, jingoistic, and riddled with half-truths, they are the chilling
testimonies of a government hoping desperately to appear in control of a
situation which it is not. The opening scenes of /Starship Troopers/ are
clearly drawing on the language of these films, but sadly, this "frame" 
for the story is largely lost, recurring only intermittently throughout
the film. When it comes back right at the very end, with the on-screen
reminder to the audience that the fight against the bugs is continuing and
that the Troopers are going to WIN!, the effect has been undermined to the
point where it really doesn't hold any more meaning. This is a pity, as
with a more consistent push in this direction, /Starship Troopers/ might
have been a much more blackly humourous piece.
On the other hand, this "frame" may have been discarded completely, making
/Starship Troopers/ comparable to such films as the /Evil Dead/ series, or
Peter Jackson's efforts such as /Bad Taste/ and /Brain Dead/, or director
Paul Verhoeven's own /The Running Man/. The over-the-top, excessive
violence of the boot camp scenes early in the film seems to point in
this direction, but its sheer gratuitousness is not followed through in
the rest of the movie. Similarly, if it is to be read in this light, the
ending is left very weak indeed, and on this count alone, the movie
doesn't really work as an action film, tongue-in-cheek or not.
Leaving generic considerations aside, perhaps the greatest strengths of
the film are in its imagery and visual language. The use of the Nazi-
(even Gestapo-) style uniforms for the Troopers is predictable, but
noteworthy for the way in which they send dissonant visual cues to the
audience. Since this style of uniform is meant to say "evil", the fact
that the protagonists are shown wearing them signals that something is
very much amiss in the society being portrayed. The impossibly flawless 
looks of the main cast, especially when juxtaposed with the Ms and Mr
Average looks of the rest of the soldiers, are another sign to the viewer
that this is supposed to be caricature, not realism. Another interesting
piece of imagery is the design of the major evil in the film - the "Brain
Bug" revealed close to the end of the movie. Like all war films, /Starship
Troopers/ is packed with phallic imagery, in this case mostly belonging to
the protagonists in the form of their weaponry. In contrast, then, the
sinister intelligence behind their enemies is soft and rounded, with mouth
parts that resemble labia within which nestles a "sting" that can suck a
man's brain out, recalling the mythological succubus, or perhaps Lilith's
"vagina dentata".
Comparisons of the film's imagery to James Cameron's /Aliens/ is
inevitable, and this introduces some interesting intertextualities, since
/Aliens/ seems to have been inspired in some ways by Heinlein's original
/Starship Troopers/ novel. The Troopers wear very similar helmets and
armour to the Marines in /Alien/, and the aliens in the two films move and
behave in the same insect-like fashion. Indeed, one of the Marines in
/Aliens/ asks whether the mission they are on is going to be "just another
bug hunt". The scenes in /Starship Troopers/ where the subterranean
tunnels are being explored bear a strong resemblance to Cameron's film,
even to the point of a wounded soldier being left behind by his companions
with a live grenade in order to take some of the enemy out with him when 
it goes off. The soft sponginess of the brain-bug also echoes the spongy
egg-laying apparatus of the alien queen in /Aliens/. There are other
equally loose similarities to be found in the way in which the soldiers
are strapped into their "drop ships" (called the same in both films) and
in the soldiers' explorations of a human "last stand" against the aliens
in both films (incidentally, both films also have powers-that-be
deliberately exposing humans to the alien menace for the sake of
scientific research). 
Dismemberment also provides strong images in both films, with /Starship
Troopers'/ bugs literally tearing humans limb from limb in the same way
that the Alien Queen dismembers Bishop near the end of /Aliens/. Many of
the older characters in /Starship Troopers/ also have missing limbs which
serve as a permanent reminder of their encounters with the bugs, as the
dismembered doll's head that Newt carries around with her reminds her of
hers.
Really, there's not much more to say about this film. Being as
tongue-in-cheek and caricaturish as it is, there is little in the way of
script, acting, or direction that can be discussed in any depth. Suffice
to say, then, that /Starship Troopers/ is an enjoyable, although
predictable, film that doesn't take itself too seriously. If you're
looking for serious drama, clever satire, or light entertainment, this
isn't the place to look, but if you enjoy B-grade sci-fi action laced with
traces of political cynicism, this is definitely worth a look. 

Author
Scott Renshaw
STARSHIP TROOPERS
(Tri-Star)
Starring:  Casper Van Dien, Dina Meyer, Denise Richards, Jake Busey, Neil
Patrick Harris, Michael Ironside, Clancy Brown, Patrick Muldoon.
Screenplay:  Ed Neumeier, based on the novel by Robert A. Heinlein.
Producers:  Alan Marshall and Jon Davison.
Director:  Paul Verhoeven.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, gore, nudity, sexual situations)
Running Time:  129 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Devotees of Robert A. Heinlein, be forewarned:  Paul Verhoeven's
STARSHIP TROOPERS is less an adaptation of Heinlein's novel than it is a
literary satire.  The author's jingo-all-the-way militarism and his
tendency to create plastic characters with plastic conflicts had me
expecting a soulless, faceless parade of carnage from the film version.
And I suppose that's exactly what Verhoeven delivers, with sometimes
hilarious results.  Heinlein's basic motifs are so faithfully rendered
that their flaws become a source of amusement, while their strengths
become the stuff of high-energy entertainment.
     Outlining the plot of STARSHIP TROOPERS is a fairly silly endeavor,
since it's basically a Big Bug Hunt...ALIENS in broad daylight.  Sometime
in the future, humanity is threatened by giant, malevolent insects which
have evolved into twenty-foot-tall action figures (arachnids with
super-impaling spikes, beetles that spew forth lava, dragonflies with
guillotine legs).  Among those who sign on to save the earth are a group
of high school classmates from Buenos Aires:  conflicted rich kid Johnny
Rico (Casper Van Dien); his math whiz girlfriend Carmen (Denise Richards);
Dizzy (Dina Meyer), who secretly carries a torch for Johnny; and Carl
(Neil Patrick "Doogie Howser" Harris), who not-so-secretly carries a torch
for Dizzy, and also has a talent for speaking telepathically to ferrets.
While Carmen heads for flight school and Carl joins military intelligence,
Johnny and Dizzy become mobile infantry, their various battles
intertwining with romantic sub-plots out of a third season episode from
"Beverly Hills 90210."
     So if STARSHIP TROOPERS is another movie where one-dimensional
characters wade through trite situations on their way to killing a bunch
of aliens, what makes it any better than, say, INDEPENDENCE DAY, a movie
where one-dimensional characters waded through trite situations on their
way to killing a bunch of slightly different aliens?  For one thing, you
sense that the film-makers are aware of the pulp nonsense they have as
source material.  The very absence of major stars in the cast feels
thematically appropriate, not just fiscally prudent.  If STARSHIP TROOPERS
had been turned into a TV-movie, Aaron Spelling would have produced it.
It's a story which requires emoting, not acting; it's a prime time soap
opera with big guns, played for all the dopey melodrama it's worth.
     The no-name cast also plays into Verhoeven's treatment of Heinlein's
most controversial conceit.  In this society, we learn, one can only be a
full citizen after completing some sort of federal service, military for
most.  Verhoeven pays the notion plenty of lip service, then proceeds to
skewer it with brilliant mock recruitment ads (named after the World War 
II-era "Why We Fight" series) in which youngsters are
indoctrinated into the joys of firearms, or the pleasures of stomping
cockroaches.  These characters really are just "fresh meat for the
grinder," as one character puts it, which makes their lack of familiarity
all the more fitting.  It's not that STARSHIP TROOPERS is anti-military,
because it never treats the true horror of war as anything but a great
big, violent video game.  In fact, the characters are living the
propaganda (particularly Johnny, who receives so many field promotions he
may not remember his own rank by the time the film ends).  Verhoeven is
actually having it both ways -- he's making fun of gung-ho boosterism even
as he fires his fresh-faced recruits into battle on a gung-ho booster
rocket of visual effects.
     If that makes STARSHIP TROOPERS hypocritical, at least it's
enthusiastically staged hypocrisy.  There may not be a person worth
caring about in the whole film, but it moves like nobody's business.
Verhoeven stages some thrilling action sequences, sending swarms of bugs
after the anonymous grunts then having various body parts strewn about the
screen like landscaping.  It is that rare special effects blockbuster
which demonstrates a sense of pacing to match its budget; I was caught up
in the action enough
of the time that I wasn't perpetually groaning over the absence of real
human beings.  I wish I could find it in myself to work up more
outrage over the callous way humans are dispatched in STARSHIP TROOPERS,
but it didn't work out that way.  That would be punishing Verhoeven for
getting to the heart of his material.

Author
Steve Rhodes
     Director Paul Verhoeven, whose previous works include movies as
diverse as ROBOCOP and BASIC INSTINCT, takes an especially imaginative
and fresh approach to science fiction with his new film STARSHIP
TROOPERS.  With a seamless blend of numerous movie genres, this
audacious film is part space adventure, part combat movie, part
newsreel footage, part romance and part military recruitment film.
     The beauty of the picture is that the script by Edward Neumeier,
loosely based on the Robert A. Heinlein novel, never takes itself
seriously.  Although full of the realistic gore of any war, the tone of
the picture is upbeat, and Jost Vacano's cinematography and Allan
Cameron's sets are bright and cheerful.  Watching the film is just
flat-out fun.
     The movie's four leads (Casper Van Dien and Dina Meyer as infantry
grunts Johnny Rico and Dizzy Flores and Denise Richards and Patrick
Muldoon as pilots Carmen Ibanez and Zander Barcalow) seem cast for
their fashion model looks as well as their acting abilities.  The
handsome men have jutting jaws and great hair, and the beautiful women
have million dollar smiles and perky lips.  This conglomeration of
excessive beauty is one of the film's many jokes -- sort of fraternity
brothers and sorority sisters go to war.
     All of the actors in the movie are so likable and are having so
much fun blasting bugs that their excitement become infectious.  The
energy level and the enthusiasm for these young warriors was palpable
in the audience at my screening.  (The not-to-be-missed coed shower
scene manages to be exuberant rather than tawdry as the troops exchange
banter.)
     "Young people all over the globe are joining up to save the
future," announces the effusive opening newsreel.  In a scene lifted
out of TRIUMPH OF THE WILL, young people tell why they've joined up to
fight the alien bugs that threaten our existence.
     The story switches to the year before as we see the aforementioned
kids at school.  Everything is different in the future including
biology.  The kids have to dissect bugs three feet in diameter whose
gooey intestines are straight out of ALIENS.  Again, the good-spirited
fun prevails in this and every scene so that what might normally gross
one out doesn't.
     When they graduate, the kids sign up to join the military, known
as the Federal Service.  Clancy Brown is great as Sgt. Zim, the
tougher-than-tough drill instructor for the grunts at boot camp.  One
kid complains that he doesn't see the need to learn knife fighting in a
world where you can press a button and fire a nuke.  Sgt. Zim
demonstrates the flaw in that argument by throwing a knife into the
kid's hand, pinning it to the wall and thus demonstrating how the kid's
finger is now inoperable.  The action is hard-edged but the
light-hearted tone of the film keeps it from ever becoming oppressive.
     When a meteor is shot out of orbit with bug plasma and thus
destroys millions of people on earth, the earth declares war on the
planet with the alien bugs.  Soon, a newsreel shows what the locals are
doing to help, right down to kids stomping on earth-based little bugs.
There are also interviews with survivors of the meteor attack, which
include the classic line, "The only good bug is dead bug."  The
newsreel ends with the rhetorical question, "Everyone is doing their
part.  Are you?"
     The battle scenes are phenomenal, both for the realistic and
clever special effects and for the humor.  When our troops land on the
hostile planet, a reporter is at the front to interview the troops live
on camera as the battle rages.  "It's an ugly planet, a bug planet, a
planet hostile to life as," says the interviewee who is chopped into
pieces by a bug before he can finish his sentence.  Unfazed, the
reporter keeps on filming and then goes off to cover some other part of
the battle.  "Crisis for humankind," the newsreel later intones.
     When the rip-roaring adventure finally ends, you realize that the
show had plot holes as big as the bug holes in the movie, but you don't
care.  You've been fighting a war, and you've won!  The only letdown
comes when you get to the theater's dark parking lot and realize that
you are no longer in the Federal Service.  It's not the future any
longer.
     STARSHIP TROOPERS runs 2:09.  It is rated R for sex, nudity,
profanity, and gory violence.  The film would be fine for most
teenagers.

Author
Charles Simpson
Directed by Paul Verhoeven
Written by Ed Neumeier (based on the novel by Robert Heinlein)
Starring Casper Van Dien, Dina Meyer, Denise Richards, Neil Patrick
Harris,
         Michael Ironside
Seen at: AMC Old Pasadena 8, Pasadena, CA (in SDDS)
Paul Verhoeven's last movie, SHOWGIRLS, had a bad script, bad acting,
and
a "plot" (I use the word in its loosest possible sense) that served only
to allow lots of sex and nudity. It stank. STARSHIP TROOPERS has a bad
script, bad acting, and a "plot" that serves only to allow lots of
violence and gore. It stinks.
Nobody will watch this movie for the plot, but here's a brief synopsis
anyway. Some friends straight out of high school sign up for the Federal
Reserve (armed forces) at a time when evil bugs from the planet Klendathu
are sending meteors towards Earth from the other side of the Galaxy.  After
one slips through the defences and destroys Buenos Aires (the home city of
the main characters), war is declared. This involves sending the grunts,
who include Johnny Rico (Van Dien) and Dizzy (Meyer), down to the surface
of the bugs' planet. Much carnage ensues. The troops are withdrawn and
sent to another planet to answer a distress call. More carnage ensues.
After being rescued, their plans are changed to capture a "brain bug"
which is believed to be controlling the aliens' battle plans (look, I
didn't write this, OK?). Yet more carnage ensues. Get the picture?
Interspersed throughout all this are brief "ads" from the Federal Network,
which present the picture of a neo-fascist state, much like in
Verhoeven's ROBOCOP.
There are many problems with STARSHIP TROOPERS. The plot, where one exists
to drive the movie onwards, is silly. Harris (star of TV's Doogie Howser,
MD) is presented with a psychic ability to talk to his ferret early on in
the movie, apparently so we will accept his ability to mind-meld with a
"brain bug" later on. In addition, the first thirty minutes of the movie
(until the characters sign up for service) drag on like a bad episode of
Beverly Hills, 90210. The characters are one-dimensional, so much so, that
when Dizzy is killed, she says it's OK because she got to sleep with Rico.
I had hoped that Verhoeven's use of a no-name cast would allow him to kill
off several of the lead characters to surprise the audience, but such an
idea appears to have escaped him. The dialogue is embarassing and isn't
helped by the frequently terrible delivery (I almost burst out laughing
when Harris delivered his speech about the need to sacrifice a few hundred
people for the good of the species). Finally, the fake "ads" become a
nuisance. Although they evoke the propaganda of the WWII-era Movietone
reels (as presumably they are meant to), their complete lack of subtlety
blunts their effect.
Some people will say all of that's irrelevant -- the movie hinges on the
battle scenes. So what about those battle scenes? Well, I admit the
effects are good -- the bugs move about quite convincingly, especially
when they have been deprived of a few of their limbs. And people have
their brains blown out, their limbs cut off, and their bodies ripped in
two in quite impressive ways. But this is my problem. The entertainment
value of the film rests almost entirely on its graphic portrayal of gore,
and its continous attempt to gross us out (starting early on when
Richards' character vomits on-screen). Verhoeven appears to be trying to
make a movie employing the elements that made a ROBOCOP a success, but
fails spectacularly. While ROBOCOP had a message about the importance of
being human, and gave the bad guys some motivation, STARSHIP TROOPERS
lacks even these simple features. When the brain bug sucks out a
character's brain near the end of the film, it's merely an analogy for
what the film has done to us.
This film is full of graphic violence and is not suitable for children
under 16.

Author
Colin Ryono
One of my dominant thoughts upon entering the theater to see "Starship
Troopers" was what I had read from an anonymous Internet writer: "There is
enough action in this movie to make two movies, one named 'Starship,' the
other 'Troopers'."  And this is more-or-less the case--in part.  But
action does not a movie make.  Perhaps it does for the teenage generation,
but as in action movies (as in any genre), I do not need my intelligence
insulted.  One, of course, must not have high expectations upon going into
a action movie (especially one with this title), but when it breaches a
barrier of mindlessness, another part of me takes over. 
The cast consists of a generation of cocky teenagers (portrayed by
cardboard-cutout, dime-a-dozen, television-show drop-outs), each with the
depth of a single sheet of paper.  One does indeed get the feeling of a
"90210 Meets Aliens" several times throughout the picture; the cast is
saturated with 90210 and Melrose Place denizens.  
hese kids are sent off to fight a war in distant planets against "bugs,"
huge armored orgami-like creatures, seemingly unintelligent to the Earth.
These kids want to fight, they are enticed to fight by somewhat amusing
propoganda blurbs on television.  This latter part might be viewed as some
sort of satire --but satirizing what and to what purpose?  Mindless
emotionless war-machine ethic?  It doesn't deserve that much credit.  And
certainly not to advance the plot, which I might add, is mostly
non-existant.
One saving grace of this movie are the action scenes that are literally
mind-blowing.  The intense battles between the aliens and the troopers had
me pinned back in my seat.  Decapitations are rampant, gore litters the
screen, and if it's patented action-movie rhetoric like "C'mon maggots!
You wanna live forever?!" that you're needing, this movie has plenty of
it.  There are some degrees of originality as well.  The aliens are all
claws as far as I could see, and I liked what I saw.   Compliments to the
Special Effects crew and art direction of this movie as well; it is hard
to go wrong with futuristic sci-fi effects given today's tech
advancements, but there are some clever visuals.  In fact, the visual
effects supervisor was Phil Tippet, who started his career on a little
film called "Star Wars."  
A favorite of director Paul Verhoven ("Total Recall," "Robocop"), Michael
Ironside is decent enough in tough-as-nails Patton-esque leader role and
his sharp barks of dialogue invigorate the dull moments.  Same goes for
Clancy Brown (the Head Guard from "Shawshank Redemption") as the Drill
Sargeant from Hell.  
But at the same time, some of their "borrowing" is blatant and it seems
that they would know better and steer their action to new, more unique
levels.  At one point, Johnny Rico (Casper Van Dien) jumps on a back of a
particularly large bug, tears open its flesh with his gun, throws a
nuclear grenade in, and leaps off to safety.  And did anyone else in the
audience besides me (while half hooted and applauded) that what they just
saw was virtually Luke's triumph over the AT-AT on Hoth in "Empire Strikes
Back?" 
The "Starship" part of the movie is at times painful to watch, most
dominantly because it involves only three characters and each is more
inept than the other.  Ditzy pilot Carmen Ibanez (Denise Richards) seems
that she would be better suited back at Melrose Place; she is awkwardly
out-of-place and her acting ability is simply limited to: happy, sad,
surprised.  Neil Patrick Harris (Doggie Howser himself) is thankfully
limited to a few short scenes, but he wins the Golden Raspberry for Most
Unintentionally Hilarious Dialogue.  
The dialogue suffers from cliche way-too-often--as in constantly.  A
futuristic science fiction movie should have engaging dialogue--"Starship
Troopers" should have either hammed their character up a lot more or tried
harder to make the in-between drama geniunely emotional.  To compare, a
mindless, comic book movie like "Con Air" this summer had clever (often
witty) dialogue to take ones mind off its overall dumbness.  There is no
such relief in this movie.  
It is neither funny and the scenes where they do (somehow) seem to be
striving for pure emotional drama don't work at all.  It's not all
cornball either; I could have sworn that at times they actually wanted us
to care some for the characters.  This movie contains the most poorly
constructed love story sidebar I've ever seen on the big screen and I am
dying to tell you what one of the character says upon their death, but I
don't want to spoil the laugh for you.  It was written by Edward Neumeier,
who is (I stress) unbelievably the same person who wrote the very
well-done original "Robocop."  
It is true that the purpose of action movies is to entertain and little
else.  Yet, there are multitudes of sci-fi and action films that can
entertain with a spark of intelligence on the side.  I found myself
uncomfortably shifting in my seat whenever the action scenes ended and the
mind-numbing dialogue began again.  "Starship Troopers" has action in
plenty, and may I emphasize that it's good at it...what it doesn't have is
any intelligent dialogue or worthwhile lead characters in between these
rampaging action segments.  If you are looking for an science fiction epic
or even for that crucial intelligent side, my best advice is to look
elsewhere.  
STARS: *1/2 (one and a half stars)
------- End of forwarded message -------

Author
Alberto Farina
>From "Starship Troopers" I was expecting more or less a film
in the vein of "Robocop". That is, a SF movie which could both
deliver good wham-bang action (with that kind of excessive and
cartoonish carnage I occasionally enjoy) and a deeper and sharp
satire on a number of issues such as militarism, consumerism,
xenophobia, media power, economic force and so on. I still rate
"Robocop" as the best and the smartest SF movie of the 80s,
along with "Blade Runner" and closely followed by "Terminator"
and I was hoping Verhoeven would manage to do the trick again.
Nothing I read on the movie had given me reasons to expect a different
movie than that. But I'm sorry to admit the movie did not live up to
these expectations. It sure delivers on the level of popcorn fun, with
action sequences that were unlike anything I had seen before: the second
half of the movie, with the attacks of hordes of giant bugs to the fort
and the bloody duels between bugs and humans, went closer than anything
in achieving the powerful dynamism of the best superheroes comic
books... something movies always have had trouble in recapturing.
I can understand someone was taken aback by the massive gore
feast, but I don't blame Verhoeven for being coherent to his style.
It probably should have been up to Disney to market it as an adult
entertainment rather than the star-wars-like family show that one
would be led to expect from the trailers. But on this side -even if it
had annoying logic loopholes that you could not help but notice
(how about one of the characters -don't remember the name, she
was Casper Van Diem's love interest... you know, the pilot girl-
being pierced from one side to another by one of the giant bugs'
claws... then joining her friends in the fight and carrying heavy
weapons as if nothing had happened?)- I had fun.
On the other side, however, the movie seems to me much less
satisfying when it comes to the expected satirical edges. Although
I find it interesting that the movie plays as a Star Wars gone nasty
(the gore becoming a way to expose the hidden violence in the
George Lucas film, where entire planets were destroyed in a
clean and almost harmless-looking blast) I was expecting much
more than that. Verhoeven was brilliant in dressing up his actors
as nazis, as if he wanted us to root for them and yet be aware that
the humans' war is an imperialistic aggression (one of the journalists
in one of the hilarious TVnews footage mentions the fact the bugs'
aggressiveness was awakened by the earthlings' attack on their
planet). But the message was there only if you really looked for it
knowing what you can and should expect from that director.
The idea of being called "A Citizen" only if you had done your share
of military service is clever... although I have a feeling it comes from
Heinlein in the first place (but I haven't read the book yet, so I'm
just guessing). But it remains a suggestion and it is not developed in
any direction. It remains unclear what real Citizens have more than the
others... The Michael Ironside character -the pacifist teacher who
reappears halfway through the movie as an official in the army- is
at the very least underdeveloped and you get a feeling you're missing
valuable information there which could throw some light on why he
has so radically changed his mind.
Also underdeveloped is the only character that shows at least a hint
of depth beyond the two-dimensionality of the others... Dina Meier's
Dizzy is the only major character that you feel you'd be interested to
know more about. Also, Meier is the only face which does not make
her look like a close relative of Barbie and Ken... I would not be
surprised in seeing her coming up again with or without Verhoeven in
juicier roles... as it happened to one Sharon Stone before her...

Author
David Wilcock
Starring Casper Van Dien, Dina Meyer, Denise Richards, Jake
Busey and Michael Ironside
Paul Verhoeven's American movie career has certainly had its ups
and downs. Starting off with the excellent Robocop (1987) and
Total Recall (1990), he then started to give us terrible 'sex' films,
such as the stylish yet mediocre Basic Instinct (1992) and the
downright awful Showgirls (1995). So, he is obviously better at
directing action films, and Starship Troopers sees him return to
the action genre. Whether it is actually any good or not is
debatable.
The films opens well, with a twenty second newsreel telling us
about an attack from giant bugs (much like the classic B-movie
Them!), and showing us an entire squadron of soilders getting
mained, ripped apart, and generally dying in nasty ways. The film
then cuts to 'One year later', and this is where the problems begin.
The first problem is that the first thirty minutes of this film is more
like an episode of Beverly Hills 90210. We are introduced to the
characters, and the whole 30 minutes is like watching a very dodgy
afternoon soap. Anyway, Casper Van Dien plays Johnny Rico,
who wants to join the Starship Troopers so he can stay with his
girlfriend Carman, played by Denise Richards. Dina Meyer plays
Rico secret admirer, Dizzy, who also joins the Troopers, and
basically we see Rico and Carman being gooey with each other,
and Dizzy trying to get into bed with Rico.
The audience has to suffer this until the bugs destroy the whole of
Buenos Ares. War is declared, and Rico, Carman and Dizzy all go
and kick some alien butt. The plot is forgotten, the film forgets the
meaning of dialogue (e.g the dialogue is crap) and it just gets on
with the death, violence, and sex. 
The action scenes are good, with the bug special effects looking
very professional. However, after the 3rd bug attack, it all gets a
bit repetative. The main problems is that there is not enough
species of bugs. There are about five in this film, and only two do
anything intresting (the brain and tank bug) The rest are sadly dull.
However, the deaths in this film are suitably gory, with arms, heads
and legs getting ripped off, and even one unlucky person getting his
brains sucked out. The film isn't as violent as Total Recall, and
swearing is pratically non existent. This seems odd, as the first
thing I would say when a giant bug is heading towards me wanting
to rip me apart would defintely be "Oh f***!"
The cast (mainly a bunch of newcomers) are average, but this film
dosen't really require great performances. If I had to choose a best
performance, it would go to Michael Ironside (Scanners, Total
Recall) who is suitably hard-ass as Lt. Jean Rasczak. The special
effects, especially the larger bugs, are great, and the many
companies who contributed to the effects (including Industrial Light
& Magic) have done a great job. Sadly, though, the model heads
and hands look appaling fake, much like Total Recall. Why they
didn't use CGI is beyond me, as it would of looked much better
than the models the film uses.
Paul Verhoeven directs well, especially with the "Federal Interlink"
sequences, a series of televison 'adverts', something he pioneered
with in Robocop. The action is well directed, but the first 30
minutes are horribly done, almost directed like a television
programme. The screenplay, based on a book by Robert A.
Heinlein, is pretty bad, mainly because it set's up all these
characters, and then forgets about their backgrounds when the war
against the bugs actually begin.
Starship Troopers, then, although mostly fun, has some major
flaws that affect it. Perhaps if the first half hour had been cut, it
would of been more enjoyable. If you can get past this, and some
other dull parts during the war, you'll probably enjoy this film,
especially if you were looking for an outragesouly violent action
movie. Just don't expect a good script, a strong plot and
excitement straight from the start. Just about recommended.

Author
Paul-Michael Agapow
I couldn't wait for that smarmy little brunette to die.
It's the near future, shortly after the Californian invasion of Buenos 
Aires which looks like a live action version of "The Jetsons" done by 
the cast of "90210".  (Albeit with considerably less animation.)  Here 
our pearly-teethed teens are beset with those eternal problems of the 
spirit: Who will win the big football game?  Who shall I go to the 
prom with?  Shall I join the military, dress up as a Nazi and lay 
waste to the known universe?  Since Michael "Bad SF is my middle name" 
Ironside is playing their mono-handed Civics teacher, we can safely 
arrive at two conclusions: (1) We are in Bad Movie heaven, (2) 
Universe, bend over.
Sure enough, uber-Aryan Johnny Rico (played by that famous Argentinean 
actor Casper Van Dien) ends up in the grunts and is sent across to the 
next sound stage for routine bastardisation in Movie Cliche #253 (Boot 
Camp).  His friends show considerably more sense and join the 
technical branches.  Johnny's lust-thang Carmen (played by the noted 
Hispanic thespian Denise Richards) becomes a pilot, where she grins 
like a prom-queen on Prozac as she hurls around million-ton starships.  
Since their buddy Carl (that noted Latin artist Neil Patrick Harris, 
aka Doogie Howser) can tell his ferret to crawl up his mother's leg, 
he naturally gets put in charge of grand strategy.  Only Dizzy (the 
up-and-coming Spanish performer Dina Meyer, known for her subtle, 
tear-jerking performance alongside Keanu Reeves in "Johnny Catatonic") 
also joins the infantry.  You see, Johnny is her lust-thang and she 
realises that as soon as she sleeps with him, she can be killed off 
and leave the movie.
Time passes, although all too slowly for the audience.  Carmen 
realises Johnny has the IQ of toast and sends him a "Dear Johnny" 
letter.  Dizzy, in an attempt to precipitate her own demise, shows her 
breasts.  In a training exercise, Johnny accidentally gets a fellow 
marine killed.  The other recruits - willing to have their limbs 
broken, trachea crushed and be stabbed and shot at by their drill 
instructor - find Johnny's clumsiness unacceptable and start dropping 
out of the program.  (Or maybe it was his acting they find 
unacceptable.)  But before Johnny can follow suite, the dreaded alien 
bugs fart an asteroid across the galaxy and squish Buenos Aires.  
Although Johnny's parents look relieved just before they are crushed, 
everyone else knows it's time to kick some arthropod butt!
Johnny and his grunts are choppered out to the Bug homeworld, where 
the starships are threatened by bugs belching nuclear plasma into 
orbit.  (I swear, I am not making this up.)  But Carmen's serotonin 
levels are still wildly over par and, grinning like the widow of a 
recently dead rock star, she hauls her ship out of the way.  Johnny 
and Co are meanwhile demonstrating the dazzling power of future 
military tactics: dump a bunch of guys armed with M16s on a planet and 
get them to wander around in a tight pack until they are eaten and 
thus show how the monster works.  Sure 'nuff, the bugs show up and 
have far more charisma than the rest of the cast.  Demoralised, the 
marines retreat, leaving their less likeable colleagues to be eaten.
Digression 1: The Starship Troopers Drinking Game
- Sip whenever a limb is cut off.
- Quaff every time someone is cut in half.
- Sip whenever Diz lusts after Johnny.
- Quaff any time that smarmy little brunette smiles.
- Scull any time someone makes an heroic sacrifice.
The survivors are transferred to another unit, the 5th Generic Tough 
Hombres.  Quelle surprise - it's lead by Michael Ironside, still 
serving time in purgatory for "Highlander 2".  It seems they're 
getting sent to the poetically named "Planet P" to further the plot.  
But upon getting there, they are attacked by - giant mosquitoes!  (No, 
it's too terrible!)  Ironside makes Johnny promise to kill him should 
he ever be crippled.  Unfortunately Johnny doesn't reply, "If it comes 
to that, I'll do both of us."  The grunts come across a devastated 
firebase and a cowardly general.  He tells them that the bugs are 
sucking people's brains out (too late!)  and then gets eaten.  
Ironside has his legs chewed off by a bug and gets Johnny to kill him 
- not because he is crippled but because he is trapped in a crap film.  
Unfortunately Johnny doesn't cap the rest of the cast for equally 
debilitating mental injuries.  Subsequently, Dizzy gets chomped by a 
bug, because we got to see her breasts earlier on.
Back on the starship, they load Dizzy into a coffin and eject her into 
space so she can land on the Genesis planet and come back in the 
sequel "Starship Troopers 2: The Search for Plot".  Carmen struggles 
not to smile during the funeral, Dizzy's convenient death clearing the 
way for her and Johnny's lust-thang.  Then Doogie shows up, in full 
Gestapo regalia.  It now becomes clear why everyone looks like Nazis: 
the war is being run by geeks and geeky kids think that Nazi stuff is 
really cool.  Doogie explains he knew Johnny's team would be 
massacred, it was all part of the plan.  Johnny has no strong 
objections to this, illustrating a good reason why he is in the 
infantry and Doogie in command.  Anyway, the Doog-ster explains that 
since the bugs can launch asteroids from halfway across the galaxy and 
have them land right on top of cities, they must be intelligent.  
(Duh.)  So it's back to Planet P to catch a "brainbug".
Digression 2: Southpark Troopers
--------------------------------
Wouldn't this movie be all the more plausible if it was cheap 
animation and used the "Southpark" characters?
STAN:  Dude!  You're got a bug sucking your brains out!
CARTMAN:  I hate dat, da way dose bugs crawl up yo' ass and suck your 
   brains out.
KENNY:  Mi fnk ht d bgsar minhellgen.
KYLE:  Good point Kenny, there's probably a form of bug we haven't 
   seen yet, a brainbug.
BUG:  Arrrhhhhh!!!
STAN:  Oh my god!  They've killed Kenny!
Back they go to the disused quarries of Planet P. But Carmen and the 
faux competitor for her affections, Zander (hitherto known as 
"Deadmeat"), crash on the planet in the middle of the attack.  They 
are captured by the bugs and before Carmen can explain her "don't 
worry, be happy" philosophy to the insects, they suck Zander's brain.  
Johnny gives a stirring speech that they can't just go and rescue her, 
because the attack is too important.  He then goes and rescues her.  
Meanwhile the other troops have caught the brainbug.  And who better 
to mindmeld with a giant slug than Doogie Howser!  He does the Spock 
thang and announces that the brainbug is afraid.
Digression 3: Five Military SF Books That Would Make Better Films
Humour mode off.  There will undoubtedly be those who will defend 
"Starship Troopers" by saying that it is a comedy.  Certainly there 
are moments that are intended to be funny, but it is no more a comedy 
than "Total Recall" or "Robocop".  Similarly, some may say that the 
future depicted is meant to be dystopian and terrible.  The lie is put 
to this by again invoking Verhoeven's other two SF films.  Both of 
them depicted unpleasant regimes, even ones with which the characters 
cooperated and supported.  But the heroes never liked their worlds, 
nor showed it as a viable or desirable one.  If Verhoeven is 
attempting to be satirical, he fails utterly and my suspicion is that 
he is attempting to have it both ways, to both laugh at and cheer the 
fascist, testosterone-poisoned, gungho histrionics.  The situation is 
not helped by a wooden cast that can only aspire to being B-grade, 
dialogue that gives the word "cliche" a bad name, and a plot that 
could be second guessed by undiscovered tribes in the Phillipine 
jungles.
"Starship Troopers" is possibly the worst SF movie ever made [0/bomb], 
a leprous turd of a film that's so horribly demented that it 
immediately is assumed into the pantheon of Truly Bad Movies, with a 
crassness score of 4 Lamberts.  In fact it is so terrible that you 
should rush out and see it now because you will not believe how bad it 
is.  Tuberculosis on the Sid and Nancy scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@computer.org), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."
Archived at 

Author
Alex Fung
STARSHIP TROOPERS (TriStar - 1997)
Starring Casper Van Dien, Dina Meyer, Denise Richards, Jake Busey,
  Neil Patrick Harris, Clancy Brown, Seth Gilliam, Patrick Muldoon,
  Michael Ironside
Screenplay by Ed Neumeier, based on the novel by Robert A. Heinlein
Produced by Jon Davison, Alan Marshall
Directed by Paul Verhoeven
Running time: 129 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned.
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   I screened STARSHIP TROOPERS at a theatre in Ottawa that, to me, had
   a rather unusual policy -- while an earlier-scheduled screening ran,
   ticketholders for a later screening of the film were queued *directly
   outside* the screening room, in the lobby, until the completion of
   the current screening.  (For all I know, this may be standard
   practice elsewhere, but I've never encountered this before -- usually
   they don't allow you to loiter in the theatre, based on my
   experience).  Consequently, I patiently waited along with a growing
   queue of patrons outside the screening room for STARSHIP TROOPERS,
   where the last fifteen minutes of the film could be heard echoing
   throughout the hall -- all that I could make out were nonstop alien
   insectoid squeals and roars, the shouting of troops under siege,
   sporadic bursts of gunfire, and a suitably heroic anthem playing.
   This aural experience essentially encapsulates the latter (and,
   disturbingly enough, superior) half of Paul Verhoeven's STARSHIP
   TROOPERS, which in spirit is essentially a B-film with a mega
   A-budget (a reported $120 million).  The film's final action-packed
   hour is complete carnage, as the human troops do battle with gigantic
   alien insects of all shapes and sizes on the planet of Klendathu.
   While the bug battle scenes are neither fresh nor inventive, they are
   relatively exciting to watch, and the visual effects are spectacular.
   It's the first half of STARSHIP TROOPERS which is the most unbearably
   excruciating to endure.
   Although both are science-fiction films, in a sense STARSHIP TROOPERS
   is a literal antithesis of Andrew Niccol's GATTACA, released two
   weeks earlier: while the latter film is more cerebral in nature,
   concerned more with ideas than special effects, and has an icy sheen,
   STARSHIP TROOPERS is loud, noisy, and throbbing with comicbookish
   machismo.
   Yet STARSHIP TROOPERS is not a mindless film merely depicting giant
   beasts to be slain in heroic fashion.  The film has a subtext which
   is strictly militaristic, and depicted in tongue-in-cheek fashion by
   Mr. Verhoeven.  In this totalitarian society of the future, the
   esteemed title of "citizen" is earned through a rite of passage in
   military duty, while "civilians" are looked upon condescendingly.
   STARSHIP TROOPERS' gung-ho protagonists are remarkably bloodthirsty
   --consider that in this film, unlike most sci-fi films, it's the
   humans who are the invaders, and witness the relish in his voice and
   charged bloodlust in his eyes as the aptly-named Johnny Rico (Casper
   Van Dien) directly addresses the camera with "I say we kill them
   all!" or the sheer excitement of the recruits as the outbreak of war
   is declared.  STARSHIP TROOPERS pokes fun at the war-is-fun,
   ultra-macho killing mentality by wholeheartedly embracing it -- it
   has a goofy rah-rah jingoistic feel that would do Roland Emmerich
   proud; the scene where our protagonists proudly pose with their new
   "Death From Above" tattoos emblazoned on their biceps speaks volumes.
   Indeed, what can one say about a film where a declaration of "It's
   afraid!" is greeted by a chorus of cheers?  (I'm not even going to
   touch thetopic of the Nazi-style uniforms sported by the troopers,
   most prominently by Carl Jenkins (Neil Patrick Harris).)
   That this undertone will likely be lost to the majority of STARSHIP
   TROOPERS' audience is not due to subtlety; the film hardly buries
   this theme, and is often blatant in its representation.  It's simply
   that this message is being pitched in a context where its usage is
   mostly ineffectual and in some cases even appears apt.  While shots
   of little children cheerfully stomping on insects will cause
   chuckles, scenes of the troopers' homicidal tendencies being stirred
   up prior to engaging in battle will have the effect of similarly
   enticing the us-versus-them, xenophobic mentality of many in the
   audience.
   The film opens with a teaser sequence on the alien planet as chaos
   and mayhem ensues, and the bodycount skyrockets courtesy of the
   bloodthirsty insects overrunning and essentially decimating the
   human contingent.  Much has been made of the film's violence, which
   is admittedly brutal but not overly so -- it's much along the same
   aesthetic as Mr. Verhoeven's ROBOCOP, which featured blood spurting
   out of wounds; here, we have impalement by insectoid pincers,
   decapitations, and bodies torn apart limb from limb, but none of it
   is excessively gory as STARSHIP TROOPERS spends little time to linger
   or dwell upon it, instead determinedly charging forward.
   The action gives way as STARSHIP TROOPERS employs the groanworthy
   "One year earlier" device, and we rejoin the film's protagonists in a
   more peaceful setting -- high school graduation day, Earth.  (Buenos
   Aires actually, although before it was revealed in the film, I would
   have never guessed -- I thought it was Beverly Hills.)  Yes, our
   heroes are fresh-faced youngsters, and for the first half of the
   film we're to endure their dopey generic tribulations: amorous
   rivalry, parental strife, and so forth.  It's so remarkably campy
   and simple-minded that it makes the cliched, paper-thin characters
   of INDEPENDENCE DAY look like inspired screenwriting.  STARSHIP
   TROOPERS' first hour is complete cornball material -- with these
   youthful pretty faces, it's like having the cast of MELROSE PLACE
   serving as our grizzled warriors against the alien marauders.  (New
   troopers introduced later in the film seem to be have been enlisted
   straight out of SWEET VALLEY HIGH and drafted from THE BABYSITTERS'
   CLUB.)  I shun television so I can avoid corny, eye-roll-inducing
   melodrama like this, so an hour's worth of it in a feature film
   doesn't exactly inspire high marks with me; are we supposed to care
   at all about these characters and their silly love lives?  (I later
   learned that much of the young cast have indeed appeared in the
   various Aaron Spelling TV productions -- egad.)  There's an exchange
   between Johnny Rico and fellow trooper Ace Levy (Jake Busey) where
   Ace sympathetically clucks, "They want to be friends after they tear
   your guts out."  Johnny sadly retorts, "I *deserve* to get my guts
   torn out."  In the audience, I silently agreed -- surely somebody
   other than those in the audience deserved to suffer for the
   aggravating first hour of STARSHIP TROOPERS.  It's exasperating
   enough to make one stifle an anguished scream.  Barely stifle.
   After an interlude which features perhaps the worst use of Mazzy
   Star's "Fade Into You" that one can possibly imagine and some
   obligatory nude scenes from self-professed breast fetishist Mr.
   Verhoeven, our protagonists find themselves in fierce battle with
   spectacularly-rendered giant insects on a barren alien world.  The
   insectoid marauders look terrific, although the manner in which they
   are ultimately dispatched is familiar stuff and their
   indestructibility and ferociousness varies depending upon the
   necessity of the plot.  Nevertheless, the sight of thousands of
   computer-generated insects scurrying forth in attack formation is
   breathtaking, while the space battle scenes in orbit around Klendathu
   is solid if not outstanding work.
   After the first attack by the troopers has been thoroughly trounced
   by the defending aliens, they conclude that there must be a a "smart"
   bug masterminding the insectoid military strategy, and STARSHIP
   TROOPERS ultimately focuses on the protagonists targeting this unseen
   entity.  That this bug is deemed "smart" because the human
   interlopers were simply too stupid to bomb down the planet before
   pulling their commando-style raid seems to have been overlooked --
   hasn't anything been learned from the Gulf War?  (The bug also
   appears to be "smart" because it enjoys brain milkshakes and
   literally absorbs knowledge from its victim -- how inventive.)
   While I haven't seen much of Paul Verhoeven's Dutch film output from
   the 1970s and early 1980s, I've seen nearly all of his
   English-language work and his 1987 film ROBOCOP is my favourite from
   his oeuvre -- a fine sci-fi action film which works both as pure
   visceral entertainment, and also on a more philosophical level.  (I
   admittedly haven't seen his SHOWGIRLS, but I feel fairly safe in
   assuming that it won't challenge for the top spot on his resume.)
   STARSHIP TROOPERS marks somewhat of a reunion for many of the key
   players in the making of ROBOCOP: prolific Basil Poledouris composed
   an anthemic score which vaguely echoes that for the 1987 film,
   cinematographer Jost Vacano's photography is crisp and sharp, and
   screenwriter Ed Neumeier once again sprinkles various amusingly
   satiric news/propaganda insert clips throughout the film which
   depict the state of this future society -- it's striking and telling
   how much these blurbs resemble old WWII propaganda footage in tone
   and spirit.  Hey, I'd buy that for a dollar!
   Barring these satiric interludes, this is not a great screenplay,
   full of cornball B-film cliches, such as an impossible heroic
   survival of an attack which leaves the rest of the cast presuming
   that he's perished, and noble deathbed gestures and proclamations.
   This is the kind of script where when a character declares, "I'd
   expect any one of you to do the same for me", you know it's because
   someone will have to, and where when you see Johnny Rico perform
   a triple flip in a football game, it's merely a matter of time
   before the same maneuver is used at a fortuitous moment in the film.
   Among the cast, Michael Ironside (who appeared in Mr. Verhoeven's
   TOTAL RECALL) and Clancy Brown are the two brights spots as
   characters they often play elsewhere, and play well -- Mr. Ironside
   as the humourless, tough-as-nails Lieutenant Rasczak, and Mr. Brown
   as drill sergeant Zim (echoing his best performance in Frank
   Darabont's THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION as the tough screw prison guard).
   None of the rest of the cast makes much of an impression (although
   Mr. Van Dien is, as of this writing, now getting seven-figure deals
   for future projects), though Denise Richards acts in the film as if
   she's auditioning for a toothpaste commercial.
   Standing outside that screening room in Ottawa, I observed the
   reactions of the patrons exiting -- most had a little goofy grin,
   glazed eyes, and a slightly dazed expression on their face.  There
   was, however, one guy who burst through the screening room doors
   shouting to anyone who would listen, "It sucks!  It sucks!"  Although
   I would neither be that dramatic nor severe, I could somewhat see
   his point -- particularly if he had burst out of the theatre after
   an hour, instead of two.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"I'll never forget you.  You're too weird."
        - David Krumholtz, ADDAMS FAMILY VALUES

Author
Steve Kong
Starship Troopers is one of the most anticipated winter releases this year.
 It is a movie that has a whole lot of special effects and hole worth of a
story.  The current thought running through the heads of studio executives
in Hollywood seems to be: Spend a large portion of the movie budget on
special effects, whatever is left, use it to hire some B-list actors.
Unfortunately, that is what happened with Starship Troopers, it seems that
a large portion of the movie's budget went into creating the incredible
special effects and not enough went into hiring some good actors and maybe
a good screenwriter.  I'll admit, the special effects in Starship Troopers
are spectacular.  From the swarms of bugs running across the desert to the
huge transport ships, these are top-notch special effects, eye candy to say
the least.  Very impressive.  What isn't impressive though is the script
and the actors hired for the film.
In the late future, bugs from across the galaxy attack us by slinging
asteroids at Earth.  On Earth, in Buenos Aires, a group of teens are just
graduating from high school.  All of them want to join up with the
Federation and go off to fight the bugs.  This tight group of teens include
Johnny Rico (Casper Van Dien), Dizzy Flores (Dina Meyer), Carmen Ibanez
(Denise Richards), and Carl Jenkins (Neil Patrick Harris, Doogie Howser).
Rico and Flores are sent off to become Mobile Infantry, the people that go
ground zero against the bugs.  Ibanez is sent off to become a pilot and
Jenkins goes off to read bug minds.
The movie is split into two halves.  The first hour is a cheezy
melodramatic rehash of most every episode of 90210 shown.  Complete with
bad dialogue, bad acting, and slow pace.  The second half is a visceral and
violent hour-long action sequence.  
The first half is plain awful.  We get to see teens fighting with their
parents, teens fighting amongst themselves, and a love triangle.  When the
teens finally get sent off to boot camp we get a gratuitous nude scene when
co-ed privates shower together.  Nothing in the first half really amounts
to anything.
The second half is a guilty pleasure for me.  It is very well done, though
it does get old quickly.  The bugs attacking are just amazing and the
interaction between the bugs and humans are seamless.  The problem that
makes it get old quickly?  Repetition.  The hour is a cycle: Humans attack,
bugs counter attack, humans retreat, start over again.  At first it is
great fun, then it goes down hill.
Paul Verhoven of Robocop, Total Recall, Basic Instinct, and Showgirls fame
seems to want to mix the genres of those four movies in Starship Troopers.
We get violence in such a dose that we become numb to it.  We get sarcastic
news broadcasts taken completely from Robocop, but do less, which try to be
wry and funny, but come off making the movie look cheap.  We get a dose of
nudity and some sex in the battlefield.  Verhoven seems to be having a
streak of bad luck with his last few films and Starship Troopers doesn't
help to bring him out of this streak either.
The script doesn't do well either.  When the second half came rolling in
and I saw how the bugs fought, the questions started to roll in my head.
Why don't the future space Marines have heavy artillery?  What happened to
tanks or helicopters?  Why not nuke the bugs?  Why send in lightly armored
soldiers when you could have so many other options that would have saved
the lives of the many troops sent in?  Easy, a sloppy script that doesn't
take into account logic.  There wouldn't be a movie if any of my
suggestions were taken into account and this could only mean one thing for
the script writer, Edward Neumeier, he'd have to use his head and write a
smart script.
The actors are all pretty bland.  Of the four main characters only one had
a performance that I enjoyed and that was Dina Meyer (Dragon Heart).  I
hope to see Meyer in more films soon.  She gives a good performance in
Starship Troopers and is the only character for which I did care for on the
screen.  Of the minor characters Michael Ironside, Jake Busey, and Clancy
Brown give good performances.  All of the other actors give mediocre to bad
performances.
One more thing, the bugs in Starship Troopers are not as scary as the
Alien.  I had talked to a friend about this earlier on, I feel that the
bugs in Starship Troopers are not as scary because they are not as smart as
they should be.  They swarm and attack with not a single thought on tactic.
 But, this seems right since the majority of the attacks are by the
"worker" bugs.  But then you look at the Alien and it is the same "worker"
alien that is hunting out the humans, stalking them and killing them
intelligently.  Yes, the bugs in Starship Troopers are scary, but in the
long run, they are just stupid bugs.  The Alien is a more thought out
creature and is, for me, a smarter and scary foe.
Turn off your brain and sit back.  The first half is pretty bad and the
second half comes close to redeeming the film.  Starship Troopers is fun at
times, but just sickening at others.  This is definitely not a film for the
kids, there are heavy doses of violence and death, then there are the sex
and the nudity scenes.  Starship Troopers is not a strong movie.  The only
thing that it has going for it are the special effects and even then that
is only the second half of the film.  I find it hard to recommend Starship
Troopers, but I will because of the action in the second half of the film.
Though, see it during a matinee showing or on video.

Author
Doug Skiles
Starring: Computer Generated Bugs And Lots Of 'Em, Plus A Lot Of People
You've Never Heard Of And Let's Hope It Stays That Way
Directed by: Paul Verhoeven, Written by: Edward Neumeier, Based on the
novel by Robert A. Heinlein
Rated R by the MPAA for gratuitous nudity, gore everywhere, strong
language all over the place, and probably a lot of other stuff that
didn't need to be in there
Where do I begin?  Okay, how about with this: STARSHIP TROOPERS is one
of the worst movies to hit theaters in a long time.  In fact, it might
even be the worst *major* release film to come out in years... or even a
decade.  This is bad beyond belief.  I would *not* suggest paying money
to see this.  There's a good chance you'll regret it.  If you see it for
free, you could still want to walk out.  Go right ahead. 
The movie starts off with cheesy 90210 scenes set in the future world
of... Buenos Aires.  Here we meet the group of horrendously bad actors
and actresses playing obnoxious, easy-to-*despise*-with-a-passion
characters that have love triangles, love rectangles, and love hexagons
screwing up their life.  Before long they all go off and join the
military, primarily in the interest of having sex with the other
youngsters that joined.  They train.  They strut around nude for no
reason whatsoever.  After an hour of making the audience scream in
agony, they start fighting bugs.  The big bugs look nice, even though
their design is only "okay."  Unfortunately, the fights are boring since
we *want* all of the characters dead anyway.  Cue more agony.  Then some
characters have sex.  Then some more die.  ***Who cares???***  Cue more
agony.  The movie ends, the audience runs out to their cars, vomits over
the pavement, and attempts to drive home.  Unfortunately, after that
torture, they can't think straight, don't pay attention to the road, and
many are in ugly car wrecks. 
You remember how BATMAN & ROBIN was bad?  Well, BATMAN & ROBIN kicked
this movie's sorry butt, people.  STARSHIP TROOPERS does not succeed as
an action movie.  It does not succeed as a drama.  It does not succeed
as a war movie.  It does not succeed as a comedy.  It does not succeed
as a satire.  It does not succeed as a parody.  It succeeds as being
horrible.  Terrible.  Gut-wrenchingly bad.  I wanted to run away from
that movie every minute.  But I paid my money and I owed it to others to
see if the movie got any better.  So I stayed.  It never got better. 
Frequently, it did the impossible, and got *worse*.
The movie as written, acted, directed, and basically just feels as a
whole like it's about on the mental maturity level of a FREE WILLY 4. 
The whole thing feels like a movie that only three-year-olds could
enjoy... except for the ridiculously gratuitous blood and gore, and
pointless nudity.  It's written for little children, but children should
definitely *not* go anywhere near it.  Of course, I recommend the same
for everyone.  Don't go anywhere near it.     
Verhoeven's got a streak going now.  His last movie was SHOWGIRLS.  He
seems to be trying to see how bad his movies can get before people
finally stop coming.  SHOWGIRLS was a failure, but it appears that,
though it'll be lucky to make near its budget, this movie will still do
okay gross-wise.
Is it really *all* bad?  Well, no.  TROOPERS has about four or five
lines of dialouge/short humorous scenes that are actually funny, mostly
from the "Do you want to know more?" commercials that pop up throughout
the story, promoting the joys of the joining the troopers.  So that adds
up to about 30 seconds of entertainment and still about one hour, 59
minutes, and 30 seconds of miserable torture.
I'm totally confused as to the way that some people are really enjoying
this movie.  But I do admit it.  So, if you're willing to possibly put
yourself through torture, go ahead and see it, and decide for yourself
if you love it or hate it.  I don't know how anyone or any*thing* could
love this movie, but hey, to each his own.  Feel free to give it a
shot.  Of course, in the interest of saving your souls, I don't
recommend it.
But guess what?  ALIEN RESURRECTION comes out November 26th, and, having
already seen some of it and having read the script, I assure you that it
will blow pretty much everyone away.  Though opinion on STARSHIP
TROOPERS is reasonably split, it'll be difficult to find someone that
*won't* like ALIEN RESURRECTION when they've seen it.  This is possibly
the year's best intense action film, or at least *one* of the best.  If
you really want to see alien warfare that's played out intelligently and
seriously, see ALIEN RESURRECTION.  Please, avoid this.

Author
William Wallace
        Here is the problem with it. While it is generally faithful to
the novel, the future is brought up to date with the 1990s. Remember
this was a novel for young teens written in the 1950s. Therefore no
sex of any kind much less for teenagers. And not love triangles. It is
all comraderie. 
        It is not that the first half of the movie drags waiting for the
violence. It is that all the added scenes that set up the love
interests are not Heinlein's and frankly do not fit with the style of
the rest of it. While the rest of society might be permissive these
are the people who have chosen to become citizens and permissiveness
is contrary to the rest of the setting for the story. These are the
people you would expect to call for lashing for permissive sex. If
there is to be sex it is in the R&R section of the space station for
money. 
        The problem this modernization introduces is less emphasis on the
primary themes of the story as there is no time to tell it. The
opening civics lecture is the main theme of the story and it is way
too short. Development scenes for that lecture are missing such as the
man who had failed for the fifth time being taken out in a wheel chair
vowing to be back. Without this scene you get an impression it is all
for the young and no one can be washed out. 
        Where was the obligatory fat man with thick glasses trying his
best because of his desire to be a citizen? That desire in the war
movies was to kill Japs. There is no war as this starts. Instead they
all have bodies that look like they can not fail. Like they were the
only ones accepted where the only civil right guaranteed to the
non-citizen was the right to try as many times as he wanted. Only
citizens had guaranteed civil rights even though non-citizens
customarily had them. 
        And that is a problem as all of the training is physical, none
moral, none the real theme of the story. We see exactly two quits when
there should have been quits and washouts right and left. There is no
portrayal that becoming a citizen is the goal of vast majority of
society. We get the impression that it single point decision in life
of a minority. 
        So the modernizations do not fit and they are at the expense of
the original novel. That is important to see the motivation behind the
people in battle. 
        And the battles scenes do portray the type of people the
selection process of training is supposed to produce. But we do not
see them being produced or selected or learning dedication. 
        As to the guaranteed fun part of the movie, great. Not only from
the special effects, the pace, the events, but also attention to
detail. The first hole they nuke has fine special effects. One part of
it shows the flat earth jumping slightly delays. 
        With an extensive underground tunnel system that is what you
would expect. But if that had not been included it would not be
missed. With its inclusion, it is an attention to detail that is very
much appreciated. Similarly when the bugs attack the ground
fortification not only do they try to get over the walls but also
start tearing at the structural supports. It is unusual in any movie
of a siege where the attackers do more than one thing at a time. 
        Enough said. If the theaters only showed the second half twice in
a row they could sell as many seats. You will like it, unless you
believe violence never solves anything. 
        Yes there are technical problems. In combat training with live
ammunition when people are hit by their mock targets they lose control
of their bodies and fall to the ground. Of course they lose control of
their weapons and a predictable accident occurs. Helmet or no the face
is uncovered. It would have happened before. 
        This leads us to the cause of the above. In the original they
wore powered full body armor including face covering. But in a movie
everyone would look alike in body armor and then you can't tell the
heroes even with a scorecard. In Star Wars this was solved by Darth
Vader's fighter looking different than the others. This would have
required six different styles and still no facial expressions visible.
        There was also a thankful lack of bringing the novel up to date.
Given when it was written, air power was not used in support of ground
troops to any degree and ground troops didn't trust their own air
force not to shoot them by accident. AND the troops did not get air
support here either. 

Author
Marty Mapes
***1/2 (out of 4) The war in Vietnam changed the face of American war
movies for good. War movies now show the horror, futility, and irony of
nations fighting. But before, once upon a time, war was the heroic,
romantic proving grounds where boys became men. By providing an inhuman
enemy, STARSHIP TROOPERS is able to make war fun again.  
STARSHIP TROOPERS is not a science fiction movie; it is a war movie
(specifically, a WWII movie, according to effects-man Phil Tippett).
Like GATTACA, only its setting is futuristic, giving the movie a
science-fiction look and feel; the story itself breaks the sci-fi mold. 
What are the conventions of war movies? A big cast. Lots of characters
with names, not all of whom will survive. Caricatured people from
different walks of life coming together in the military. Clear class
demarcation between strategists, flyboys, and grunts. Big,
well-choreographed battle scenes. Characters growing from "boys" to
"men." The African-American infantryman dying first. War-inspired
racism. This movie has them all. 
Our heroes (Carmen [Denise Richards], Johnny [Casper Van Dien], Carl
[Neil Patrick Harris], and Diz [Dina Meyer]) are just graduating high
school, contemplating their futures in a world on the brink of war with
Klendathu, a planet of giant insects. There are many options - college,
professional athletics - but like in GONE WITH THE WIND, "joining up" is
the only real option to any self-respecting youth. Our side needs you;
all your friends will be joining up; it's the best way to prove yourself
a man; and besides, this is history in the making. Being the right age
at the right time in one of humanity's greatest moments is fate and
destiny and downright fun! 
To really spark the characters' (and the audience's) interest, slickly
made propaganda films (reminiscent of the commercials in Verhoeven's
ROBOCOP) call all red-blooded humans to action in the adventure of a
lifetime. Making it even more irresistible, things at home are untouched
by the war. None of the awful destructive reality of war discolors the
young people's enthusiasm for going off to kill the enemy. They're doing
it as much for fun and camaraderie as for duty (again, reminiscent of
GONE WITH THE WIND). 
The movie is really well made, and it's hard not to get caught up in the
thrill of going to war. But Verhoeven doesn't let us forget that the
emotional hype has a dark side to it. For example, a newsreel tells us
that a man is caught, tried for murder, convicted, and executed, all
within 12 hours. Another newsreel refers to a group of "Mormon
Extremists;" actually, they were hoping for a peaceful solution to the
war. Another newsreel encourages war racism among kids too young to
fight: cockroach stomping is a great way for little Johnny to feel like
he's really killing gooks, too. These subjects are awful, but they're
presented with all the enthusiasm of real propaganda films, and the
audience is hard-pressed not to give in to the emotion of the moment.
(That's why you should see this movie during a crowded show, not when
you're the only one in the theater.) 
The world of STARSHIP TROOPERS is an interesting place. Details about
military service, citizenship, and Earth history add to the satirically
dark tone of the movie, though not very subtly. For example, a civilian
(with no military service) is not a citizen, and can't vote. Democracy
failed and "the Veterans" took over politics. These details seem
unnecessary at first, but they help explain many of the characters'
motives and they further distance the audience from the war-glorifying
world on-screen. 
Clearly, this movie is intended as a special-effects blowout, and the
effects are indeed great. A bug stampede around the camera has all the
tense energy of a "real" stampede. Battle scenes at an abandoned
fortress are choreographed and edited masterfully (and they look like
BEAU GESTE and INTOLERANCE). But if you have a taste for film history or
for war movies, there is more to STARSHIP TROOPERS than
computer-generated insects. The special effects action is a great start,
but deeper, you can find lots of interesting commentary on war movies
and on war itself. 
A friend of mine once proposed that the nations of the world should set
aside some remote island to be used for war. Any young man who felt the
need to go off to kill and die in glorious battle could choose a side,
hop over to War Island and engage in battle until he grew up or until he
died. The rest of us could go about our lives unaffected. 
Really, that's what STARSHIP TROOPERS is all about. It gives itself
enough distance from reality so that our lives aren't really affected by
the horrors of war, and then it taps into that young-man eagerness for
life-or-death adventure. 
Intellectually, I can't really condone that message, but I have to admit
that this will be a guilty pleasure of mine for years to come.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Cheng-Jih Chen

This film is a brilliant dystopia, depicting a nightmare world in which
arena football has become the national pasttime.  
The arena football motif carries through the film, where we see, over
and over again, people we'd hope would be sensible do remarkably stupid
things.
OK.  Stop.  "Starship Troopers" is based -- I use this word loosely --
on Robert Heinlein's novel of the same name.  I'm not sure about the
history of science fiction, but this novel may have been the first to
coin the phrase "bug hunt," which we see most famously in "Aliens."
It's combat science fiction, centering on the actions of soldiers from
the future, who are recognizably types from today, only with bigger,
fancier guns and spiffier uniforms.
The film picks up the plot points and the names: there's a big battle,
where the humans get their asses kick.  Then there are other battles,
and finally, this "brain bug" is captured at the end, giving the humans
the key to victory.  Woo hoo!
The film, however, is just plain empty.  It skips through the novel's
plot points, but there's very little behind it beyond a massive special
effects budget -- the animated bugs make Jurassic Park's dinos look
like something we saw in King Kong (no, wait, they were things we saw
in King Kong) -- and the soap opera antics of the gruff foot soldier,
the dashing starship pilot (who, apparently, is named "Ace"), the woman
that they love, and this other woman who pines for the GFS.
The heart of the novel is its moral vision.  You may disagree strongly
with what Heinlein thinks, but you can't say that this novel isn't
animated by his moral code.  The code is expressed in the trooper's
actions, his progress through the ranks, the lectures he receives, the
conversations he overhears and the implicit comparison between bugs and
humans.  
The film's fatal flaw is that it is entirely lacking in a moral
vision.  At most, it makes very nodding, very satirical references to
it.  No code or vision powers the film; all we have are special effects
and soap opera.  And when the protagonist finally declares that he
understands the morality of this universe, that he knows the difference
between "citizens" and "civilians", it's merely a point of melodrama, a
tying of plot threads, and a reference to a question he couldn't answer
previously.  There's no conviction.
But, the one positive thing about Starship Troopers, the movie, in the
future, will become fodder for MST3K.  To wit:
1) Where else will we "Doogie Howser, Psychic Nazi"?  Crow T. Robot
will have been saying, "Our minds are linked, your thoughts are my
thoughts..." at one point.  You'll know when.
2) The continuing mis-casting of Michael Ironside, who, once again,
plays the gruff professional soldier.  I'm sure he can play a caring,
sensitive role, if only they'd let him.  Well, maybe not.
3) The insistence of all the troopers to get in real close to the bugs,
despite the fact that they have guns, and the bugs have claws.  It's
sort of like those bad action movies, where the villan, who has a big
gun, decides that, yes, getting really close to Steven Segal is _no
problem_ -- he can't kick my gun away!
[Actually, this leads to one of the major deviations from the book --
these movie bugs apparently haven't really developed technology.  In
the novel, there are bugs with ray guns, who pilot space ships, and
they're clearly intelligent and scheming.  Humanity has an equal
opponent, and you can think of bug society as contrast and comparison
to human society.  I find this scarier, in a way, than the
must-invent-wheel-must-discover-fire bugs they have in the movie.]
4) 24th Century Technology, in which they've invented a new form of
information storage that looks remarkably like carbon copy.
5) 24th Century Music, which looks remarkably like 1980s music, but
with less hair.
6) Tug-o-war with the brain bug.  Humanity has apparently lost the
ability to manufacture the "bulldozer", and must resort to "Ten
Commandments"-like teams of rope-pullers.
7) Arena football.  Played with a silver football.  'Nuff said.
I have to credit the film with one good thing, besides the special
effects.  There was a nice reference to Fritz Lang's "Metropolis" at
the beginning.
The Internet: an empirical test of the idea that a million monkeys banging
on a million keyboards can produce Shakespeare.

Author
Chad Polenz
1997, R, 130 minutes [2 hours, 10 minutes]
starring: Casper Van Dien (Johnny Rico), Dina Meyer (Dizzy Flores), Denise
Richards (Carmen Ibanez), Jake Busey (Ace Levy); written by Edward Neumeier;
produced by Jon Davison, Alan Marshalll; directed by Paul Verhoeven, based on
the novel by Robert A. Heinlein.
Seen Tuesday, Nov. 10, 1997 at 7 p.m. at the Glenwood Movieplex Cinemas in
Oneida, N.Y. - theater #1 by myself for free (press pass). (theater rating:
*** - good seats, decent sound, slightly dark picture, though)
The mistake many "blockbuster popcorn" movies have made in the last few
years is not incorporating a level of satire to make them lighthearted enough
to enjoy. "Starship Troopers" tries to have it both ways by establishing a
sense of satire which is quite clever, but is ultimately just a poor
"disclaimer" for the ridiculous plot and exhausting action.
Like many of his science fiction films, director Paul Verhoeven starts out
on the right foot here by establishing a futuristic and believable image of
the future. Much like "Nineteen Eighty-Four," etc.,  there seems to be a one
world government here. But this is an optimistic future with advanced
technology and the people here are general happy, although in a brainwashed
sort of way. 
The main characters are mostly kids in their late teens who are all in love
with each other but still have a sense of blind loyalty to the government.
Most of the actors are veterans of such shows as "Beverly Hills 90210," and
"Melrose Place." Some of them include: Johnny Rico (Van Dien) - the suave
jock who's in love with Carmen Ibanez (Richards) - the always smiling smart
girl who's friends with Dizzy Flores (Meyer) - the girl that constantly
throws herself at Johnny. There's many other silly characters like these who
create for even sillier, and often annoying  sub-plots. Initially, all this
keeps with the satirical atmosphere, but once the ball gets rolling and the
action kicks in, this becomes one of the film's biggest problems.
It's hard to tell exactly where the film is headed given the nature of the
first act. There are constant news updates spewing forth rhetoric about the
"evil bugs" on the other side of the galaxy that supposedly present some kind
of threat to Earth. We know the teens will somehow become involved in the war
against the bugs, but the film really takes its time in transitioning the
plot. 
It's not surprising all the characters join "The Federation," and are
separated in the process. The boot camp scenes are pretty generic, except for
the futuristic mentality where no one seems to notice the difference between
the sexes. The men and women not only physically fight each other, but shower
and sleep together! That's an original idea, but there's not nearly enough
detail explaining how this mentality is rationalized in this society.
Questions like these crop up throughout the film which are never answered and
only serve to create more plot holes and flaws.
But the film's biggest problem is the question it never answers: why are
they going to fight giant bugs on another planet? Perhaps the lack of an
answer is intended to keep with the satirical nature, but once the troopers
head out to fight the bugs, all the sense of satire is lost and the film
becomes pure action. 
We're supposed to be more concerned with the characters and their survival
than we are with their mission, but everything that happens is just
stupidity. Johnny and his fellow troopers are dropped off on the alien planet
and start firing their machine guns at hundreds of the giant bugs. It's just
one long battle scene of humans versus aliens, and of course they don't win
at first. And why would they? It's the distant future and they're still using
machine guns? Why don't they attack with tanks, or at least with grenades and
lasers (they have the technology)? One scene shows planes dropping bombs that
kill the bugs - couldn't they have just done that to begin with? It's really
difficult to take the combat scenes seriously when considering these things.
This is pretty much all that happens throughout the second half of the film
- just scene after scene of troopers fighting bugs on foot, even though they
are outnumbered. Not surprisingly, all the main characters have a brush with
death in one way or another, and this is done through such corny, sappy
storytelling methods it's unbearable. Plus the fact that almost none of the
characters are likable to begin with, so there's no element of suspense
either. By the time the ending rolls around, almost nothing is accomplished
nor resolved, and you really have to wonder what the point to anything and
everything was.
I'm not sure what "Starship Troopers" really intends to be. It could have
worked as a satire had it stuck with the genre throughout, but the action is
just mindless and overwhelming. What a waste of a story.


Author
Michael Redman
Heinlein novel mutates into Intergalactic Hills 90210
Based on the previews, I walked into the theater expecting to see a mediocre
science fiction film. I was disappointed.
This movie couldn't even aspire to be mediocre.
Although I have read several Heinlein books, I have to confess that I've
skipped "Starship Troopers", but I can't imagine that the author of "Stranger
In A Strange Land" could have written anything as vapid as what show up on the
screen. What we get instead is a film as insipid as the prime time teenage soaps.
In the unspecified, but unmistakably far-flung future, everyone lives happily
under a kindly fascist government where the citizens are allowed to vote only
after two years in the military. The film plays both sides of the coin: both
glorifying the Nazi (and make no mistake, they are Nazis, even down to the SS)
military while at the same time satirizing it.
After graduating high school in Buenos Aires, Carmen Ibanez (Denise Richards)
heads to the Fleet Academy to pilot starships. As is the wont of teenage boys,
her sweetheart Johnny Rico (Casper Van Dien) joins up to impress her, but he
only makes Mobile Infantry. Dizzy Flores (Dina Meyer) who has the hots for
Johnny follows him. Another buddy, Carl Jenkins (Neil Patrick Harris from
Doogie Howser) gets placed in Military Intelligence.
Oddly enough, everyone we see from the South American city is about as WASPy
as they could be and would be more at home in the LA valley. Perhaps in the
future, the United States has taken over the entire western hemisphere. Or
just maybe it was thought that a white cast would draw more of an audience.
While the lovers are separated, Dizzy demonstrates her affection for Johnny
and Carmen sends him a "Dear John" letter after falling for his high school
rival Zander Barcalow (Patrick Muldoon). To make their personal lives even
more complicated, hideous nasty "bugs" from across the galaxy hit their home
town with an asteroid destroying the city.
Earth marshals its forces, sending them light years away to the bug home
planet of Klendathu in an all-out war to obliterate the enemy. Then comes the
scenes you've seen on the commercials. Soldiers shooting and blowing up huge
ugly insectoids while the aliens slicing and dicing the humans.
The film has only two problems: it's boring and it rarely makes sense. 
The first seven or eight hours of the movie focuses on the love quadrangle and
the personal life of the kids. Obviously what director Paul Verhoeven
("Robocop", "Total Recall", "Showgirls") had in mind was to get the audience
emotionally involved with the characters so that we would be concerned about
them when they went into battle. 
Good idea. It's too bad that the concept is so poorly executed that that when
it comes down to life or death, we don't care. The only reason that we side
with the humans is that the bugs are even more bizarre.
Since most of the budget was spent on effects, it's not necessarily a bad
notion to cast primarily unknowns. It would seem, however, that if one would
want to make sure that some of them could act. The stars all __look good__,
but they belong in underwear ads rather than in a major motion picture.
Meyer's Dizzy is the only one who shows any signs of life. Later Gary Busey's
son Jake is entertaining as a fellow soldier. The sole accomplishment of the
first half of the film is to make the audience anxious for the action to start.
When the war does begin, it also __looks good__. The computer generated aliens
are at times among the best effects ever on screen although occasionally they
look almost as fake as the terminally attractive actors.
Many of the effects are as comical as they are visually impressive. The sight
of bugs farting plasma into space destroying star cruisers can't help but
bring laughter.
Speaking of special effects and as interesting as it is, a co-ed shower scene
appears to exist only to flash dozens of breasts. The female and ethnic
characters don't fare well. One woman dies happy because she was finally able
to "have" her love interest the night before.
It's impossible to understand how the civilization advanced so far that it
could travel to distant planets yet be so stupid. The enemy is built like a
tank and as difficult to destroy. What do the military masterminds send
against it? Foot soldiers armed with guns that shoot bullets. 
Bullets? Earth has faster-than-light vehicles yet arms its military with
bullets? Wouldn't you think that weapons would have advanced a bit in the
years? Admittedly they also have hand-held nuclear weapons (which miraculously
the warriors only had to be a few feet away from to avoid damage), but there
no in-between arms. You'd think that they could at least have cans of Raid.
Admittedly I have no military experience, but even I would send in air attacks
before dispatching a few platoons to fight thousands of the monsters. I also
might not encourage a loud drunken party while camped surrounded by the enemy.
Some of the failings come from mucking around with Heinlein's book. His
characters were multi-racial (Johnny was Filipino "Juan"). Flores was changed
from male to female and Barcalow invented for the film so the more
soap-operaish aspects could be exploited. The sex and nudity was also
concocted. His infantry was armed with formidable "power suits".
To be truthful, many critics have raved about the film. Maybe I just don't get
it. The best thing I can find to say is that it is better than Verhoeven's
last offering: the atrocious "Showgirls". Not much better, but as they say:
tiny steps.
(Michael Redman, after over 22 years of writing this column, thinks he would
have learned not to expect much from an effects film but he still remains
hopeful for "Alien Resurrection". Email to the usual address would be useless
right now, so don't even try.)

Author
Sean Gabb
I have two qualifications for reviewing this film.  First, I broadly
agree with the political, economic and social views of Robert A.
Heinlein, on whose novel of the same title the film is based.  Second, I
have never read that novel.  This gives me an advantage over those who
have.  Screen adaptations of a favourite book nearly always disappoint.
Last Christmas, for example, I watched a BBC adaptation of Wilkie
Collins' The Woman in White.  I was horrified by the removal of the
legal complexities that drive the plot smoothly forward through 500
closely printed pages, and their replacement by something about child
abuse.  This kept me from appreciating what others tell me was an
exciting television play.  Not having read Starship Troopers, I am
better able to judge the film on its own merits.
This being said, I will organise my thoughts on the film under two
headings:  the political shape of the Federation; the credibility of the
Bug War.
First, I was surprised by the libertarianism that Mr Verhoeven allowed
to remain in his portrayal of the Federation.  He is some kind of
leftist with a settled dislike of what may broadly be called the
American Way.  Certainly, he is on record as having said his film was
based on a "fascist novel".  The British reviewers have generally
followed this line, sprinkling their articles with phrases like "fascist
utopianism", "totalitarian nightmare" "aryan shocktroops", and so forth.
I have never trusted film reviewers since they nearly put me off
watching Star Wars when I was 17.  But this time, I can only doubt if
they have actually bothered to watch the film.
Though the word has been so overused as to have lost any precise
meaning, the essence of fascism is hostility to individual rights.  The
collective, and its embodiment in the State, is everything:  the
individual is nothing more than an expendable element of the collective.
This cannot be seen as the guiding ideology of the Federation in the
22nd century.
Too much is made of the fact, revealed early in the film, that voting
has been turned from an automatic right into a privilege that must be
earned by military service; and that the Government is a sort of
military council.  There is nothing inherently fascist about this.  Both
England and America enjoyed their greatest freedom under limited
franchises; and both have been, or are being, ruined by systems that
give almost absolute power to whoever can lie most convincingly to the
masses.  Salvation lies in hoping that economic growth can reproduce the
middle class majorities that existed before democracy, or in a direct
limitation of democracy itself.
And we are told this even as the restricted franchise is explained.  It
comes from the lecture that Mr - later Lieutenant - Rasczak (Michael
Ironside) gives to Johnny's class.  The social scientists brought
humanity to the brink of disaster, he says.  Only the Veterans'
Revolution saved us.  They took over and limited the franchise to those
who could be trusted to use it in the public interest.  Since then,
there had been generations of political stability and social and
economic progress.
There is nothing in the film to contradict the old liberal belief that
having the vote is far less important than having the right to live as
we please.   The Federation is built around respect for this right.
>From what we see of Buenos Aires, the Federation is America writ large.
Everyone speaks English with an American accent.  The teenagers enjoy
the hedonistic lifestyle that emerged in America during the 1950s.  They
go to dances.  They make love.  They study as they please, free to do
badly in their examinations.  In short, they live as free people do
nowadays.
So do the adults.  Look at the family of Johnny Rico (Casper van Dien),
the film's hero.  His parents are wealthy.  They seem to have managed
this without being connected to the military.  Indeed, they are openly
contemptuous of a military life, and are not afraid to say so.  When
Johnny comes home after joining up, they do every thing to persuade him
to back out.  His father even threatens to go public with disinheriting
him.
Again, looking at the news bulletins that punctuate the film, there is
evidence of limited constitutional government.  There are peace
activists who oppose the war against the Bugs, claiming that we should
all live and let live.  We are supposed to laugh at the Mormon colonists
who disobey the Government's advice and build their Joseph Smith City in
the neutral zone, and get eaten by the Bugs.  No attempt had been made
to stop them from emigrating.  Like all free people, they had been left
alone to direct their own actions and to suffer the consequences.
Nor is there any evidence of the racial and sexual supremacy that, while
not inherent to it, has been central to our historic experience of
fascism.  Non-whites are present at every level in society and the
military.  Women are integrated into the military.  Half way through the
film, we even have a Melanesian woman appointed to the supreme command
after a white man has failed in the job.
Then let us look more closely at the military itself.  We are also
supposed to laugh at the official recruiting advertisements, and to see
these as "fascistic".  But they are not.  Under real fascism, there is
no need for official inducements to join up.  Young people are recruited
by force.  Here, they need to be persuaded.  The general message of
personal responsibility is rammed home in the scene where Johnny asks Mr
Rasczak if he should join up.  He is told that this is a matter purely
for him to decide.
Nor is there any effort to recruit under false pretences.  The news
bulletins are occasionally censored - as, for example, when we are not
allowed to see a Bug rip a cow to pieces.  But we do see humans have
their arms and legs torn off in the reports of the failed attack on
Klendathu, the Bugs' home planet.  This admission of military failure
would be unthinkable under a fascist government.  In the Second World
War, we were allowed to see the newsreels of the disasters at Dunkirk
and Tobruk - though with a soothing commentary.  The German people never
saw the full horrors suffered by their forces at Stalingrad; and many
smaller defeats were never admitted at all, in case they called the
leadership's abilities in question.
Again, when Johnny joins up, he signs at a desk manned by a veteran who
has had been horribly wounded in action.  We are given another
opportunity to laugh as the veteran announces that service "made me the
man that I am today" and he pushes back his chair to show the stumps of
his legs.  But this is entirely consistent with the those of a
libertarian society.  Recruits are encouraged to join up - but only on
giving their fully informed consent.
Not only this, but once signed up, recruits can walk out just as they
please.  Only this makes sense of the scene in which Johnny's father
tries to get him to change his mind:  even in Old England, once you had
taken the Queen's Shilling, there was no going back.  And it entirely
undercuts the pacifistic message we are supposed to take from the
brutality of Johnny's training and the punishments handed out for
breaches of discipline.  See what happens when Johnny lets one of the
trainees in his unit take his helmet off during a manoeuvre with live
ammunition, and gets his head blown off.  Several trainees resign
immediately.  Johnny is almost thrown out.  He is only allowed to remain
in the military if he takes his punishment.  In this context, his
flogging must be seen not as an act of military sadism, but as a free
acceptance of responsibility.
Moreover, having taken his punishment, Johnny decides that he is not
good enough for military service, and signs his discharge papers.  The
war then starts, and his parents are killed int he bombing of Buenos
Aires, and he wants to rejoin.  He can only do this because his
immediate superiors connive at a breach of law in tearing up his
discharge papers before they are filed.
And it is worth recalling that, harsh and dangerous as it is, military
service is accepted partly in exchange for the vote.  This is perhaps
the most decisive argument against the fascistic nature of the political
system.  In a real fascist state, the vote is so worthless - because
elections are always rigged - that it can be safely given to everyone.
The vote is only useful to the authorities because it can be used as an
endorsement of their rule.  No one would lift a finger, let alone risk
life and limb, for a right so absolutely empty.  In the Federation, the
vote means something:  it means the right to take part in the government
of a free people.  And that is why it is seen as worth all the risks
involved in earning it - risks that are deliberately brought to the
attention of those thinking of taking them.
I can understand the intellectual idleness of the reviewers.  What I
find astonishing is Mr Verhoeven's belief that he has filmed a "fascist
novel".  Probably, Heinlein was far more explicit in his portrayal of a
libertarian society.  But enough remains of this in the film to put it
almost in the same class of libertarian cinema as The Fountainhead, or
High Noon, or Star Wars.  Mr Verhoeven is a great director - anyone can
realise this who has seen films like Robocop and Total Recall.  But his
greatness is surely most fully revealed in Starship Troopers, where he
has unknowingly created a powerful and dignified vision of a future that
contradicts his own leftist views.
Turning to the Bug War, I was less happy.  As shown in the film, the
Federation strategy makes no sense.  The war begins with the destruction
of Buenos Aires.  The Bugs achieve this by hurling an asteroid across
the galaxy.  I cannot believe that a civilisation able to build
interstellar spaceships could fail to see this coming months in advance,
and fail to do anything about it.  Nor can I believe that, after one
failed attack on the Bugs, in which Federation ships have been blasted
out of low orbit over Klendathu, the same positioning of forces could be
risked in the next attack.
Nor do I find the use of ground forces at all convincing.  The soldiers
are sent into combat against a numerically superior enemy with horribly
inadequate weapons.  They have small atom bombs, and these are
occasionally used to good effect.  But otherwise, they only have
standard calibre machine guns that are plainly inadequate against the
Bugs.  Hundreds of rounds of fire from more than one weapon are needed
to kill just one Bug.  The sort of guns used in Star Wars - indeed, even
the guns now used by the American and British military - would make far
greater sense.  They would cut the death toll from hundreds of thousands
to perhaps a few hundred.
And that is on the assumption that ground forces need to be committed at
all.  In one scene, we are shown a very effective aerial attack on the
Bugs.  Why was this not continued to the point where only a few Bugs
remained?  Then ground forces might have been committed for a mopping up
and the capture of the Brian Bug - and could have acted under the same
umbrella of air supremacy as Allied forces may be about to enjoy in the
Persian Gulf.
The answer is that a more sensible strategy would bring the war to an
easy conclusion, and this would rob the film of much of its excitement.
And the set piece battles are exciting - they remind me of the best
Second World War films, and even in places of the Spartan defence at
Thermopylae.  But the excitement is always undermined by the knowledge
that the actions make no military sense.
Moving to generalities, I was impressed by the portrayal of sexual
equality - which is what we can expect in a libertarian society.  But I
was not convinced by way in which the sexes are integrated in the
military.  The shower scene, where we see male and female recruits naked
together, is conceivable - but only, I think, on the assumption that the
recruits do not regard each other as sexual beings.  But this is not the
case in Starship Troopers.  Johnny does get into a sexual relationship
with a member of his unit while on active service.  I may be wrong, but
this must be bad for discipline.
As an aside, I notice that his lover (Dina Meyer) is able to go through
weeks of active service against the Bugs with an undamaged perm; and
when she eventually gets into bed with Johnny, her armpits are smoothly
shaven.  Is this, I wonder, more evidence of the goodies on offer in a
free society?  Or is it just Hollywood?
I enjoyed Starship Troopers.  I may even watch it again.  And I will
certainly get round this year to reading some Heinlein.
        ">http://freespace.virgin.net/old.whig/>
If you like Free Life Commentary, you may also care to subscribe to my
longer, hard copy journal, Free Life, subscription details for which can
be obtained by writing to me at the above address.

Author
Matt Petras
        As races grow and expand they need space and if there is a
limited amount of space they will interfere with one another. And
quite obviously they will conflict. Such is the case in the 23rd
Century, Humankind is essentially pitted against Insectkind. The world
as we knew it is not the same, the world is united and citizenship is
a duty that is given to those that serve the state. In this world,
graduating students such as Johnny Rico, Carmen Ibanez(...I think...)
and their classmates choose to be civilians or citizens. Citizenship
in their case is achieved by joining the military, whatever facet of
it each person is suited for. Here the movie begins in earnest, and
I'll stop as to not ruin it. 
        The story is based about a small group of friends and
classmates, that is originally from the Buenos Aires(which is
destroyed... I won't say how). Their relationships develop through the
course of the movie, this is the underlying plot to the movie and is
in some cases quite sad.  It shows that people are still people even
in the roughest of conditions. Other than the interactions between the
characters, which isn't very deep on its own, the plot of the movie is
fairly simple. And there are quite a few plot gaps, and some things
just happen without any previous buildup. Also some parts of this
movie are just a little cliché, and you can almost see things
happening. All this does not take away from the movie though and in
some cases even adds to the viewing quality of it. The movie flows
unbelievably, you are not left there wondering what just happened..
simply because you are already onto the next event.  The buildup for
this movie is fairly lengthy, the setting and situation is built up in
such a manner to let the viewer know what is going on and what is
happening before it happens. Even during the build up to action/war
the movie seems to flow very well.  One thing that is fairly
noticeable is that most of the characters in this movie are
aesthetically pleasing.. very aesthetically pleasing, this is just one
of those things that the budget seemed to be able to afford. I am not
saying that the future might not be like this its just hard to imagine
that everyone will look THAT good. 
        The acting in this movie was surprisingly decent, it is
obviously far from Oscar caliber anywhere in this production but the
acting that was needed for this movie was more than adequately filled.
Although personally, I found the main character, Johnny Rico, to be
played a bit on the stiff side, at more than one point in the movie he
should have showed a bit more emotion than he did.. a blank stare
could be a sign of numbness to a situation but... um.. this is acting
not reality, a bit more emotion could have been shown. Other than that
rather small detail, I would have to say that the acting in this movie
is good. Most of the actors/resses are fresh faces, and that is a
refreshing change from seeing the same super hero figures going at it
again in the same old tired roles. 
        The effects are the backbone of this movie and they are
delivered in abundance. To top it off they are spectacular and then
some. The movie is simply worth seeing simply for the special effects.
The scenes in space really blew you away, although some of the things
that the spaceships/cruisers were doing is simply beyond logic.. sorry
folks there wasn't the slightest shred of military tactics shown in
this movie.. just sheer military stupidity.. but again that is not why
this movie is being watched. If you want tactics or a real military
movie you will find more than enough on either or both of those
topics. Back to the effects, they were very life like and just
stellar. Some of the battle scenes were a bit hard to follow because
they were so fast but they added to the , the race for the special
effects Oscar this year is very tight, well maybe not as tight now...
        One thing that I do have to comment on is the violence,
personally I don't mind it and it very suiting for this movie.
Regardless I do have to say that this movie is about the most violent
movie that I have ever seen, even Braveheart has trouble comparing to
this, carnage abounds. So if that is not your thing then you may want
to consider not watching this movie. One thing that did strike me very
odd was that there was no swearing, lots of violence but no swearing.
Also the General style of the movie was a bit disconcerting, fascist
overtones were present(but then again they were almost fitting). Some
of the commentary in the movie hints at the fact that we as a society
take citizenship all too lightly, and that we are being given
something that we don't entirely deserve. This is just one of those
small things that are mentioned, its not continually hammered at you
like in other movies.
        All in all this movie is very entertaining and worth seeing if
you aren't really interested in gleaning anything from the movie other
than entertainment value. Its one of the funnest movies of the last
few years. The movie is a tad bit violent so the rating that it has is
well more than apt, people with children might want to wait till its
on tape where the carnage isn't on such a large screen. I rate this
movie 3/4 for its entertainment value and its special effects. Its
more than worth the money, I'd even say seeing it a couple times is
still worth it(not many movies have that ability)

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     STARSHIP TROOPERS by Robert Heinlein is one of the perennial
classics of science fiction.  The novel may be so popular more for the
timing of its publication, 1959, than for quality, being probably the
first important piece of military science fiction.  The book itself is
a look at life in the combat military during World War II, but had it
been written as such it would have been forgotten two months after it
was published.  And it was, in fact, probably inferior to many of its
contemporary novels about the war.  But Heinlein was a science fiction
author and so set the story in an interstellar war.  Having been
written as science fiction, it brought military fiction to a new
audience and probably was pivotal in creating military science fiction
as a new sub-genre.  (Historical note: 1959 was also the year of
military science fiction novel DORSAI by Gordon Dickson.  The only
major military science fiction novel prior to that year was 1952's
GUNNER CADE by Cyril Kornbluth and Judith Merrill writing as Cyril
Judd.)
     Heinlein's story is a set of forays into Heinlein's own political
philosophy combined with a sort of enthusiastic--but somehow unsavory-
-look at military discipline.  He wrote it after serving in the
military in the war, albeit behind a desk.  The philosophy for me was
more engaging than the discipline.  After all, if one feels threatened
by people's different ideas, one should not be reading science fiction.
But Heinlein's admiring descriptions of good, harsh military
discipline--up to and including the use of the lash--are often hard to
take.  So that humanitarian concerns would not get in the way of
Heinlein's military philosophy he dehumanized the enemy well beyond
even the level of gooks to spiders with hive insect habits.  (The film
goes a step further, and in the wrong direction, calling them both
"insects" and "arachnids."  Of course they cannot be both.)  Making the
enemy bugs neatly reduces them in the reader's concern and disposes of
any humane consideration for them.  Ironically, this is just the aspect
that Paul Verhoeven seizes upon in his film.  He wants to examine what
would a war of infantry against an implacable army of giant insects be
like?  And with the advent of good computer graphics, giant insects
could be shown attacking in the thousands.
     The story of the film is at least roughly that of the novel.  It
is a world where veterans have taken over the government and military
service is a prerequisite of having voting rights.  The film follows
Johnny Rico (played by Casper Van Dien) through the military experience
from his high school experience coming under the influence of pro-
military teacher Jean Rasczak (Michael Ironside).  It follows him and a
few of his friends though enlistment and an extended sequence of
training.  About an hour into the film it takes him to battle and to
becoming a hero fighting the giant insect like inhabitants of
Klendathu.  Overlaid on the military plot is the much less interesting
story of the love lives of the main characters.  It is hard to build up
a whole lot of interest on whether Johnny will get together with
girlfriend Carmen Ibenez (Denise Richards) or Dizzy Flores (Dina Meyer)
when giant insects are ripping people apart.  That whole subplot seems
a little bit like unneeded padding in a film that is 129 minutes long.
     As far as acting, this is a film in which all the interesting
characters are in minor roles.  The only real tension on screen in the
relationship between Casper Van Dien and Denise Richards is to see when
they finally do kiss, how will they keep those jutting chins from
getting in the way.  On the other hand in a more minor roles are Clancy
Brown as the violent, sadistic drill instructor with the heart of gold.
Always watchable is Michael Ironside as the gruff, hardened teacher-
turned-commander with the heard of gold, Rasczak.  Anybody who is
military seems gruff and insensitive, but that is because they really
love the troops.  Edward Neumeier wrote the screenplay which shows
similarities to his screenplay for Paul Verhoeven's previous ROBOCOP,
particularly in its send-up of the popular media.  Special effects--
some showing incredible swarms of giant insects--are produced by
Industrial Light and Magic among other contributors.  Things have come
a long way since Warner Brothers made THEM! with one full-sized ant
mock-up and the front half of a second ant.  These giant insects are
too realistic at times.  The film has a right-wing-slant so it comes a
no surprise that the score is by Basil Poledouris who also scored CONAN
THE BARBARIAN, RED DAWN, IRON EAGLE, ROBOCOP, AMERIKA, FLIGHT OF THE
INTRUDER, and THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER.  It is not one of his better
scores and is regrettably well below that quality he showed with CONAN
THE BARBARIAN.
     My feeling is that it is not the most ambitious project in the
world to make a film of STARSHIP TROOPERS.  The best film you could
possibly make would be none too good.  But I also feel this very nearly
is the best film you could possibly make from the book.  It is not
accurate to the book, but most of the changes are probably for the
best.  There are places that this version diverges from the novel, but
they seem to be modifications that the author would have endorsed.
Heinlein gave us an all-male army that just does not square with our
90s vision of the future.  If serving in the military is a prerequisite
for voting rights, it is unlikely that women would be excluded and they
would have to serve under the same conditions as the men.  The script
does that very handily.  Also scenes like the one with co-ed shower
facilities are very much within the style of later Heinlein books.
That idea could have almost come from a Heinlein book.
     With the proper set of substitutions this could be a fairly
typical John Wayne film about World War II.  As a science fiction piece
with good special effects, this makes for an entertaining two hours
plus, and it is fun to hear some of Heinlein's political ideas.  I
would rate this film a +6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Author
Phil Brady
Well, the previews had us SF-types drooling for most of the year, and
it looks as though Paul Verhoven has delivered a reasonable product to
justify our wait. We get plenty of cutting edge special effects, and
unlike Spielberg's "Lost World," this one has a coherent story behind
it. Not a new story, though. Some have labeled this a parody, but I see
a careful reworking of a W.W.II B-movie, retreaded with futuristic
gadgetry and foes. There is some "1984" and some classic wartime
propaganda thrown in, but it is the inherent absurdities of those genres
that inspires any amusement.
Since this is a special effects movie, there's no sense spending the
budget on big names. We follow high school senior Rico (Casper Van
Dien), who is being pursued by Dizzy (Dina Meyer). But Rico is only
interested in Carmen (Denise Richards). Most of the action revolves
around these three, but we also get psychic Carl (Neil Patrick Harris).
And just so you don't think EVERYONE in the future is beautiful, the
gene pool still allows for a rodent-toothed Busey (Jake). Adult mentors
Michael Ironside and Clancy Brown round out a cast that keeps running
into each other, even though they all go their separate directions.
Carmen is one of those "natural pilots we always find in the movies,
and she plans to join the military. In this future society, you are
either a non-voting layabout, or a citizen, who has earned this status
by a hitch in the military. Rico's family is rich enough that he doesn't
need citizenship, but he wants to impress Carmen, so the fool signs up
anyway. Not smart enough for fleet, he ends up in the Mobile Infantry
(laser-cannon fodder). Dizzy joins to be near Rico, and the psychic goes
off to Intelligence, natch.
The military trappings are intentionally evocative of totalitarian
Germans and Soviets. This unified-world army would have been believable
as the army Orwell mentioned in Big Brother's news reports. There are
such news broadcasts here, presented with a CNN/Internet style. They
have the exhortative propaganda feel of 1984, with little of the parody
that Verhoven employed in his Robocop happy-news bits. 
Once the war with the alien "bugs" starts, we are treated to plenty of
complex battle scenes, with hundreds of Arachnids kicking our butt.
Inexplicably, no good tactics are developed to deal with these superior
warriors. Our guys just fire their automatic weapons at 14-foot
arthropods that keep on slashing, even when half of their limbs are shot
off. Also unexplained is what these bugs do for a living as the sole
creatures on a barren planet. The ability of huge "tankers" to spit
fiery plasma is an interesting adaptation for a race that shows no signs
of tool-use. The bugs on the screen may appear three-dimensional, but
they truly have no depth. In contrast, the franchise antagonists in
"Alien" and "Predator" have enough definition that an audience member
could conjure up his own backstory. 
Computer graphic imaging (CGI) was a new toy for stop-action expert
Phil Tippet when he built his dinos for Jurassic Park. Overseeing
Starship's effects, he was able to bring the many images together by
farming out pieces to several different effects houses. This movie does
not give us a quantum leap in technology, but it does signal that
Hollywood has turned the corner on producing CGI. Lesser efforts like
"Spawn" and "Mortal Kombat II" can now be churned out regularly, without
using the resources of a Manhattan Project. This movie does not rate a
position of honor comparable to Robert A Heinlein's source novel, but it
IS pretty cool.

Author
Michael J. Legeros
     Big bugs are the order of the day in STARSHIP TROOPERS, an honest-
to-God, old-fashioned combat movie set in a retro, fascist future where
impossibly square-jawed grunts still carry machine guns, endure the
abuses of drill sergeants, and get sent away to exotic, faraway places
to be slaughtered en masse.  Okay, there is *one* thing that's new:  men
and women fight together.  And bunk together.  And even shower together,
as in a gratuitous, humorous boobs-n-butts bath scene from SHOWGIRLS
director Paul Verhoven.  Relax, Mr. V. is no longer orbiting the hirsute
moon of Eszterhas-- he's back in ROBOCOP territory, fusing social satire
with gory violence and, perhaps, pissing in the face of the studio's
target audience-- teenage boys already clogging the Internet with their
grousing nit-picks.  Granted, the director *is* poking fun at everything
that he can lay his hands on, but he's also trying to channel his own
wartime experiences as a youth.  So, while you *will* get the gore-- am-
putations, decapitations, eviscerations, and immolations-- be prepared
for cheesy dialogue, glaring plot holes, and, at the end, and just when
you think you've grown used to the tone, movie monsters that look like
giant human sex organs.  Hilarious.  Now, for *my* nit-picks:  occasion-
ally the action runs a bit long; the dramatics don't deliver quite
enough emotional impact; and, at times, I was distracted by actors aim-
ing their rifles a little too high to realistically hit their computer-
generated foes.  With Casper Van Dien, Dina Meyer, Denise Richards, Jake
Busy, Neil Patrick Harris, Clancy Brown, and a meaty Michael Ironside.

Author
Edward Thommes
As luck would have it, I re-read the book by Robert Heinlein upon which
this movie is based not too long ago.  The back of my copy proclaims this
book to be "The controversial classic of military SF!"  Why controversial?
Well, the lesson the book tries to teach is that nothing builds character
and morality like brutal discipline, and it paints a picture of a "utopia"
where democracy has failed and the planet is ruled by a
military-established government which only grants citizen status after one
performs "Federal Service" (anything from government R&D to 
soldiering...the final decision is made by the government).  In other
words, the book has what can only be called strong fascist overtones. 
This angle is played up quite a bit in the movie.  But in contrast to
Heinlein's book, which tried to sell this ominous political order to the
reader, the movie takes a decidedly tongue-in-cheek approach.  It has a
lot of dark, twisted fun, for instance, with recruitment commercials that
are part Uncle Sam Wants You, part Leni Riefenstahl.  And then there's the
snortingly hilarious moment when Doogie Howser--uh, I mean Neil Patrick
Harris--strides in wearing his Military Intelligence outfit, which just
happens to look exactly like an SS uniform.  
So how good an action movie is this?  Pretty good, in many ways.  The bug
computer effects are well-done and appropriately imposing, especially the
really big flame-throwing critters.  The spaceships are all highly
detailed;  in a scene where one breaks in half, one can actually see the
individual decks inside.  And as one can infer from the trailers, all the
action stuff is very visceral, with loads of muzzle flashes and spraying
bug juice and troopers getting gored, torn limb from limb, cut in half,
set on fire... 
However, gaps in logic are all over the place, and while this movie is
basically meant to be enjoyed at the level of a live-action cartoon, why
go out of the way to strain the suspension of disbelief?  Here's one
problem:  You don't have to be a master tactician to realize that if
you've got firearms and most of the bad guys just have big nasty pincers
and mandibles, you want to be shooting them from afar as much as possible,
and avoid going toe-to-toe with them at all costs.  But no, the troopers
have other ideas.  Every time a bug rears up next to them they actually
ADVANCE as they shoot, until they're practically underfoot of the alien. 
And when the bugs come charging, the humans never open fire until they can
see their foes' beady little eyes.  It's basically World War I trench
warfare without the trenches. No wonder the human casualties are so
staggering. 
In its depiction of combat the movie is almost the exact opposite of the
book which, being military SF, payed a lot of attention to things like
tactics.  Also, the powered armor suits which played such a central role
in the book are completely absent in the film.  An odd decision from a 
merchandising point of view...they would've made the perfect action figure. 
Also, we've got the usual sci-fi movie space-time problems.  The asteroids
launched by the bugs come from their home system, which is on the other
side of the Galaxy from Earth.  We're about 25 000 lightyears from the
Galactic center, so that makes the distance to the bug homeworld something
on the order of 50 000 lightyears.  Unless these asteroids are
self-guiding, that's pretty amazing aim.  OK, fine, but then there's the
little matter of travel time.  The asteroids are going along at sublight
speed, at least the one that hits a spaceship and later splatters Buenes
Aires is, and in any case the aliens don't appear to possess any
faster-than-light technology (or any technology, period; they seem do it
all with excreted "bug plasma").  So those asteroids have been in the mail
longer than 50 000 years.  The bugs must really plan ahead. 
The acting?  Well, the acting is quite bad, as is the writing, but it seems
like this is intentional, in keeping with the cartoonish tone of the movie.
Troopers die screaming by the thousands, but as soon as a battle is over, the
survivors continue unconcernedly exchanging inane dialogoue.  The whole effect
is dehumanizing in the extreme, but that, too, is probably intentional.
So, in summary, provided you're in the right frame of mind for a violent
science fiction action movie, you'll probably enjoy yourself while
watching Starship Troopers.  If you read the book and shook your head in
disgust at the ideology it espouses, you'll probably have a good
laugh at the (heavy-handed) satire.  If you're looking for an SF movie
with intelligence or originality, then you've clearly wandered into the 
wrong theatre.

Author
Tim Voon
Disappointment will adequately describe how I felt as I left the cinema
after watching this greatly anticipated film. This movie carried much
potential for greatness, but alas was ruined by a moronic, cliché'
script and a lack of serious direction from Paul Verhoeven. The end
result is not a tense sci-fi, action thriller, but becomes a boy
scout/girl guide venture into trying to define the difference between a
citizen and a civilian. If this was intentional, it subtracts from the
otherwise splendid visual effects of unprecedented alien quality. I've
never read the Robert Heinlein novel on which this movie is loosely
based, but I'm almost certain that the threat to the human race was not
in any way meant to be intentionally comic.
This group of immature actors has gone to great lengths in perfecting a
blood-curdling death scream, but unfortunately their efforts are wasted.
The frequent decapitations, limb amputations, torso dissections and
disembodiment is all for naught. My reason for making such comments is
because after watching the 20th person in the long line of innumerable
graphic deaths - desensitisation becomes inevitable. When the 30th human
execution approaches, variety begins to run thin. By this time caring
about what happens to this group of hormonally charged individuals is no
longer an issue. They are after all only post-pubescent,
soldiers-in-diapers who make a lot of noise over everything. They're
purpose is solely to shoot and get shot, but mention the word act and
they'll just nervously finger their guns.
So what we have is something of a CLUELESS in space, pretentious in
every way with no substance underneath. Add a show tune and you may even
get something of a JOSIE AND THE PUSSYCATS. The Ken doll' (Casper Van
Dien) is all brawn and no brains. He joins the dispensable army corps so
that he can impress his Barbie' girlfriend (Denise Richards) who wants
to fly a star ship. Then there is the nerdy ex-Doogie Howser (Neil
Patrick Harris) whose psychic powers allows him to communicate with
brainy bugs. Throw in a forlorn, other female, Dizzy (Dina Meyer) and
this completes the love triangle of cosmic soap opera proportions.
So why haven't I frowned on this movie like I should have? Well because
it's attempts at being serious made me laugh, and even if it wasn't a
dramatic masterpiece, it serves well as a trashy soapie.

Author
Ralph Beard
Plot - Bugs threaten Earth. Men kill bugs. Much zaniness ensues
Rating ***/12 stars or 7.5 (You decide)
Review -
Before I start the review I must say this, I saw this with just about the
perfect film crowd - Enthusiastic, cheering, sci-fi movie lovers ready to
suspend disbelief. This is just what you need to really enjoy Starship
Troopers, and I must say I did.
 I was fully expecting Verhoeven to go all Speilberg and do a serious movie,
especially after the mess that was Showgirls. Fat chance, Verhoeven returned
back to the genre that got him into the A-list, violent tongue-in-cheek
sci-fi. Starship Troopers has all the hallmarks of Verhoeven's previous
forays Robocop and Total Recall dumb storyline interjected with sharp barbs
directed at the media and government.
 Based on 1950's thinly veiled anti-communist (Change `Bugs' for `Commies'
in the dialogue and you'll see) sci-fi novel by Robert A. Heinlein. Starship
Troopers is filled with macho characters spewing forth `Kill em all' style
phrases, and, if not for ads, this would have been the cheesiest pro-war
flick since Green Berets. ST's best scenes involve the army's Join Up
propaganda, hilarious 1-2 minute ads that serve to inform us about the story
while sending up the `War is good' theme that engulfs the rest of the film.
 I enjoyed Starship Troopers immensely, as did six of the seven people I saw
it with. The seventh, lets call him `The Fool', was less enthusiastic, and
when I asked him what he thought of the flick, it went something like this 
`The special effects were better than the cast'
True, the cast is not exactly As Good As It Gets; however this isn't exactly
Hamlet. This is a big bug movie; all it needs it some good looking people to
attack the bugs. It has them, Casper Van Dien, Dina Meyers, Denise Richards,
etc. are okay, they didn't annoy me, that's all I ask of them. There were
memorable performances however from Michael Ironside as the hard-as-nails
team leader, and very surprisingly from Clancy Brown in his first good role
since Highlander, as the tough drill instructor (Mind you, there's been a
hell of a lot of good parts for drill instructors, eg Lee Ermey in Full
Metal Jacket, Viggo Mortenson in GI Jane, Warren Oates in Stripes and Louis
Gosset Jr. in Officer and A Gentlemen).
The effects are what make the movie, and they are astounding to look at, the
bugs are awesome and the explosion fantastic. There is no doubt in my mind
that this would have been a considerably worse movie if Roland Emmerich had
directed, Verhoeven gives us what ID4 was distinctly lacking, death. For all
the big explosions and aliens, ID4 did not show us the outcome of war,
death, Starship Troopers is littered with dead bodies, decapitations and
dismemberments. Almost all the cast is impaled or injured in some way,
showing us without a doubt that this war is hell.
 So are there problems with Starship Troopers? Sure, it starts off slowly, I
would have deleted all the scenes with Van Dien's parents, some more
dramatic sequences don't work and the ending is a bit of a let down but
through all of this I just kept remembering that Starship Troopers is a big
dumb sci-fi flick. It's thoroughly enjoyable, yes, but I'm not going to be
holding my breath for the best script Oscar for it. The point is - I had FUN
watching it, something that hasn't happened for me at the movies in a long
time.

Author
Jason Overbeck
How many times has a person come up to you and compared a science
fiction movie to Ben Hur or Gone With the Wind? Don't worry, I wont
compare Troopers to those, and fact be told neither would anyone else. 
Picking to make a film about giant bugs, war and teen-angst is not going
to burn up the critic top picks or win many oscars, yet Starship
Troopers picks these disreputable genres and transcendes them to make an
epic.  This is the kind of film that Independence Day or Mimic could
have been with imagination, style, humor, and graphic carnage.
This film is fun in some sick minimalist way.  We see graphic telling of
a war with huge killer bugs, and along the way building a very funny
satire on high school and the way technology is leading us.  This film
is like Star Wars in the fact that they create not only a world new to
us but a new telling of an old story with incredible detail and
precision.
The film is also directed by the Dutch pro Paul Verhoeven who's work I
greatly admire.  His idea of a film is as much violence and sex as he
can fit (With the MPAA Ratings), the later is kept to suprising minimum,
you become shocked by the onslaught of drippingly grotesque eyecandy and
then made to laugh, not only by the outrageous way it is drawn out but
also at the style of news clips and media coverage of the war.
Starship Troopers was a flop in the US because most figured they woud
get another stupid film like Independence Day or The Lost World.  That
is not the fact at all.  This is one of the years best movies and one of
the most fun to sit through.  Adults: Just don't sit through it with
young ones.

Author
Walter Frith
     To truly enjoy 'Starship Troopers', you have to leave all thought of
plotting and character development at the door.  You also have to remember
that with a budget of 100 million dollars, there isn't a lot of money left
to hire big name stars.  The real stars of this movie are the special
effects which rank as both ground breaking and mind numbing.  The entire
film is a constant barrage of extreme violence and frightening pops of large
alien insects which devour humans by breaking apart their bodies and the
audience sees it all in full motion but the editing is appropriately handled
through fast cutting and you have very little time to think about what
you've just seen before the next scenario begins.
     Director Paul Verhoeven ('RoboCop', 'Total Recall', 'Basic Instinct')
formulates his movie in his typical visual manner when dealing with science
fiction which relies heavily on futuristic shock value in a world he creates
based on academic predictions of things to come.  His vision of the future
is often bleak like it was in 'RoboCop' but when sticking to a present day
Earthly film like 'Basic Instinct', Verhoeven exploits sex as much as he
does violence in his other films.  Some would accuse him of being excessive
in his display of these elements but all directors can't be subtle.  While
I've never found any statement in his films, I have generally been
entertained and knew what to expect coming in to this one.
     A group of fresh faced college graduates decide to enlist in the
futuristic military based on Earth but the technology in the future allows
them to explore regions of the universe presently unthinkable.  There is a
planet sending meteors to Earth which contain giant insect creatures which
kill Earthlings by the millions and the new recruits look at their
enlistment as more of an adventure rather than as an entrance way to Hell.
     The cast is headed by Casper Van Dien who plays Johnny Rico, a grunt
private who works his way up the military ranks as the film progresses.  His
fellow colleagues are Dina Meyer and Jake Busey and the girl he always loved
(Denise Richards) has joined a 
different branch of the military and they rarely see each other.  Another
colleague
(Neil Patrick Harris) has joined military intelligence and is key to the
film's resolution.  The military officers in the film (Michael Ironside and
Clancy Brown) are casted appropriately and are totally believable.
     The technical aspects of 'Starship Troopers are of the highest calibre
and I predict Academy Awards and possible wins for the special effects and
thunderous soundtrack which puts you into the action as if you're on screen
with everyone else in the film.  This upscale production has breathed
continuing life into the science fiction genre and while Hollywood
technology is better than ever and movie screenplays are worse than ever,
'Starship Troopers' demonstrates that the former can be a bonus to a movie
going experience.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Choo Eng Aun, Jack
STARSHIP TROOPERS is a US$100++ million action film. I can't say if
Hollywood is wasting money on such films because at the end of the day, the
business part of film-making rules in Hollywood. The trailers have probably
given you the idea that this film is a special-effects laden piece of work
and in this department, it does not disappoint at all. Perhaps if we look
into the direction of Paul Verhoeven, we can understand why STARSHIP
TROOPERS is what it is. He gave us the violent ROBOCOP (his US film debut),
then onto the sexual-thriller BASIC INSTINCT, the clever TOTAL RECALL and
most recently, his infamous work on the violently illicit SHOWGIRLS.
Violence is a recurring thing in all his films, not action and in STARSHIP
TROOPERS, he has shown his love for mayhem yet again, this time with a lot
of money. 
I have not read the Robert Heinlein book in which it is supposed to be
based on but from what I hear over the internet, fans of the book are
running amok, burning down theatres showing the film. Of course I was
joking but you get the idea. Verhoeven has interlaced STARSHIP TROOPERS
with media inspired propaganda advertisements of the military in conveying
this film. This is perhaps the more interesting feature of the movie and
they are almost always very funny. Audiences who feel like they are
watching bits and pieces of SWEET VALLEY HIGH and BEVERLY HILLS 90210 are
advised not to worry, it has been obviously intended but intention does not
necessarily coincide with preferences, thus the feeling of being cheated
out of the $7 that you paid. The actors and actresses were actually from
the above mentioned shows. The story has a group of teenagers living in an
almost sterile, militarized society and inspired to join the military.
Johnny Rico enlists himself in the military in his quest to win Carmen's
love, who incidentally is fanatical whn it comes to flying starships. Rico
ends up with a ground-based grunt squad while Carmen gets to pursue her
dreams of commanding a starship. 
When the city of Buenos Aires was devastated by an asteroid sent from the
Klendathu system, a system infested with primal bugs the size of elephants,
Earth unites and sends their brave your men and women to rid our planet
from this threat. The bugs are not as primitive as we may expect, they have
special bugs for special purposes. We have the standard grunt-bug which
goes around stabbing people, the giant-cannon-bug which fires plasma blasts
from its abdomen at starships hovering above and of course the flying-bug,
their version of our fighter planes. The CGI effects are amazing, not so
because they are anything new but rather the sheer numbers and fluidity in
movements when they swarm across the landscape of Klendathu. Verhoeven's
conveyance of violence is at-your-face level. He does not use hints of
terror or gore, he shows them in full glory, in widescreen. Singapore
audiences may not be able to `enjoy' fully the action because of censors
here and there but to give you an idea of what to expect; heads fly off,
bodies dismember and brains are sucked. 
Many people I know hated the film. I can't say I loved it myself but I did
like it for its satirical view of the future and also of course, the CG
effects. Plot and scriptwise, STARSHIP TROOPERS is no better than any
normal B-grade film. Verhoeven's direction was such that the movie did not
try too hard at all; the parameters for the film have been more or less
laid out in the beginning and audiences should be able to tell whether they
are gonna hate it or love it right from then on. It is more of an
alternative-mainstream movie, very much like MARS ATTACKS!, released a year
ago.
Bottom line: watch at your own risk, do not bring children, not so much
because of its violence but more of how it is potrayed (I'd prefer the
world `glorified' actually). Go for the special effects and action. And if
you can actually tell yourself that you can enjoy a cheesily written and
scripted action film, by all means, it should do you some good.

Author
Brian Takeshita
You really don't know how much of modern science fiction is based upon
Robert Heinlein's novel "Starship Troopers" until you read it for
yourself.  To many fans of the literary genre, Heinlein's novel has
become somewhat of a bible, setting the genesis of countless works
afterward.  It is therefore that a great responsibility comes with the
making of a movie version, and to deviate, even slightly, from the
original text would be to commit sacrilege.
If the fans of the novel had their druthers, I'm sure director Paul
Verhoeven would be nailed to a cross for his sins in making this film.
There are significant departures from both the storyline and the
technical aspects of the novel.  Minor characters are given major
roles, new characters are added, a subplot based upon psychic ability
is thrown in, the concept of power armor is taken out....the list goes
on and on.   I believe the worst thing I could have done before seeing
STARSHIP TROOPERS, the movie, was read "Starship Troopers," the novel.
Unfortunately, I did just that.  Twice, in fact, unaware that a few
years later, this movie would be made.  However, as difficult as it
is, one must maintain the objectivity necessary to review the film as
a film, and not as an adaptation.  I will therefore attempt to put my
loyalties to the novel aside for the moment.  Here goes.
STARSHIP TROOPERS is set in the human race's distant future and
follows a few graduating high school seniors who opt for federal
service rather then going on to college.  Basically, federal service
means a tour of duty in the military, the only way to gain
"citizenship", a prestigious status which puts you above regular
"civilians" in the ideological hierarchy of society.  What's so bad
about going into the military?  Aside from the lower-class stigma that
is sadly still attached, it also means you have a good chance of
getting maimed or killed.  You see, the humans are at war with a race
of arachnid alien creatures referred to simply as "bugs."  But these
are no ordinary household bugs, oh no.  These are ten foot tall
monsters that impale you with spearlike legs or cut you in half with
menacing pincers.  A can of Raid is not going to do.
At the center of the story is Johnny Rico.  Johnny's parents first
convince him not to enlist for federal service, but his girlfriend
Carmen convinces him otherwise.  Unfortunately, Carmen gets to join
the fleet and pilot one of the large transport cruisers while Johnny
gets sent to Mobile Infantry training to become one of the grunts.
There he is taught by drill instructor Sergeant Zim how to fight and
how to lead, but a training accident with live ammunition costs the
life of a cadet under Johnny's command.  Johnny is ready to wash out
of boot when the bugs send an asteroid to Earth and Johnny's hometown
of Buenos Aires is decimated.  Armed with a new resolve, he goes off
to fight.
Relative newcomer Casper van Dien puts in a pretty good performance as
the central character, whom we follow through his maturation into a
military leader.  Confident in himself, we know that with his first
combat experience, much of the toughness previously displayed will be
revealed as mere youthful bravado.  Denise Richards, as Carmen, is the
girl that every high school boy hates.  She's the pretty princess
who's supposed to be your girlfriend, but she will on a whim walk away
with some other guy, only to return saying, "Oh, he's just a friend."
Her character, unlike Johnny, is confident to the point of
obnoxiousness.  You really want her to bite it.  Big time.  Neil
Patrick Harris, as Carl Jenkins, portrays what is basically a
throwaway character who is of almost no value to the plot.  The only
thing remarkable about him is how he is leaps and bounds more
intelligent than his peers.  Dr. Doogie Howser, I presume.
A pleasant surprise was the character of Dizzy Flores, played by Dina
Meyer.  She is the other girl in Johnny's life, the one who is in
front of him the whole time, but doesn't get the attention she
deserves, try as she might to win his affections.  Whereas Johnny
follows Carmen, who quickly runs away from him once she can join the
fleet, Dizzy follows Johnny into the Mobile Infantry, and even
requests to be put into the same unit.  In combat, rather than be the
one to whose rescue Johnny must come, she is tough as nails toward
him, pushing him to be his best and to survive.  Hers is a strong
character who's caring goes beyond the conventional expressions to
which we're accustomed.
Another pleasant surprise is Michael Ironside's portrayal of Jean
Rasczak, a former soldier who teaches high school philosophy, but
later returns to military service as Johnny's platoon leader.  Rasczak
is the most thought-provoking character of the whole film, as he
explains the difference between a citizen and a civilian, and lives
the description.  It is also nice to see Ironside in a role where he's
not just a bad-assed heavy.  Instead, we find out he's a good actor
who can actually smile, and I hope to see him in a wider variety of
roles.
The special effects work to varying degrees.  The bugs are all done
superbly and look incredibly real.  When they appear, they intimidate
and scare quite effectively.  The humans' space vessels, however,
often appear like toys and seem outclassed by George Lucas's efforts
from 20 years ago.  Since at least 5 separate visual effects companies
were brought on board during the production of the film, it's no
wonder the quality varies so greatly.
Although the battle scenes are quite pitched and full of excitement,
the life and death struggle is often undermined by the campy quality
of many of the other parts of the film.  Since Verhoeven is also the
man who brought us Robocop, perhaps this is not surprising.  In one
exchange between "experts" debating whether or not the bugs could
pursue a policy of live and let live, I half expected one of them to
exclaim, "I'd buy THAT for a dollar!"  Also take the choice of
costuming, which makes the military look a lot like the Nazi's.  The
use of "Air Marshal" as the title for the supreme commander and a
giant bird symbol for the Earth government helps to reinforce this
image.  I asked myself what Verhoeven was trying to do:  Get the
audience behind the characters and involved in the story, or get us in
a bleak inside joke about the future?  Such a split is the kind of
reason why SWINGKIDS was such a poor choice for filmmaking.  Who cares
about kids who want to dance when there are Nazi atrocities being
committed all around them?  Maybe if we're all a bunch of Nazis in the
future, we should be eradicated by a bunch of bugs.  Verhoeven should
have shown less indulgence with the Nazi comparisons and the campiness
and more of Johnny and his journey learning about life and what it
means to live in the polis.  The love interest between Johnny and
Carmen and Carmen's subsequent story similarly should not have been
included, since they only distracting.  The movie should have stayed
truer to the novel in this case, not simply to be a purist film
version, but because it would have made a more compelling film.  The
novel is a story from the first person perspective of Johnny Rico, and
that is one of the reasons it is so effective.  The reader actually
gets into his mind and shows us how he has changed.  Verhoeven could
have done this by concentrating more on Johnny; giving his character
more scenes and generally spending more time with him.  The novel also
gives us something to think about:  What it means to live with the
human condition and the sacrifices we make to preserve it.  This film
could have been so much more than a Friday night movie filled with
action.  It's a shame it's not.

Author
Dennis Schwartz
STARSHIP TROOPERS (director: Paul Verhoeven; cast: Johnny Rico (Casper
Van Dien),  Dizzy Flores (Dina Meyer), Carmen Ibanez (Denise Richards),
Ace Levy (Jake Busey), Carl Jenkins (Neil Patrick Harris), Zander
(Patrick Muldoon), Sgt. Zim (Clancy Brown), Jean Rasczak (Michael
Ironside) , 1997)
You can watch this movie, that is based on a sci-fi work by Robert
Heinlein, either as a straight gung-ho war film, or you can see it
mostly as a spoof. Anyway you watch it won't require too much gray
matter from your brain cells, because you will either find this film
entertaining and a feast for weary eyes, or you might, like me, "think"
that this film is so bad that it really couldn't be this bad, I must be
missing something. But I have come to the conclusion that this insipid
B- movie, is that bad, despite the high production costs it took to make
it.
If there are any good parts to this film, it might be in the occasional
sardonic one liner, such as this one, that makes light of the film's
heavy assault on our sensibilities, as one soldier is telling the hero
of the story, "You're good at killing bugs." This came after a big
battle between the two opposing armies.
Basically, the film should be seen as a war movie, because its spoof of
the military, grew thin very fast for me, as it got carried away with
the cartoon characters it has stereotyped, going for an overkill on a
spoof that is so obvious in the first place, that by spending so much
time with spoofing the military, is just plain unnecessary. It is the
last half of the film that takes over the movie, anyway, as the film
becomes all about killing the bugs who have invaded a city called Bueno
Aires.That's the town all our hero kids come from in the story.
I guess the film is set in the future, but it sure looks like the
present to me despite all the computer graphics, as it makes use of its
astronomical budget to become solely a computerized special effect
movie, that should endear itself to the MTV generation. There is no
subtlety to the continual spoofs against the military personnel.The
mindless story traces a bunch of high school graduates and their
dedicated teacher, well-acted by Michael Ironside, as they all join the
military for all the reasons that prevail at the present time for why
people join.
After awhile, all the performers looked alike to me, but I wouldn't be
doing my duty as a movie reviewer, if I should fail to point out that
there is some kind of melodramatic love story going down among the four
stars of the film, Rico (Casper Van Dien), the school football hero,
loves Carmen (Denise Richards), the school beauty and math brain, who is
set on becoming a pilot, which is the reason Rico joins the military.
There is some kind of mumbo-jumbo talk among them about the difference
between a citizen and a civilian: A citizen does his duty by joining the
military and protecting the "Federation", a civilian makes lots of money
and goes to Harvard, as what Rico's folks wanted him to do. The other
part of the love story is that Dizzy Flores (Dina Meyer), a football
jock and an attractive filly, is in love with Rico, but he spurns her
attention. But persistence pays off, she joins him in the infantry,
while Carmen falls for her co-pilot, a dude named Zander (Patrick
Muldoon), and the rivalry between Rico and Zander is about as thrilling
as having a spider crawl up your leg.
I don't think you get much bang for your money out of this film, unless
you are really into special effects or found this sophomoric satire
funny or you are a reactionary, then I think you will find many things
to like about this empty hearted attempt to put WW11 into an outer space
conflagration film.
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Laurence Mixson
By Laurence Mixson: venom8@hotmail.com
Starring Casper Van Dien, Patrick Muldoon, Dina Meyer, Jake Busey, and
Neil Patrick Harris
        I've heard a lot of complaints about Starship Troopers in the 4
days since it's been open: "it's too violent!", or "the characters
suck!" or "the action scenes are non-stop". Well, not to point out the
obvious, folks, but THAT'S NOT THE FRIGGIN' POINT OF THE MOVIE!
        First of all, Starship Troopers IS the most violent main-stream
movie I've ever seen, about 10 times the scale of Braveheart. Seriously.
The director, Paul Verhoeven(Robocop, Total Recall) who's already known
for his willingness to show graphic images, completely lets himself
loose here. I want get into the gory details, but let me just say this:
I truly believe that the reason there's so little profanity in this
movie is so they could squeak by the MPAA with an R rating, instead of
the dreaded NC-17.
        But that's beside the point. Basically, the movie, like most good
sci-fi movies, is set in the future(did that make any sense?). The hero,
Rico(Van Dien) just recently graduated from high school. He joins, both
in an attempt to impress his girlfriend AND to gain citizenship(I'll
explain later) the Federation Army.
        Back to that citizenship part: the earth, or even the universe, for all
we know(that's one thing I like about this movie: it doesn't have a
"dummy history" at the beginning that scrolls down and gives you a
complete history of the movie. You kind of have to figure things out for
youself) is comprised of the Federation(yeah, yeah I know it's a trek
rip-off.) You can either be a civilian, without advanced priveliges like
being able to give birth to children, or you can become a citizen by
touring with the armed forces for a couple of years. Rico desires to
become a citizen, mainly because of the influence of a high school
teacher. Lucky for the plot of this movie, he joins just as the "Bug
War" breaks out.
        "Bug War?", you ask. Let me explain: in a planet not too far from here,
named Klandathu, there live various types of "bugs", albiet really big,
really mean bugs, that keep launching meteors at earth. One hits,
conviently killing Rico's parents, and earth, of course, declares war on
the bugs.
        Here's where the fun begins: Rico slowly rises through the ranks,
accompanied by his friends Diz(Meyer) and whoever Neil Patrick Harris
plays. I can't remember the dude's name. He also slowly loses touch of
his girlfriend, who's a pilot in the service, to a cocky pilot named,
uh, something-or-other, played by Patrick Mulroon.
        The infantry, with Rico and Diz, lands on the bug planet. They fight
the bugs, mainly the swords-for-limbs arachnids, with machine guns.
These aren't really too effective on the bugs. Which brings me too a
point: in the future, if they can launch handheld nukes from
bazookas(which they do numerous times in this movie), then why can't
they just drop a big nuke on the bug planet? Of course, the answer's too
simple: that would eliminate the cool fight scenes.
        Which brings me to the fight scenes: technically speaking, they're huge
accomplishments for Verhoeven and his team.  The bugs are visually
stunning(even if you can't tell where their faces are), and the blood
and guts fly convincingly as well. Of course, if you're squeamish,
you'll hate these scenes completely. Let's just say I have a very strong
stomach concerning movie violence, and even I gulped a little when an
arachinid bit a man in half and the bottom half flopped down on Rico.
Eww.
        To wind things down(I think this is the longest review I've ever
written), let me just say this about Starship Troopers: it's a witty,
somewhat forgettable, high budget b-movie.  The witty part comes from
Verhoeven's very sick sense of humor indulged in these sort of
"newsreel, propaganda pieces" the federation uses to recruit new
members. These shorts, very remniscient of the 40's and 50's same-type
thing, are hilaroius. Even if that "Would You Like to Know More?" thing
gets annoying after a while(it doesn't always tell you more. Maybe I
wanted to know more, dangit!)
        So what's the bottom line skinny on Starship Troopers: if you liked
Robocop, Total Recall, or just action and sci-fi films in general, this
is definitely the best film of that type this year(much better than The
Fifth Element".) If you're a little squeamish, or pregnant, then stay
away. Or if you're just stuck in the middle, trying to find an
alternative to "Bean" or "The Devil's Advocate"(God knows, who isn't?)
then check this one out, for sure!

Author
Michael Dequina
Starship Troopers (R) ** 1/2 (out of ****)
Starship Troopers is Paul Verhoeven's return to familiar sci-fi ground
after the disastrous Showgirls, and it just might be the quintessential
Verhoeven film.  While it is not a complete rebound from the instant camp
classic of '95, it is a shining example of Verhoeven at his best--and,
unfortunately, his worst.
Based on the Robert A. Heinlein novel of the same name, Starship Troopers
details mankind's future war with giant bugs from outer space.  Why have
these alien arthropods decided to pick a fight with Earthlings?  We never
find out, not that it matters.  The wild and woolly battles with the CGI
bugs find the Dutch Verhoeven, who made his name in America with the
superlative sci-fi actioners RoboCop and Total Recall, back in top form.
No other action director can make mass impalings, decapitations, and
dismemberment so sadistically--and gleefully--over-the-top.  More prudish
viewers may find the bloody action repugnant, but the gruesome, almost
cartoonish, nature of the violence is exactly what makes Verhoeven
adventures so much fun.
Unfortunately, aside from a brief snippet of opening bug action, there is
an often laughable first hour of exposition and uninspired soap opera
subplots, during which we meet our focal slate of stock characters: Johnny
Rico (Casper Van Dien), hotshot soldier; his demure girlfriend, Carmen
Ibanez (Denise Richards), a military pilot; brash Dizzy Flores (Dina
Meyer), who carries a torch for the oblivious Johnny; pilot Zander Barcalow
(Patrick Muldoon), Johnny's rival for Carmen's affections; and Carl Jenkins
(Neil Patrick Harris), an intelligence officer whose psychic abilities only
extend to animals.  Every film needs its expository time, and this section
of the film is an obvious timekiller before the war heats up, but Verhoeven
and screenwriter Ed Neumeier put forth very little effort, if any, to make
these characters and their situations halfway interesting.  More energy and
thought is expended in the acidly satiric news bites and fascistic military
recruitment propaganda that pepper this first half.  How do the filmmakers
expect the viewers to care about the characters if they obviously do not?
If anything could have saved this first hour and more "dramatic" moments
that come later in the film, it would be the acting, but, as so painfully
exemplified in Showgirls, Verhoeven does not have much of an eye for young
talent.  Van Dien, whom I remember not-so-fondly from his stints on ABC
Daytime's One Life to Live and the amusingly cheesy but little-seen 1990
syndicated women-in-prison soap Dangerous Women, can bark out "Kill 'em
all!" with the best of them, but he has little acting skill to offer beside
his square jaw.  It also does not help that he, Richards, and Meyer make
the WASPiest Argentines since... well, Jonathan Pryce in Evita; and that
they, Harris, and Muldoon look much too old to be the high schoolers their
characters are supposed to be at the film's opening.  The only cast member
displaying some signs of life--aside from Michael Ironside, who is usual
stern, effective self as teacher/commanding officer Jean Rasczak--is Meyer,
who infuses Dizzy with moxie and spunk.
And while Verhoeven is miles away from Joe Eszterhas (thankfully so), some
post-Showgirls fallout is still in evidence, most blatantly in a
ridiculously gratuitous co-ed shower scene, and more subtly so in its
anti-feminism.  I usually do not like to include spoilers in my reviews,
but I cannot address this point without giving something away, so skip the
next paragraph if you wish not to have some details spoiled...
When a male character is able to destroy a humongous tanker bug, he is
celebrated as a hero; when a female character does the same--which no other
person save that one male is able to do--she receives no credit.  A female
soldier mortally wounded in combat bravely accepts her impending death, but
not because she did her part in saving the human race.  In the end, her
passing is worth it to her because... she had the chance to sleep with a
studly conquest.  A female character supplies a critical coup de grace
against the aliens, but who is carried on everyone's shoulders like a hero
at the end?  A male who did not do much of anything.
Its problems aside, Starship Troopers does deliver what the audience comes
for, which is two-plus hours of no-brainer entertainment, filled with the
graphic ultraviolence that has become associated with the name Paul
Verhoeven.  But as fun as much of the movie is, its superficiality is quite
dismaying coming from Verhoeven, who once upon a time melded electrifying
action with plot and character in RoboCop and Total Recall.  Starship
Troopers is not the return to form for Verhoeven many have called it--in
the end, it is just a step in the right direction, albeit a fairly
entertaining one.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  michael_jordan@geocities.com  |  mj23@the18thhole.com
mrbrown@michaeljordanfan.com  |  mj23@michaeljordanfan.com
mrbrown23@juno.com  |  mrbrown@iname.com  |  mst3k@digicron.com
Visit Mr. Brown's Movie Site at http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/
Personal Page: http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/home.html
Michael Jordan Sites:
http://members.tripod.com/~mj23/mj.html  &
http://www.geocities.com/Colosseum/Field/2302/
"I can accept failure.  Everyone fails at something.  But I can't accept
not trying.
It doesn't matter if you win as long as you give everything in your heart."
--Michael Jordan
